Qtly div five ct v five ct prior Pay July 13 Record June 30 Reuter 

Crude oil netback value complex refinery rise sharply Europe firm U.S. Friday previous week fell sharply Singapore accord calculation Reuters Pipeline. The firmer tone refining margin Europe U.S. relected high price petroleum product particularly gasoline support crude oil prices. Netback value crude oil refine Northern Europe rise substantially follow strong gain gasoline price there. Brent value 19.45 dlrs 56 ct barrel pct previous week. In U.S. Gulf sweet crude rise value 14 ct 19.33 dlrs West Texas Intermediate 0.7 pct. Sour grade U.S. Gulf show increase 33 ct barrel Alaska North Slope 1.7 pct. But netbacks crude oil refine Singapore fell sharply 15 ct 68 ct barrel ample distillate supply weigh petroleum product prices. Attaka Singapore value 18.55 dlrs decline 68 ct barrel 3.5 pct previous week. For refinery Mediterranean netback value mostly low decline seven 14 cts. The value Kuwait crude fell 14 ct 18.37 dlrs Iranian Light fell 11 ct 19.14 dlrs. On U.S. West Coast netback value ANS CIF L.A. jumped sharply 40 ct barrel 2.2 pct 18.82 dlrs high gasoline prices. Reuter 

Treasury Secretary James Baker float exchange rate effective hop promote stability prevent imbalance emerge global economy. In remark afternoon session International Monetary Fund's Interim Committee Baker suggest abandoned. "But I suggest" "that stability keep head direction wind shifts." He indicator serve "as compass" add structural indicator focus attention policies. Baker IMF "needs move beyond macroeconomic indicator structural indicator focus attention policy specific relevance imbalance today." The Treasury Secretary indicator prominent role annual economic review -- Article IV consultation -- Fund performs. Baker told policy make IMF adopt earlier recommendation make IMF surveillance relevant policymakers public. "In particular urge increase publicity IMF appraisal developed Article IV consultation follow-up report country action implement IMF recommendation great special consultation procedures" said. Baker emphasize indicator device "for move beyond rhetoric action." He provide "more structure induce discipline peer pressure process policy coordination." He Fund's procedure surveillance review update reflect indicators. "This matter priority executive board" said. Baker urge Fund develop alternative medium-term economic scenario country "can focus clearly imbalance identify option address analyze implication options." He far find path lead medium-term objectives. "If effective remedial action significant deviation intend course definitive way indentifying course key variables" said. Reuter 

Nerco Inc oil gas unit close acquisition 47 pct work Broussard oil gas field Davis Oil Co> 22.5 mln dlrs cash. Nerco estimate field's total prove developed undeveloped reserve 24 billion cubic foot equivalent natural gas double company's previous reserves. The field locate southern Louisiana. Reuter 

For seven week United States Britain vetoed Security Council resolution impose mandatory sanction South Africa. Nine Council's 15 vote draft aim force South Africa implement eight-year-old U.N. independence plan Namibia (South West Africa) vast sparsely populate territory rich minerals. The U.S. Britain join West Germany cast negative votes. France Italy Japan abstained. The resolution call comprehensive mandatory sanction Pretoria insists make Namibian independence conditional withdrawal 30000 Cuban troop neighbour Angola. Reuter 

Commodities gold grain cotton post solid gain flurry buying loss U.S. dollar rise rate kindle fear inflation economic instability. Gains pronounce Commodity Exchange New York gold jumped 12.40 dlrs close 436.50 dlrs troy ounce silver 22.5 cent 6.86 dlrs troy ounce. A key factor behind advance anticipation inflation major industrial nation halt slide value U.S. dollar Steve Chronowitz director commodity research Smith Barney Harris Upham Co. New York. The dollar tumble top finance official seven large industrial nation reaffirm commitment support value despite report intervention U.S. Federal Reserve Bank trader said. Traders appear industrial nation know Group Seven lack ability change long-term direction currency markets. "Maybe idea plans" Chronowitz. "If it's evident." "It look there's cure free market value be. "One force major trading partner stimulate economies" measure correct mount U.S. trade deficit Chronowitz said. "I market believe believe recourse reflate point. It's tedious process that's what's happening" said. The fall value dollar make U.S. commodity cheaper foreign buyer stimulate demand. At trader hold stock bond value investment fall turn commodity precious metal hedge Marty McNeill metal analyst New York trading Dominick Dominick. The reaction metal market reverberate throughout commodity market grain livestock cotton post broad gains. Traders Chicago Board Trade attention grain market shift concern burdensome supply outlook low dollar stimulate export demand. After close trading Agriculture Department raise estimate grain import Soviet Union mln tonne month-earlier report. Live hog frozen pork belly post sharp gain Chicago Mercantile Exchange live cattle moderately higher. Analysts factor boost hog prices. They hog haven't make weight gain normal farmer busy field market animals. Reuter 

General Motors Corp temporarily lay 9800 worker plant week. The layoff bring 11900 General Motors worker temporarily company. Indefinite layoff remain unchanged 37000. General Motors Chevrolet-Pontiac-GM Canada plant Okalhoma City Okla. shut April 13 April 20 inventory adjustment. Some 5500 worker idle plant. General Motors' Chevrolet-Pontiac-GM Canada plant Doraville Ga. close period inventory adjustment 4300 worker affected. The company's Lakewood Ga. plant shut December 2100 worker temporary layoff. General Motors car plant five truck plant work overtime Saturday April 11. Reuter 

Tennex Industries Inc> Japanese own supplier air cleaner automotive industry build seven mln dlr plant Munfreesboro Tenn. The company 37500-square-foot plant initially supply part Nissan Motor Manufacturing Corp USA> nearby Smyna. The company hope eventually produce part U.S. car makers. Reuter 

Egypt expect tender April 22 500000 tonne corn May September shipment private export source said. Reuter 

Shr 67 ct v 62 ct Net 9160000 v 7722000 Assets 4.5 billion v billion Note: Shr net data accounting change announce 1986 add 30 ct share year-ago 1st qtr results. Reuter 

Shr 20 ct v 25 ct Net 487000 v 435000 Reuter 

Shr loss 21 ct v loss 28 ct Net loss 817000 v loss 1058000 Revs 5627000 v 7397000 Year Shr loss 75 ct v loss 1.36 dlrs Net loss 2872000 v loss 5200000 Revs 23.3 mln v 21.1 mln Note: 1985 net include 1255000 adjustment inventory valuation 486000 cost-reduction expenses. Full name International Power Machines Corp. Reuter 

The Chicago Board Options Exchange CBOE list Standard Poor 500 stock index option begin April 20 trade side-by-side exist S P 500 option SPX>. The S P 500 option contract differs exist contract settlement contract base opening value index expiration Friday. Settlement exist contract base closing value index expiration Friday. The opening settlement S P 500 option offer month S P 500 futures. Initial month list option June September December CBOE said. Dissemination settlement price option special ticker symbol -- SET> exchange said. There initially seven series strike price contract month option -- strike price "at money" near actual spot index value above below spot index. Position limit combination exist S P 500 option 15000 contracts. The exchange rare event stock expiration Friday previous day's closing price stock calculate settlement value index. Reuter 

The European Community told Congress textile legislation injure EC interest approve doubt community retaliate U.S. exports. Roy Denmam EC delegation issue warn letter Senator Lloyd Bentsen chairman Finance Committee. A copy letter provide Reuters. Denmam told Bentsen Texas Democrat textile legislation pass include omnibus trade bill injured EC interest "there doubt EC retaliate United States." He add "at U.S. textile export EC grow rapidly result retaliation substantial reduction U.S. export jobs." The textile legislation back strongly industry hard hit import senator textile-producing impose tough global quota textile import include Europe quotas. Reagan Administration official oppose textile legislation say pass likely prompt presidential veto. Denman comment textile issue assessment Senate trade bill title S.490. He concerned provision Senate bill limit eliminate president's discretion retaliate nation keep market close foreign goods. U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter oppose provision argue presidential flexibility need able negotiate country market retaliation retain final discretionary weapon. The pending overall trade legislation force Administration consult Congress seek approval step-by-step GATT negotiations. He "enactment S. 490 reduce confidence government America's commitment multinational trade." Summing senate legislation Denman "a provision bil achieve opposite intend lead dangerous consequence U.S. economy." Reuter 

The Chicago Board Options Exchange CBOE list Standard Poor 500 stock index option begin April 20 trade side-by-side exist S P 500 options. The S P 500 option contract differs exist contract settlement contract base opening value index expiration Friday. Settlement exist contract base closing value index expiration Friday. The opening settlement S P 500 option offer month S P 500 futures. Initial month list option June September December CBOE said. Dissemination settlement price option special ticker symbol -- SET> exchange said. There initially seven series strike price contract month option -- strike price "at money" near actual spot index value above below spot index. Position limit combination exist S P 500 option 15000 contracts. The exchange rare event stock expiration Friday previous day's closing price stock calculate settlement value index. Reuter 

A Grand Jury Manhattan Federal Court indict arbitrageur charge swap inside information firm Goldman Sachs Co Kidder Peabody Co court document showed. Robert Freeman risk arbitrage Goldman Sachs Co Richard Wigton employee Kidder Peabody Co Inc Timothy Tabor formerly Kidder charge trading inside information June 1984 January 1986. They arrest February. The indictment alledged Goldman Sachs Freeman money insider trading scheme. According indictment Freeman exchange inside information Martin Siegel vice president Kidder Peabody. Siegel plead guilty February 13 charge participate conspiracy. The indictment charge Siegel pass non-public information Wigton Tabor Freeman. Reuter 

Great American Management Investment Inc told Securities Exchange Commission acquire 7.7 pct stake Atcor Inc. Great American bought stake investment. It add considered--but yet decided--to buy additional Atcor share either market private transaction tender offer otherwise. Great American paid 6.1 mln dlrs 462400 Atcor shares. It recent purchase include 191400 share bought March 18-April 6. Reuter 

Oper shr ct v 13 ct Oper net 17806 v 312692 Revs 1318165 v 2239349 Nine mths Oper shr 27 ct c 28 ct Oper net 640156 v 671291 Revs 5612818 v 5632044 Note: Oper excludes gain discontinue operation 15598 year-ago qtr loss discontinue operation 49040 year-ago nine mths. Reuter 

Moore Corp Ltd expect 1987 profit continue operation exceed 1986 result recover 1985 level company earn 152 mln U.S. dlrs 1.70 dlrs share president M. Keith Goodrich said. "We'll substantial increase earnings continue operations" told reporter annual meeting. He expect profit recover year's lose ground reach 1985 results. In 1986 profit continue operation slump 139.5 mln dlrs 1.54 dlrs share. The total exclude loss 30 mln dlrs discontinue operations. Goodrich Moore actively look acquisition related core area form manufacturing handling. "We acquisition" company raise billion dlrs purpose. Chairman Judson Sinclair answer shareholder's question told annual meeting special resolution pass shareholder create class prefer share allow Moore move quickly decide pursue acquisition. "If major acquisition ... mean move expediency" Sinclair said. Asked resolution design Moore protection hostile takeover Sinclair "I threat corporation time." Reuter 

Arvin Industries Inc shareholder annual meeting vote increase authorize common share 50 mln 30 mln. The company told shareholder offering 1.7 mln common share January raise 50 mln dlrs 500 share variable rat prefer stock offer February raise 50 mln dlrs. The company place 150 mln dlrs long-term debt March. Reuter 

Raytheon Co United States Navy award 215.3 mln dlr contract produce 1927 AIM/RIM-7M Sparrow Missile Guidance Control Sections associate hardware. Under contract company provide missile associate hardware U.S. Navy Air Force U.S. allies. Raytheon contract represent major share fiscal 1987 competitive Sparrow missile procurement. Reuter 

Gabelli Group Inc subsidiary held total 295800 Decision/Capital Fund Inc share 14.8 pct total outstanding. It share held behalf investment client intention seek control fund. Gabelli recent purchase Decision/Capital Fund stock include 95800 share bought April 3-6 Philadelphia Stock Exchange. Gabelli investment firm headquarter New York City. Its Gabelli Co subsidiary brokerage firm. Reuter 

Consumers Power Co 56 mln dlrs available redeem par 15 pct series mortgage bond exchange outstanding bond exchange program. The utility March 17 offer exchange 15 pct mortgage bond due March 1 1994 series mortgage bond 9-1/4 pct due April 1 1997. The offer expire April 14 1987. Reuter 

The Semiconductor Industry Association three-month average book-to-bill ratio 1.21 above analysts' expectation reflect sixth straight increase indicator computer industry activity. Average book month period end March total 910.8 mln dlrs 15.6 pct month ago high booking September 1984. March billing computer chip sale month total 912.1 mln dlrs 34.6 pct month ago association said. The month average billing total 751.3 mln dlrs 6.5 pct. March billing strong record November 1984 association said. The book bill ratio 1.21 high May 1984 noted. Preliminary total solid shipment quarter 1987 total 2.25 billion dlrs 4.9 pct quarter 15.9 pct year's quarter. Semiconductor Industry Association President Andrew Procassini rise book bill due substantial increase U.S. booking March. "We believe booking increase reflect grow confidence electronic equipment manufacturer end-equipment market segment improve substantially quarter" Procassini statement. The association revise book-to-bill ratio estimate month end February 1.12 1.13 earlier. It far revise January book-to-bill figure 1.09 1.12 estimate earlier. The three-month average book-to-bill ratio 1.21 March mean 100 dlrs worth product ship computer chip maker receive 121 dlrs orders. Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc analyst Michael Gumport association number indicate March order 20 pct above normal seasonal level. The association break March order three-month average 910.8 mln dlrs. Gumport note three-month average booking above 800-865 mln dlrs anticipate industry. He semiconductor stock rise five ten pct stock market tomorrow due positive numbers. "Skeptics pretty strong reason (of stocks)" Gumport said. Kidder Peabody Co analyst Michael Kubiak ratio indicates March order billion dlrs high monthly rate April 1984. He predict five pct rise semiconductor stock stock soar 15 pct session. "One month boom-time news" said. Kubiak attribute stong semiconductor order strength personal computer market inventory restock strong buying distributors. Purchasing manager keep computer chip inventory low due overcapacity industry slow growth economy analyst noted. The semiconductor industry slump past years. The analyst March sale number strong evidence yet trend turning. Nevertheless expect Administration retreat propose sanction Japanese chip makers. They add industry continue improve mean sanction short term. Jack Beedle President In-Stat electronics industry research firm call March number "excellent" caution excessive optimism. "I believe caution word euphoria" Beedle add yet strong indication economy computer industry support solid long-term recovery. Beedle think semiconductor industry quarter think positive shift export industrial production need sustain recovery. Reuter 

MP Co New York investment partnership told Securities Exchange Commission bought 6.8 pct stake IPCO Corp common stock. The partnership acquire 346600 IPCO share pay 4.9 mln dlrs believe security "an attractive investment opportunity." It plan regularly review investment future recommend strategy extraordinary corporate transaction merger reorganization liquidation asset sale. The partnership control Marcus Schloss Co Inc New York brokerage firm Prime Medical Products Inc Greenwood S.C. medical supply firm. Reuter 

Oper shr loss 30 ct v loss 1.27 dlrs Oper net loss 8648000 v loss 25.6 mln Revs 27.4 mln v 33.3 mln Avg shrs 29.1 mln v 20.1 mln Note: Oper excludes loss provision discontinue operation 971000 v 12.2 mln loss conversion debt 587000 v gain 1734000. 1985 oper excludes loss pension plan liquidation 631000 loss discontinue operation 1015000. Reuter 

Retail sale truck March rise 16.4 pct month Motor Vehicle Manufacturers Association. The trade dealer sell 377617 truck March 324327 year. Year-to-date truck sale 3.6 pct 934074 1986's 901757. Reuter 

Elements drug industry endanger life child pressure government delay common warn link aspirin fatal disease doctor said. The warn involve Reye's Syndrome require aspirin product Food Drug Administration (FDA) directive ago appear label aspirin aspirin-containing products. The industry government coax voluntarily printing warn label mid-1985. But editorial week's Journal American Medical Association Dr Edward Mortimer Case Western Reserve University Cleveland aspirin manufacturer mislead physician act irresponsibly oppose warn then. Mortimer's criticism prompt government study publish issue Journal found "strong association" aspirin Reye's Syndrome. Reye's Syndrome kill 20 cent victim strike follow chicken pox influenza illnesses. Symptoms include lethargy belligerence excessive vomiting. Those survive sometimes suffer brain damage. Reuter 

General Motors Corp's Hughes Aircraft Co receive contract worth 20 mln dlrs Boeing Co's Boeing Commercial Airplane Co. Hughes supply cabin entertainment service Boeing's 747-4000 jumbo jetliners. Reuter 

Audec Corp> sell privately 24 unit consist 40000 common share 40000 redeemable common share purchase warrant total 480000 dlrs. Audec sale plan total 28 unit 20000 dlrs each. Reuter 

The French government propose creation facility development debt reduction framework World Bank. In statement issue conjunction meeting International Monetary Fund's policy-making Interim Committee French "multilateral resource collect permit partial refinance highly concessional term previously reschedule official debts." The statement "French government believe necessary step deal issue poorest countries' debt." The French statement Paris club reschedulings lengthen repayment period 15 20 instead current limit 10 years. And grace period extended. "These measure confine poorest heavily indebted country decide case-by-case basis" said. The French call make IMF's compensatory financing facility export shortfall concessional. Reuter 

Cadillac Fairview Corp Ltd> receive proposal acquire company follow announcement August retain investment dealer solicit offer outstanding common shares. Cadillac Fairview offer subject clarification negotiation offer far details. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp U.S. car truck assembly plant overtime week. Six seven U.S. facility week. The plant overtime week Saturday April 11 company's Sterling Heights Mich. factory. The company's U.S. plant office close Friday April 17 Monday April 20 Good Friday Martin Luther King Jr. holidays. Reuter 

The European Community (EC) retaliate U.S. textile export Congress pass trade legislation damage European interest EC official warn today. Roy Denman EC delegation issue warn letter Senator Lloyd Bentsen chairman Finance Committee. A copy provide Reuters. The bill back textile industry senator textile-producing impose global quota textile import include Europe. Denman concerned provision bill limit eliminate president's discretion retaliate nation keep market close foreign goods. Reuter 

Winterhalter Inc shareholder approve 525000 dlr acquisition Winterhalter Interface Systems Inc INTF>. The acquisition 15 ct Winterhalter share. Reuter 

Harold H. Kline 48 resign May president Liberty Financial Group Inc Liberty Savings Bank unit pursue opportunties company said. The company Kline's post fill Charles G. Cheleden chairman chief executive officer. Kline continue serve board Liberty Financial Liberty Savings company added. Reuter 

Immunomedics Inc file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission propose sale 2500000 share common stock. The company sell 2100000 share stockholder sell remain 400000 shares. Proceeds offering product development basic research staff expansion prepayment debt capital expenditure work capital company said. The offering co-managed E.F. Hutton Co Inc First Boston Corp Immunomedics said. Reuter 

Mobil Corp Chairman Allen E. Murray company's exploration production budget increase foreseeable future "operating assumption (oil) price remain low spectrum. "Our budget level I amount" Murray town ceremony celebrate consolidation Mobil's domestic exploration production operation locally-based subsidiary. Last Mobil spent total 2.13 billion dlrs exploration production 341 mln dlrs United States 1.79 billion overseas. Murray subsidiary Mobil Exploration Production U.S. Inc. create "part cost save effort" instead "increase efficiency ability stay ahead pack." The consolidation save Mobil 15 mln dlrs annually relocation reorganization cost absorbed accord A.F. Stancell vice president U.S. produce operation company. Mobil nation's large oil company respond collapse oil price -- 30 dlrs barrel end-1985 low 10 dlrs mid-1986 -- lay 5500 cut budget midyear 27 percent 1.1 billion dlrs. Of amount 900 mln dlrs eliminate exploration spending spending plans. But company report increase profit 1986 1985 jump share earnings 3.45 dlrs share 2.55 dlrs. Reuter 

Shr loss 10 ct v profit 17 ct Net loss 1546000 v profit 4078000 Revs 22.6 mln v 38.9 mln Reuter 

General Motors' Hughes Aircraft Co award contract worth 20 mln dlrs Boeing's Boeing Commercial Airplane Co provide advanced cabin entertainment service Boeing's 747-400 airliners. Hughes us advanced digital electronic technique add cabin light control cabin advisory sign seat information. Hughes 747-400 schedule complete 1988. Reuter 

President Reagan criticize House-passed budget say Democratic budget plan usual. The budget cut defense eight billion dlrs call 18 billion dlrs taxes. He defense cut potentially theratened security ask American taxpayer pay Democrats' excesses. Reuter 

Standard Poor's lower rating 190 mln dlrs Zenith Electronic Corp debt continued poor earnings result increase debt leverage. Among rating change company's senior debt lower BB-plus BBB-plus. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service lower rating 464 mln dlrs long-term debt issue RepublicBank Corp principal subsidiary upgraded 451 mln dlrs security Interfirst Corp IFC>. The rating adjustment base likelihood propose merger Texas bank consummated. Moody's Interfirst considerably weaker institutions. Among rating change RepublicBank's senior debt downgrade BA-1 BAA-1 Interfirst's raise BA-1 B-1. Reuter 

Treasury Secretary James Baker commercial bank develop flexibility concert lending mechanism "to assure continued participation money packages." He major debtor nation able count receive timely disbursement loan essential support well-conceived economic programs. His remark afternoon session International Monetary Fund's policy make Interim Committee. Baker "The urgency willingness cooperate support large help carry difficult crisis period 1982 1983 evident." He address commercial bank "develop menu alternative money option bank debt exposure choose provide continue support debtor reforms." He "continued implementation debt strategy rest do so." Baker growth prospect low income country remain issue "critical concern United States." He intend address poor country prospect great detail tomorrow's meeting joint IMF-World Bank Devlopment Committee. Baker minister guard appear magical solution complex debt problem. "I stress guard ephemeral attraction magical solution appear tantalize alternative rigorous reality grapple debt problems" said. But emphasize last progress approach situation case-by-case basis "bringing bear policy financing need bring economy sustain economic growth." Reuter 

chile's trade surplus narrow 102.2 mln dlrs february 105.4 mln dlrs month above 18.2-mln-dlr surplus record january 1987 central bank said. Exports february total 379.4 mln dlrs 17.2 pct above january figure. Imports fell 9.2 pct previous month 277.2 mln dlrs. The figure month 314 mln 208.6 mln dlrs respectively. The accumulate trade surplus month 1987 stand 120.4 mln dlrs 132.8 mln dlrs previous year. Reuter 

Economists doubt Federal Reserve firm policy aid dollar despite high discount window borrowing late two-week statement period heavy borrowing Wednesday. Data show net borrowing Fed average 393 mln dlrs week Wednesday 265 mln dlrs prior statement period. Wednesday borrowing 1.4 billion dlrs Federal fund average 6.45 pct. "One Fed firm probably isn't" William Sullivan Dean Witter Reynolds. Sullivan assume Fed firm policy modestly support dollar net borrowing two-weeks Wednesday nearly 400 mln dlrs average 250 mln dlrs previous months. However Dean Witter economist note late two-week period include quarter seasonal demand push borrrowings. "Some argue Fed firm policy look try play catchup reserve provision late statement period didn't quite it" Ward McCarthy Merrill Lynch Capital Markets. A Fed spokesman told press press conference Fed net one-day miss billion dlrs reserve projection week end Wednesday. Still McCarthy cumulative miss estimate week cause add few reserve earlier week actually needed. The Fed market reserve management action Thursday Friday day week. It add temporary reserve indirectly Monday via billion dlrs customer repurchase agreement supply reserve directly via System repurchase Tuesday Wednesday. Based Fed data economist calculate two-day System repurchase agreement Fed arrranged Tuesday total 5.9 billion dlrs. They Wednesday's overnight System repos approximately 3.4 billion dlrs. "It quite clear Fed firm policy time" Larry Leuzzi S.G. Warburg Co Inc. Citing view share economist Leuzzi Fed cannot really afford seriously lift rate dollar harm already weak economy United States abroad add financial stress develop country lenders. "Those believe Fed tighten policy late statement period explain act dollar tumbled" McCarthy Merrill Lynch. He dollar stag precipitous drop statement period disappointment yesterday's Washington meeting international monetary official fail produce anything offer substantive dollar aid. In currency dealer Wednesday's G-7 communique alter prevail view yen need rise far redress huge trade imbalance United States Japan. The economist generally agree Fed aim steady policy correspond weekly average Fed fund rate six 6-1/8 pct. This rate November. "I'm sure Fed engineering tighter policy dollar suspect" Sullivan Dean Witter. If Fed probably nudge fund rate goal 6.25 6.35 pct six 6.10 pct previously. Reuter 

mln-dlr 20-year loan assist Pakistan project design improve plant efficiency. Noting shortage constrains Pakistan's economic development Bank objective project provide 200 megawatt additional generate capacity. Another objective improve efficiency hydrocarbon Pakistan's Water Power Development Authority (WAPDA) production said. One effect reduce atmospheric pollution. Reuter 

Shr loss six ct v loss 84 ct Net loss 219632 v loss 16.3 mln Revs 1.4 mln v 2.8 mln NOTE:1985 net include 15.5 mln dlrs writedowns tax benefit 51294. Reuter 

Valex Petroleum Inc 1.3 mln dlrs long-term debt commercial bank reclassify current liability result auditor give qualify opinion. Earlier Valex report net loss 219632 1986. Reuter 

Data Architects inc intend offering 850000 share common stock 672000 share sell company 178000 shareholders. Proceeds corporate purposes. Reuter 

Terrapet Energy Corp> five director resign obtain director officer liability insurance. It director Dean R. Fellows Frederick B. Hegi Jr W.D. Masterson Thomas Sturgess John C. Thomas. Reuter 

Goldman Sachs Co respond indictment earlier Robert M. Freeman remains risk arbitrage unit believe 44-year-old executive violate insider trading laws. "Based continue believe believe act illegally" company statement. Freeman indicate federal grand jury top Wall Street executive Richard Wigton Timothy Tabor allegedly swap insider information scheme produce million illegal profits. The company base belief Freeman's innocence investigation conduct independent outside counsel Freeman arrest February. Reuter 

The World Bank approve 25 mln dlr structural adjustment loan Mauritius aid country's industrial sector. The Bank 17-year loan support policy reform design increase efficiency country's manufacturing sector develop export enterprise encourage efficient resources. It add "The increase availability foreign exchange import expect expansion industrial output exports." Reuter 

Toronto's financial district heart Canada slow near halt afternoon struck blackout utility official said. The blackout occur 1515 EDT eight-square-block section city's downtown core city's skyscraper contain headquarters Canada's major corporation financial institutions. Ontario Hydro spokeswoman Christina Warren told Reuters blackout occur transformer cable routine maintenance downtown hydroelectricity station. Power restore 10 minutes. The loss halt floor trading 15 minute Toronto Stock Exchange Canada's large equity market computerize trading - accounting 20 cent Exchange's normal volume - continued Toronto Stock Exchange official John Kolosky said. Bank operation affected. The headquarters major office Canada's six major bank line section Bay Street Wall Street Canada. Bank Montreal spokesman Brian Smith told Reuters blackout shut electronic banking machine cause minor slowdown money trading operation "all seriously affected." Officials various downtown skyscraper blackout briefly shut elevator disrupt downtown core's extensive network underground shopping malls. Workers building briefly trap elevator police firefighter report serious problems. Reuter 

The Administration's 15 billion dlr plan recapitalize Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corporation need ensure future profitablity U.S. thrift industry accord top industry regulator. "Today thrift overwhelm number profitable" Shannon Fairbanks executive chief staff Federal Home Loan Bank Board told thrift industry conference. "But thrift pay market tax inabliity regulator deal problem carry forward past" refer premium thrift pay marketplace entice deposit banks. "The industry want five billion dlr plan pass wait happens" Fairbanks said. "They're say 'we don't pay away.' The argument it's drain industry." "But dollar paid recapture reduction market tax differential" said. "The cost recapitalization industry recapture bottom line profitability." Fairbanks public's confidence thrift instititutions erode financial difficulty saving loan association Ohio Maryland 1985. As thrift institution economically distressed area Texas continued fall hard time increase depositors' demand high premium deposit saving loan compare premium paid deposit commercial bank said. Before 1983 thrift institution paid 25 basis yield differential saving deposit offer commercial bank mandate U.S. financial regulations. With elimination 1983 regulation drawn strict line saving loan commercial bank gap widen 50 75 basis point wary depositor demand high premium fund thrift institution Fairbanks said. "The market tax paid today's thrift industry significant impediment future profits" said. Depositor confidence erode existence thrift fail manage stay pay deposit rate above prevail market rates. Presently FHLBB cannot afford close fail institiutions "because can't afford current FSLIC fund" said. Fairbanks estimate market tax differential paid thrift drop 10 20 basis point adequate recapitalization FSLIC restore lose confidence. Reuter 

New Zealand's trading bank seasonally adjust deposit growth rise 2.1 pct February compare 2.6 pct rise January Reserve Bank said. Year-on-year total deposit rise 28.9 pct compare 30.6 pct rise January 34.4 pct rise February ago period bank weekly statistical release. Total deposit rise 17.55 billion N.Z. Dlrs February compare 17.18 billion January 13.61 billion February 1986. Reuter 

The Senate approve 433 mln dlr bill aid thousand homeless sleep street country. The legislation approve 85 12 vote reconcile similar House-passed bill differ details. The bill pass Senate leader manage 68 29 vote break filibuster block final action. The filibuster lead Republican Senator Gordon Humphrey New Hampshire try force amendment reverse 12100 dlr pay raise Congress approve earlier boost lawmakers' salary 89500 dlrs annually. Reuter 

The International Development Association approve 18.6 mln dlr credit Sri Lanka country strengthen agricultural research development. IDA World Bank arm make free loan poorest nation credit support change design raise farm income boost production develop crop variety improve farm systems. It goal accomplish establishment Council Agricultural Research formulate institute agricultural research strategy. Reuter 

The dollar open record Tokyo low 143.75 yen despite aggressive Bank Japan intervention dealer said. The previous record low 144.70 yen March 30. The opening compare 143.90/144.00 yen close New York. The central bank bought dollar Tokyo broker market opening dealer said. The intervention dollar fell 143.20 yen dealer said. The dollar open 1.8155/60 mark 1.8187/97 New York. The dollar fell low 142.90 yen despite central bank intervention 143.00 yen dealer said. Selling pressure strong security house institutional investor hectic nervous trading underlie bearish sentiment dollar said. Most dealer surpised dollar's sharp fall yen New York expect drop happen eventually. Institutional investor expect sell dollar aggressively rise 143.50 yen dealer said. The U.S. Currency steady above 143.00 yen Bank Japan intervention scatter short-covering said. The dollar open 1.5120/30 Swiss franc 1.5085/00 New York close. Sterling start 1.6190/00 dlrs 1.6195/05. REUTER 

The dollar fell below 143 yen hectic Tokyo trading despite aggressive Bank Japan intervention dealer said. After opening Tokyo low 143.75 yen dollar fell low 142.90 yen heavy sell lead security firm institutional investor said. REUTER 

Share price plunge trade opening foreign exchange record low 143.75 yen dollar weak stockmarket New York wither investors' confidence broker said. After 32 minutes' trade average plummetted 313.00 22609.20. Yesterday market gain 9.21 record close. Brokers dollar's fall yen prompt selloff export-related shares. But fear spread throughout market depress issues. REUTER 

The Argentine grain market quiet week Wednesday price rise slightly increase wheat millet birdseed. Wheat domestic consumption rise six Australs tonne 118. For export rise eight 108 tonne Bahia Blanca increase 0.50 104 Necochea unchanged Rosario 108.30. Maize increase 90 tonne Buenos Aires unchanged 82 Bahia Blanca increase 0.50 85 Necochea fell 88 Parana River ports. Sorghum Bahia Blanca increase 0.50 Australs 76.50 tonne drop 75 Rosario. It quote 75 Villa Constitucion San Nicolas Puerto Alvear. Oats unchanged 168 tonne Buenos Aires. Millet Buenos Aires Rosario rise five tonne 140 birdseed rise 15 205 Buenos Aires. REUTER 

Today's turmoil U.S. Financial market bond stock price tumble dollar's wake evidence major shift investor psychology likely spell turbulence ahead economist said. For market hail dollar's decline cure-all U.S. Trade deficit. Interest rate fell sharply Wall Street become one-way street up. But confidence crack financial market suddenly believe Fed chairman Paul Volcker's often-repeated warning risk dollar collapse. "Volcker's say dollar freefall extremely dangerous - he's it" David Jones economist Aubrey G. Lanston Co Inc. The dollar fell below 144 yen 40 Group Seven finance minister Washington fail convince foreign exchange market credible strategy redress global trade imbalance short far depreciation dollar. Bonds suffer big one-day drop month amid worry dollar's slide rekindle inflation scare foreign investor force Fed tighten credit. The inflationary fear boost gold bullion 12 dlrs 1987 432.20/70 dlrs ounce spike rate pull Dow Jones Industrial Average 33 point 2339. Norman Robertson Mellon Bank chief economist call markets' instability frightening. He believe economic fundamental justify bearishness "once start ball roll it's difficult stop." "There's stark possibility destabilize drop dollar force rate drive recession. The market panic." Stephen Marris Institute International Economics Washington warn control decline dollar peak 3.47 mark 264 yen February 1985 turn nightmare. "We're track hard landing... But agony fairly drawn out" Marris told Reuters. Marris expect crisis peak warn situation fragile little touch call phase hard land whereby loss confidence dollar push rate lead recession. The stock market's reaction sharp drop March 30 show loss confidence about. The happen yet consistent historical experience teach domestic market affected currency final stage decline Marris said. He forecast drop 125 yen. Marris major impetus dollar's late weakness loss credibility central bank suffer fail prevent dollar fall below 150 yen floor market believe G-7 Paris agreement February. Robertson Mellon contrast loss confidence trigger week Washington announce plan slap 300 mln dlrs tariff Japanese electronic import raise specter debilitate trade war. Many economist believe long-run stability return market root cause trade gap address - excessive consumption U.S. Reflected massive budget deficit. But short term failure G-7 central bank intervention feel Fed choice tighten credit restore faith dollar. "The stop dollar fall substantial increase discount rate correspond cut abroad Japan" Lanston's Jones. Marris expect Fed act quickly raise rate risk increase debt burden American farmer Latin American government others. But Robert Giordano chief economist Goldman Sachs Co scoffed notion. "It's ridiculous Federal Reserve raise rate dollar weak currency. This yen strength dollar weakness" said. Giordano market ignore progress reduce U.S. Budget deficit. "We're big reduction budget deficit relative GNP history nobody cares" note deficit cut 1968-69 greater. He expect dollar collapse think rate likely fall year. But market psychology change abruptly far drop bond market cannot rule out. "Put helmets" Giordano said. REUTER 

Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa expect hold press conference return Washington ministry spokesman told Reuters. Miyazawa schedule arrive 4.15 P.M. (0715 GMT) Tokyo. The early press conference 6.30 P.M. (0930 GMT). The minister attend meeting Group Seven (G-7) international monetary conference Washington. The G-7 -- Britain Canada France Italy Japan U.S. And West Germany -- reaffirm current exchange rate line economic fundamentals. REUTER 

Average rate yen certificate deposit (CD) fell 4.13 pct week end April 8 4.33 pct previous week Bank Japan said. New rate (previous brackets) - Average CD rate bank 4.13 pct (4.33) Money Market Certificate (MMC) ceiling rate week start April 13 - 3.38 pct (3.58) Average CD rate city trust long-term bank - Less 60 day 4.15 pct (4.41) 60-90 day 4.14 pct (4.29) Average CD rate city trust long-term bank - 90-120 day 4.12 pct (4.25) 120-150 day 4.12 pct (4.23) 150-180 day unquoted (4.03) 180-270 day 4.05 pct (4.05) Over 270 day 4.05 pct (unqtd) Average yen banker acceptance rate city trust long-term bank - 30 60 day 3.98 pct (4.20) 60-90 day 4.03 pct (3.97) 90-120 day unquoted (unqtd) REUTER 

Bank Japan source bank plan cut discount rate. They told reporter pressure Japan Group Seven (G-7) meeting yesterday low discount rate. They add themselves feel cut all. Chancellor Exchequer Nigel Lawson told reporter earlier country - strong currency - cut rates. The Bank Japan source soon call G-7 pact failure. The central bank source comment dollar's renew tumble New York Tokyo spark remark U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker dollar's fall orderly. They market misinterpret Baker's comment refer dollar's fall Plaza agreement September 1985 long-time span currency's recent movements. They add foreign exchange markest seem seize anything excuse drive dollar other. The Bank Japan source U.S. Is put weight dollar/yen rate term judging market stability currencies. Throughout G-7 meeting Japan point danger arise far dollar fall reduce flow Japanese capital U.S. Hurting U.S. And economy said. In February March Japanese investor reduce purchase U.S. Treasury bond source said. Each country G-7 - Britain Canada France Italy Japan U.S. And West Germany - view currency stability Bank Japan source said. This overall foreign exchange market triangle dollar/yen European currencies/yen dollar/European currencies. At Louvre agreement European country yen weaken currency object yen strengthen said. REUTER 

Union New South Wales government official reach compromise dispute worker compensation avert increase industrial action union source said. But union include building mining worker dissatisfied deal continue strike days. State official government agree revise proposal cut compensation allow slightly high cash benefit injured workers. Under original proposal spark strike industrial action April 7 workers' compensation cut third. Full detail compromise package yet known. The Labour Council affiliate Australian Council Trade Unions (ACTU) threaten paralyse New South Wales unless government modify pending legislation issue. State official sector affected past day government building project railway freight movement cargo handle Sydney's ports. REUTER 

Ecuador due resume limited crude oil output May 8 43 km pipeline neighbour Colombia finish energy ministry spokesman said. Oil output halt March 5 earthquake damage 50 km main pipeline link jungle oilfield Lago Agrio Ecuadorean port Balao Pacific. About 13 km link capable carry 50000 barrel (bpd) built said. Ecuador pumped 245000 250000 bpd earthquake. The link connect Lago Agrio Puerto Colon Colombia start Columbia's pipeline Pacific ocean port Temuco. The government estimate month repair Lago Agrio Balao pipeline return output normal level spokesman said. REUTER 

Sumitomo Corp SUMT.T> Nippon Sharyo Ltd> won joint 54 railway car worth 69.60 mln dlrs California's Los Angeles County Transportation Commission Nippon Sharyo spokesman said. He told Reuters component total 20 pct value articulate rail vehicle U.S.-made delivery due 1989 1990. The car Long Beach Los Angeles service due start May 1989. REUTER 

Thailand export 56652 tonne rice week end April 7 75160 tonne previous week Commerce Ministry said. It government private exporter ship 41607 15045 tonne respectively. Private exporter conclude advance weekly sale 48062 tonne 22086 tonne previous week. Thailand export 1.29 mln tonne rice 1987 1.39 mln tonne ago. It commitment export far 353045 tonne year. REUTER 

The Agriculture Ministry estimate Japan's edible oil demand rise 1.5 pct calendar 1987 1.68 mln tonne 1.65 mln 1986. Domestic consumption rise 1.66 mln tonne 1987 1.64 mln 1986 import rise 77000 tonne 70000 export unchanged 14000. Edible oil supply total 1.75 mln tonne 1987 1.73 mln include domestic output 1.60 mln 1.55 mln. Domestic supply comprise 725000 soybean oil (706000 1986) 638000 rapeseed oil (609000) 235000 origin oil (231000). REUTER 

The French parliament approve substantial increase defence spending modernise country's nuclear conventional forces. The bill provide 474 billion franc defence expenditure five-year period start 32 pct allocate modernise country's nuclear weapon systems. The budget represent six pct annual increase start above 3.5 pct NATO recommends military command. France member NATO belong integrate military command. The budget finance type nuclear weapon military reconnaissance satellite nuclear power aircraft carrier AMX Leclerc tank development chemical weapons. The include fund design nuclear missile submarine M-5 submarine-launched missile. REUTER 

Countries meeting International Monetary Fund (IMF) week look variety way resolve third debt Swiss National Bank president Pierre Languetin said. Languetin meeting Group 10 IMF Interim Committee reach consensus reschedule Mexico's debt kind. The Mexico reschedule finally resolve six month started. Various suggest option break deadlock debtor country creditor said. Languetin recommendation agree list suggestions. One involve individual banking system resolve bank refuse participate reschedulings. It prevent completion Mexican reschedule said. Debt-equity swap expand 'on-lending' bank propose Argentine debt. 'On-lending' allows bank select customer reschedule amounts. Small bank wish reschedule force sign "exit bonds" prohibit lending country said. Languetin none represent view. But add "People try corset." REUTER 

Swiss National Bank President Pierre Languetin wider rate differential dollar strong currency need brake dollar's fall. At news conference Japan West Germany try stimulate economy far expand money supply add "I'm sure desirable monetary policy become expansive. "But useful great differential rates" said. REUTER 

Thirty South African coal miner kill underground explosion colliery east Johannesburg mine owner said. reuter^M 

Pacific Dunlop Ltd one-for-ten bonus issue asset revaluation reserve shareholder register June 15. The bonus involves issue 45 mln share diversified rubber plastic statement. The share rank defer annual dividend 12.5 ct Pacific Dunlop pay August rank pari passu thereafter said. As previously report pay interim dividend half December 31 pending review dividend imputation legislation. REUTER 

Wholly-owned Mobil Corp MOB> unit Mobil Oil Australia Ltd> report 38.63 mln dlr net loss 1986 turnaround 37.25 mln profit 1985. The loss reflect combination strike plus schedule unscheduled refinery shutdown maintenance inventory loss cause government control crude product price Mobil statement. However equity-accounting associates' profit reduce loss 24 mln dlrs 37 mln profit 1985. Mobil confident 1987 return profit built far 1985 company restructuring. REUTER 

Texaco Inc document file Texas appeal court ruling force post bond billion dlrs security 10.53 billion dlr judgment halt credit agreement force company bankruptcy. A hearing schedule Monday Texaco's motion reduce amount bond require Texas law secure 1985 judgment favour Pennzoil Co PZL> dispute acquisition Getty Oil. Pennzoil propose court Texaco secure bond asset value 50 pct bond. It force Texaco bankruptcy. Richard Brinkman Texaco's chief financial officer newly file affidavit company willing 65 mln share Texaco Canada Inc> collateral letter credit loan provide security Pennzoil. The Canadian unit's stock value 1.8 billion dlrs return Texaco earlier week held security federal district court New York Texaco await ruling U.S. Supreme Court. Brinkman estimate Texaco borrow billion dlrs use Canadian subsidiary stock collateral loan. Texaco unwilling pledge stock foreign subsidiary corporation security stock widely trade market value unclear. Brinkman company already lose access billion dlr revolve credit line initial jury verdict Texaco. Texaco able raise work capital sell 700 mln dlrs receivables bank judgment said. The bank earlier week notify Texaco purchase additional receivables company's uncertain status Brinkman said. Four credit agreement 1.15 billion dlrs cut judgment billion dlrs outstanding company unable obtain stay Brinkman said. "Since Supreme Court decision April 6 supplier Texaco notify Texaco dealing review demand cash payment terminate dealing Texaco" said. The Supreme Court overturn low federal court decision cut Texaco's bond billion dlrs say issue consider Texas courts. In separate affidavit Morgan Stanley  Co> Managing Director Donald Brennan Texaco force bankruptcy company force provide Pennzoil security exceed billion dlrs. REUTER 

Japan warn United States retaliatory measure United States imposes plan trade sanction April 17 senior government official said. Shinji Fukukawa Vice Minister International Trade Industry Ministry statement Japan consider measure General Agreement Tariffs Trade action United States imposes 100 pct tariff Japanese export plan week. However Fukukawa Japan ready continue trade talk United States despite failure convince America call threaten tariff day emergency talk end Washington yesterday. Last month President Reagan announce sanction retaliation call Japan's failure honour July 1986 agreement stop dump computer microchip market outside United States market American goods. Fukukawa United States regrettably listen Japan's explanation effort live pact Washington detailed explanation plan impose tariffs. REUTER 

A judge rule question liability 1985 crash Japan Air Lines Boeing 747 kill 520 near Tokyo decide Seattle. But left possibility monetary damage award Japanese court. The ruling King County Superior Court Judge Gary Rittle hearing lawsuit survivor 77 victim seek million dollar compensation. Rittle liability problem settle examine question damage decided. Lawyers airline Seattle-based Boeing Co (BA.N> argue suit handle Japanese court say costly time-consuming hear American court. But lawyer victims' survivor company try evade liability question reduce amount compensation pay. Court official likely trial eight 10 months. A draft report Japanese Transport Ministry investigation team faulty repair 1978 Boeing inadequate inspection ministry inspector contribute cause disaster. The report obtain Reuters week expect month. Boeing probably comment report officially released. REUTER 

Two Utah financial institution Bank Iron County Summit Savings Loan Association fail official spokesman said. The board director Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) approve assumption deposit liability Bank Iron County Parowan Utah Dixie State Bank St George Utah FDIC spokesman said. The bank total asset 20.1 mln dlrs bank Utah fail 59th nationwide. Its office reopen Monday branch Dixie State Bank depositor automatically depositor assume bank. Dixie State Bank assume 19.9 mln dlrs 6300 deposit account purchase fail bank's asset discount 3.575 mln dlrs. The Federal Home Loan Bank Board close Summit Savings Loan Association Park City Utah direct Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corporation (FSLIC) transfer estimate 116.9 mln dlrs insured deposit United Savings Loan Association Ogden Utah FSLIC spokesman said. Summit 120.8 mln dlr institution insolvent spokesman said. The bank board appoint FSLIC conservator association April 14 1986. Summit operate bank board's Management Consignment Program. United Savings 205 mln dlrs asset nine office Utah Idaho. REUTER 

The Kuwait Investment Office (KIO) increase stake Sime Darby Bhd> 63.72 mln share represent 6.88 pct Sime Darby's paid-up capital 60.7 mln share Malayan Banking Bhd MBKM.SI> said. Since November KIO aggressively market buying share Sime Darby major corporation interest insurance property development plantation manufacturing. The share register name Malayan Banking subsidiary Mayban (Nominees) Sdn Bhd KIO beneficial owner. REUTER 

A committee International Monetary Fund (IMF) World Bank protectionist agricultural policy industrial country major cause depressed global commodity prices. The joint Development Committee communique release follow day-long discussion improve environment commodity extremely long-term viability develop countries. The committee criticise slow-down lending debtor nations. Poorer country rely primarily raw commodity sale industrial nation pay debt highly critical protectionist agricultural policy United States Western Europe Japan. "Ministers identify protectionist agricultural policy major cause distortion include depressed commodity price market surplus production budgetary drain" communique said. The communique delayed dispute specific language final statement IMF bank week-long semi-annual meeting lending agencies. Earlier IMF's powerful Interim Committee add voice grow criticism delay commercial bank critically need loan package debt-laden develop countries. The committee welcome exploration procedure financing technique mobilise financial support indebted countries. On Thursday U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker statement policy-making committee commercial bank lending debtor nation disappoint flexibility loan program needed. "Doubts financing clearly undermine resolve carry need reforms" Baker said. The Development Committee join criticism note decline flow capital develop country "has particularly significant flow commercial banks." A bank negotiation bogged detail include financial package Mexico Nigeria Argentina. The bank acknowledge difficult complete deal blame go develop country make sufficient reform credit risks. REUTER 

A sugar mill nation's large employer close door yesterday say run sugar smuggle Miami neighbour Dominican Republic. The closure Haitian American Sugar Company (HASCO) idle 3500 employee affect 30000 40000 sugar cane planter region capital company said. "Because unprecedented ever-growing smuggle HASCO regret ... It cannot continue accept delivery sugar cane April 10" mill warn planter earlier week. Since President Jean-Claude Duvalier flee Haiti fourteen month ago widescale smuggle basic good cooking oil flour rice sugar can milk lower consumer price bankrupt local manufacturer throw hundred thousand Haitians work. At HASCO compound grim-faced worker line receive pay Spokesman Georges D. Rigaud show warehouse stock estimate 445000 unsold 100-pound (45-kg) bag sugar. "We closing huge stock unsold sugar. We money left continue operations" Rigaud said. He company owe 7.6 mln dlrs borrow additional 1.5 mln dlrs pay workers. Rigaud blame mill's problem Duvalier ago forbid HASCO refining sugar. He government import refine sugar market price resell huge profit provisional military-civilian government replace Duvalier continued policy. "But smuggle can't compete smuggle Dominican refine sugar" Rigaud said. HASCO worker earn 4.20 dlrs daily considerably above usual minimum wage dlrs. It generally estimate employ Haitian support six people. Rigaud HASCO's closing minimum affect 280000 300000 people. Laid-off worker bitter closure. "We're dead it's government that's cause die" declare Lucien Felix 34 five dependents. REUTER 

Taiwan announce plan round import tariff cut 862 foreign good shortly trade talk Washington official described move balance trade United States. Wang Der-Hwa Deputy Director Finance Ministry's Customs Administration Department told reporter list product include 60 item Washington. "The move government effort encourage import trading partner particularly United States" said. He ministry sent proposal cabinet tariff product cosmetic bicycle apple radio garment soybean television set cut five 50 pct. The cabinet expect approval Thursday tariff cut implement possibly start April 20 added. Taiwan introduce sweep tariff cut 1700 foreign product January aim help reduce grow trade surplus United States island's large trading partner. Washington satisfied cut press reduction cut huge trade deficit Taipei. Washington's deficit Taipei rise record 13.6 billion U.S. Dlrs 10.2 billion 1985. It widen 3.61 billion quarter 1987 2.78 billion earlier Taiwan's official figure show. Today's announcement departure 15-member Taiwan delegation Washington series trade talk U.S. Officials. The delegation's leader Vincent Siew told reporter leave "a heavy heart" meaning tough talk Washington rise protectionist sentiment U.S. Congress. Taiwan's 1986 trade surplus Washington third large Japan Canada. Siew talk start April 14 cover U.S. Calls Taiwan market American product purchase major U.S. Machinery plant equipment import tariff cut protection intellectual property. "I be afraid talk U.S." elaborating. REUTER 

A British minister Japanese government clear warn sanction Japanese company Tokyo allow access internal market "and clearly understood." Corporate Affairs Minister Michael Howard return visit Japan Japanese begin appreciate "fair open" access markets. At airport news conference Howard deny opposition charge trip failure return empty-handed. "I I do. I sent deliver clear message Japanese government I deliver clearly clearly understood." Howard Financial Services Act govenment considerable flexibility take sanction Japanese company finance house operating Britain. "It simply question withdraw refuse operating licences. We ban firm country carry kind allow carry kinds." "I hope don't power I clear Japan timetable isn't met shall them." He unfortunate Britain Japan become involve tit-for-tat exchange add Japan gain anyone else trading relationship. "I begin appreciate relationship continue fair access markets." On question British firm Cable Wireless Plc CAWL.L> try win significant share telecommunication contract Japan Howard told Japanese widely regard test case. He sign movement case. Cable Wireless due talk Japan Tuesday said. Earlier week British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher Britain alone sanction Japan coordinate action European Community partners. Community source meeting trade official yesterday impose steep tariff range Japanese good prevent diversion United States market Washington imposes trade sanction Tokyo threatened. REUTER 

The yield 30-day Bankers Security Deposit Accounts issue week Saudi Arabian Monetary Agency (SAMA) rise 1/8 5.95913 pct 5.79348 week ago banker said. SAMA decrease offer price 900 mln riyal issue 99.50586 99.51953 Saturday. Like-dated interbank deposit quote 6-3/8 1/8 pct -- 1/8 high Saturday. SAMA offer total 1.9 billion riyal 30 91 180-day paper bank kingdom week. REUTER 

Uganda's Coffee Marketing Board (CMB) stop offering coffee international market unhappy current price coffee trade source said. The board suspend offering week urgent cash immediately clear sustain source added. Hundreds Ugandan coffee farmer processor wait month payment CMB trouble find railway wagon move coffee Kenyan port Mombasa. Foreign bank contribute cash crisis hold remittance Uganda's hard currency earnings coffee export government newspaper New Vision said. The bank hold seven mln dlrs coffee money President Yoweri Museveni think impose penalty delay added. Banking source third factor crisis commercial bank lent board 77 billion shilling -- equivalent 55 mln dlrs -- crop finance current coffee government 100 billion. The CMB 455000 60-kg bag coffee 15 pct annual production stockpile Kampala await shipment. The crop account 90 pct Uganda's export earnings recent slide price four-year low likely offset expect increase production. CMB official forecast government restore law grow area Uganda produce mln bag coffee end September 30 25 pct 1985/6. REUTER 

The West German cocoa grind rise 2.9 pct 55190 tonne quarter 1987 53643 tonne quarter 1986 Bonn-based Confectionery Industry Association statement. REUTER TAW 

A prolong dry spell damage 111350 hectare rice corn plantation 10 province central southern Philippines agriculture official said. They 71070 tonne agricultural produce estimate 250 mln peso lose lack rainfall. They warn severe drought prevail condition continued month. Agriculture Secretary Carlos Dominguez hop loss offset expect increase output normally productive area affected dry spell. Affected 14030 hectare palay (unmilled rice) represent production loss 22250 tonne value 77.8 mln peso Department Agriculture report said. About 48820 tonne corn 97320 hectare value 170.8 mln peso lose said. Officials hectarage plant palay hit drought account pct total damage consider negligible. In corn loss fill production non-traditional corn farm diversified cash crop sugar ago. The Philippine Coconut Authority coconut production major produce region Bicol drop 25 pct 320000 tonne dry spell continued. There report actual damage. REUTER 

Spain's register unemployment fell 10465 2.97 mln 21.4 pct workforce March Labour Ministry figure show. Registered unemployment February 2.98 mln 21.5 pct workforce. The figure nonetheless high March 1986 -- 2.8 mln 21 pct workforce. REUTER 

Mitsubishi Electric Corp MIET.T> near agreement Unisys Corp UIS> U.S. To supply central processing unit medium-sized Unisys mainframe computer plan succeed System 80. A Mitsubishi Electric official decline processor involve plan market Unisys computer Japan. REUTER 

Canon Inc CANN.T> Intel Corp INTC> U.S. Agreed joint development production import scale integrate circuit Canon spokesman said. He told Reuters Intel chip Canon import photocopier printer facsimile sell Japan. Canon week similar pact National Semiconductor Corp NSM> plan raise ratio microchip import 28 pct 24 pct advantage yen's rise quell mount trade friction said. REUTER 

Hungary announce sharp price increase range food consumer product effort curb soar budget deficit. The official MTI news agency government decide consumer price subsidy cut reduce spending. From price meat rise average 18 pct beer spirit 10 pct MTI said. MTI consumer good expensive price refrigerator rise five pct. It announce measure ease hardship include high pension allowances. Statistics indicate budget deficit triple 1986 47 billion forints. Central banker Janos Fekete Finance Ministry try cut 1987 shortfall 30 35 billion plan 43.8 billion. A major tax reform include introduction Western-style value add tax plan January 1988 effort cure problem spending. But diplomat late announcement show authority force act quickly keep year's deficit control. The measure aim cool overheat economy dampen Hungarians' appetite import Western good consume increasingly expensive hard currency diplomat said. The diplomat expect unrest follow sharp price rise East Bloc notably Poland. REUTER 

Tokyo's stockmarket index plunge sharply start afternoon trade investor profit week's straight record close broker said. The market index fell 427.48 point 22789.11 13 minute afternoon trading 13:30 local time. Brokers concern weekend announcement mount trade tension Europe U.S. Sparked heavy selloff. The average risen 630.48 point trading session week. REUTER 

China negotiate Pakistan buy 5000 tonne cotton import amount barter agreement Chinese consulate source said. Chinese ambassador Tian Ding told meeting Pakistani industrialist Thursday China intend increase import Pakistan reduce trade imbalance. Pakistani official estimate country's cotton output current crop record 7.6 mln bale (375 pound each). Last year's output total 7.2 mln bale domestic consumption below mln bale said. REUTER 

The government announce harsh cut spending May 14 economic statement adequate response Australia's economic problem ANZ Banking Group Ltd ANZA.S> said. Cuts billion dlrs insufficient backdrop 12 billion dlr government deficit 14 billion dlr current account deficit monthly Business Indicators publication. "For past government struggle economic reality demand measure beyond see politically practicable" said. The political climate meant continued over-reliance monetary policy hold exchange rate maintain confidence economic management ANZ said. "The cost approach much-needed revival investment far postponed" said. The economy modest growth upswing boost export import-replacement industry create false suggestion bad adjustment balance payment crisis past. "Unfortunately successful adjustment Australia's deep-seated economic problem remains long-term process" said. In economic forecast ANZ expect moderate overall economic growth gross domestic product (GDP) rise 2.7 pct 2.4 pct 1988. The current account deficit narrow five pct GDP 4.3 pct 1988 net foreign debt grow strongly 81 billion 1986 97.2 billion end-1987 110.3 billion later. Inflation fall 8.5 pct 1987 7.5 pct 1988 8.9 pct 1986 far fall real wage expect ANZ said. REUTER 

Bell Resources Ltd BLLA.S> raise 50.8 mln dlrs issue 135.6 mln warrant 37.5 cent entitle holder share BHP Gold Mines Ltd BHPG.ME> 1.60 dlrs December 15 1987. The non-renounceable entitlement basis one-for-three holder Bell Resources fully-paid share convertible preference share register May 6 company statement. Other ratio one-for-five partly paid Series A share one-for-eight partly-paid Series B C share one-for-10 1987 options. Bell security similar concept warrant share BHP Gold Mine's parent company The Broken Hill Pty Co Ltd BRKN.ME> (BHP) launch Bell ago. BHP currently float BHP Gold Mines vehicle gold interest Australia countries. The Bell Group Ltd entitlement BHP Gold Mines warrant company chairman Robert Holmes Court Bell said. The warrant list stockbroker McCaughan Dyson Co Ltd underwriting issue. REUTER 

The Electrolytic Refining Smelting Co Australia Pty Ltd lower ex-works Port Kembla Refinery Copper Price 20 dlrs 2160 dlrs tonne effective today. REUTER 

The Bank Japan actively bought dollar afternoon trade 142.20 yen dealer said. The central bank place buy order level prevent dollar fall heavy sell pressure investment trust trading house said. However intervention fail boost U.S. Currency significantly 142.20 yen level added. The dollar trading midday rate 142.30 yen. It open 141.85 yen. REUTER 

Texaco Inc TX> decision file protection Chapter 11 U.S. Bankruptcy code affect majority businesses. It subsidiary account 96 pct 32.6 billion dlrs revenue 79 pct net property plant equipment free action. Only parent hold company Texaco Inc operating subsidiary Texaco Capital Inc Texaco Capital N.V affected said. But company likely suspend 75 cent share quarterly common stock dividend halt repayment debt 6.8 billion dlrs. Texaco file Chaper 11 supplier demand cash payment bank withholding loan result legal dispute Pennzoil Co PZL>. Texaco fight Texas law require post bond 10 billion dlrs appeal 1985 judgment rule illegally interfere Pennzoil's 1984 acquisition Getty Petroleum Corp GTY>. The bond match damage award Texaco. Should Texaco fail bond Pennzoil begin attach asset secure judgment. Last Monday Supreme Court overturn decision cut Texaco's bond billion dlrs sent issue Texas courts. Analysts bankruptcy filing effectively froze Texaco's obligation continued appeal merit Pennzoil lawsuit. "Attempts week win compromise bond issue large dispute failed" James Kinnear Texaco's president chief executive officer told reporters. Kinnear Pennzoil's disclosure court paper Friday want extend bond issue hearing April push Texaco far towards Chapter 11. Pennzoil Texaco post 5.6 billion dlr cash bond reduce dividend 50 pct earnings. Pennzoil want assurance Texaco sell asset Kinnear said. Texaco offer billion dlrs letter credit agree value asset fall 11.1 billion dlrs added. Joseph Jamail Houston attorney Pennzoil company late settlement offer Texaco Saturday take surprise Texaco file bankruptcy. He decline reveal amount proposal cite confidentiality agreement companies. "Texaco told instead chose bankruptcy court" Jamail said. Attorneys Pennzoil believe company prevail court appeal add Texaco's asset ample ultimately pay Pennzoil judgment full. REUTER 

The United Auto Workers union (UAW) vowed fight wage job cut round labour talk start July cover nearly 500000 worker General Motors Corp GM> Ford Motor Co F>. "The UAW doesn't pick fight don't run they're force ... We peace peace come price" union president Owen Bieber said. "And it's UAW ready it" address 3000 union leader start four-day special convention. He Detroit carmaker back America increase import cost U.S. Jobs. He union ready strike "job income guarantees" ban shift production foreign non-union source increase pay profit-sharing. GM pressure decline sale profit year's talk difficult want limit wage rise shed parts-manufacturing operation consider uncompetitive. Contracts company expire midnight September 14. REUTER 

Finance Minister Roger Douglas eight bond tender 250 mln dlrs plan end March 1988. Douglas statement June quarter borrowing include May tender 250 mln dlr tender held June 11. Overfunding 1986/87 remove May tender said. Preliminary estimate net sector injection 1987/88 2.1 billion dlrs. The fiscal deficit 1987/88 forecast 2.2 billion dlrs compare forecast 2.45 billion 1986/87 1.87 billion earlier. However Douglas 1987/88 estimate subject uncertainty result pre-budget spending review tax forecast effect "corporatising" government department liquidity. Douglas whatever outcome influence net sector injection continue fully fund fiscal basis. REUTER 

U.S. roasting green coffee week end April 4 275000 (60-kilo) bag include soluble production compare 215000 bag correspond week 320000 bag week end March 28 George Gordon Paton Co Inc reported. It cumulative roasting calendar 1987 total 4440000 bag compare 4540000 bag year. Reuter 

Australian share market close record level seventh consecutive session strong overseas gold stock push market high broker said. They heavy trading gold stock London Friday provide impetus local market. At close trading ordinary index 11.6 point high above Friday's previous record close 1799.0 gold index risen 176.8 point 5.2 pct record 3562.1. The resource index add 23.9 point 1164.3 industrials index drop 4.8 point 2631.9. National turnover 228 mln share worth 525 mln dlrs rise outnumber fall three. Western Mining continued run jumping 1.04 dlrs record 10.30. Poseidon gain 3.00 16.00 Sons Gwalia 90 cent 16.50 Kidston 50 9.00. Placer Pacific rise 25 cent 3.95 dlrs Elders Resources 17 3.20 CRA 36 8.70 MIM 19 3.35. Market turnover boost substantially inclusion 180 mln dlrs Australian Consolidated Minerals share understood represent sale Western Mining's hold broker said. ACM share finish 30 cent 8.40 dlrs. Resources leader BHP close 15 11.40 quiet trading Bell Resources rise eight 5.70. Elders IXL lose 10 4.75. With investor concentrate mining stock industrial stock seat. TNT drop 10 cent 4.75 dlrs News Corp recover steady 23.00 day. ANZ Bank drop 10 5.60 National 5.46. In oil gas sector Santos drop 26 5.00 Bridge eight 1.40 Genoa gain 25 3.05. June share price index future stag late rally finish 24.0 point high 1824.0. REUTER 

Western Mining Corp Holdings Ltd WMNG.S> (WMC) sell entire hold 22.13 mln share gold mining company Australian Consolidated Minerals Ltd> (ACM). WMC give detail stockbroker sale eight dlrs share Friday U.S. European Australian investor WMC's usual brokers. The company purchase 19.9 pct parcel March Amax Inc AMX.N> 6.32 dlrs share ahead one-for-three bonus issue Amax sell entire 47 pct stake ACM local companies. REUTER 

National Bank economic data 1986 show Yugoslavia's trade deficit grow inflation rate rise wage sharply high money supply expand value dinar fell. The trade deficit 1986 2.012 billion dlrs 25.7 pct high 1985. The trend continued month export drop 17.8 pct hard currency term 2.124 billion dlrs. Yugoslavia start quote trade figure dinar base current exchange rate instead dollar base fix exchange rate 264.53 dinar dollar. Yugoslavia's balance payment surplus convertible currency fell 245 mln dlrs 1986 344 mln 1985. The National Bank drop due deterioration trade. Exports convertible currency rise 11.6 pct 1985 import rise 17.8 pct. Retail price rise average 88.1 pct 1986 industrial producer price rise 70.6 pct bank's data showed. The cost living rise 89.1 pct. Personal income rise 109 pct 1986. Prime Minister Branko Mikulic warn February wage level productivity. Mikulic introduce law cut wage level quarter 1986 tie future rise productivity. Bank statistic show overall 1986 rise M-1 money supply 109.1 pct year-end position 3895.9 billion dinars. Yugoslavs 9.8 billion dlrs worth foreign currency saving country 20 billion dlrs abroad mostly own worker employ western Europe. The dinar fell 73.1 pct basket hard currency 1986. The high depreciation Swiss franc 85.3 pct low U.S. Dollar 46.2 pct. REUTER 

Australia New Zealand Banking Group Ltd ANZA.S> one-for-two bonus issue asset revaluation reserve shareholder register June 2. The propose bonus increase authorise capital billion one-dlr par share 600 mln shareholder approval extraordinary meeting May 26 ANZ statement. The issue absorb 230 mln dlrs 260.9 mln stand asset revaluation reserve said. The bank lower dividend rate expect maintain value dividend payout enlarge capital level full end September 30. The paid 31 cent share 133.1 mln dlrs year. Shareholders approve change bank's article association allow offer share lieu interim dividend discount five pct market price. The late announce tax-free bonus issue ahead dividend imputation effective July 1. REUTER 

Yields certificate deposit (CD) offer United Arab Emirates Central Bank high Monday's offering bank said. The one-month CD rise 1/4 6-3/8 pct six-month maturity rise 5/16 6-7/16 6-1/2 6-5/8 pct respectively. REUTER 

A tourist hotel Suzhou Jiangsu province raise 21 mln U.S. Dlr loan cover construction cost lead manager DnC Ltd> said. The loan Suzhou Aster Hotel mature 10 guaranteed provincial investment arm Jiangsu International Trust Investment Corp>. The term revealed. The loan sign month provide bank club basis. The hotel developed contractual joint venture basis unnamed Hong Kong Chinese investor Suzhou municipal entities. REUTER 

China's large sulphur-iron mine start trial production Yunfu southern province Guangdong China Daily said. It mine annual output capacity mln tonne sulphur-iron ore processing quality. REUTER 

China's state-owned Beijing Non-Ferrous Metals Industrial Corp Wrought Copper Ltd> Chile sign contract jointly build copper tube plant outskirt Peking China Daily said. The Beijing-Santiago Copper Tube Co involves investment 9.93 mln dlrs completion production capacity 5000 tonne copper tube said. It Chile supply copper preferential rate venture whose equipment come Wednesbury Tube Co> U.K. The agreement call joint Sino-Chilean management venture 15 paper said. It venture economic cooperation project China Chile give details. China major copper importer. Customs figure show import 171118 tonne copper alloy calendar 1986 355652 tonne 1985. REUTER 

The Scandinavian Airlines System>'s SAS International Hotels unit Skanska AB SKBS.ST> Sweden raise 37 mln U.S. Dlr loan joint venture hotel China loan lead manager DnC Ltd said. It loan finance cost 46 mln dlr SAS Grand Hotel Beijing Chinese capital. The lead manager DnC's parent company Den norske Creditbank Scandinavian Far East Ltd parent Skandinaviska Enskilda Banken. Terms loan finalise syndication expect begin month DnC Ltd said. The recipient loan SAS Grand Hotel Beijing Joint Venture Co Ltd own 50 pct China International Exhibition Centre 50 pct Swedish firms. Skanska responsible construction SAS International Hotels management hotel International Exhibition Centre complex. Construction 400-room hotel start loan signed. It due open late 1989. REUTER 

Singapore's external trade grow 8.8 pct quarter 1987 12.4 pct decline period pct growth previous quarter Trade Development Board said. It export period rise 8.7 pct 12.38 billion dlrs import 8.9 pct 14.64 billion trade deficit 2.26 billion 2.06 billion deficit 1986 period 1.78 billion deficit previously. The growth attribute strength non-oil trade especially computer computer part electronic component garment said. REUTER 

Malaysia's manufacturing export rise 24.5 pct 15.1 billion ringgit 1986 chairman Export Promotion Council Ahmad Sarji Abdul Hamind said. The improve export performance lead electrical electronic product textile footwear clothing process food timber chemical rubber product told news conference. However total gross export decline 5.6 pct 35.9 billion ringgit 38 billion 1985 due fall major commodity export weak price said. REUTER 

Rates five billion peso worth Philippine Treasury bill ease slightly Friday's auction tender total 13.94 billion Central Bank said. It 1.3 billion peso 91-day bill average 11.249 pct 11.743 pct previous week 1.6 billion 182-day bill average 12.473 pct 12.847 pct 2.1 billion 364-day bill average 14.029 pct 14.233. The bank auction week Easter holiday. It T-bills three-year T-note auction total 61.1 billion peso quarter 1987. REUTER 

West Germany's capital market liberalization stall banker worried far reform completed. Liberalization underway May 1985 foreign bank receive Bundesbank permission lead-manage mark eurobonds. Further move include introduction mark-denominated certificate deposit year. But change include revision domestic option market introduction future contract lengthy statutory change banker dealer say. Deutsche Bank AG co-chairman F. Wilhelm Christians call week enlargement current capital market instrument include instrument already standard abroad. He need especially price fall cite decline West German share price month stock index fell 20 pct. Others blunt. Securities dealer lack viable hedge instrument share bond make trading domestic market risky. "We stock index future contract future contract recent government bonds" dealer said. West Germany option contract five pct share bond trade exchange cover 30 pct average trade volume stock market source said. Options write original 14 bond select bond option introduce April. The recent bond list issue 1985. There future exchange West Germany. German bank participate future exchange branch abroad outwardly subject stringent West German rule require contract secure one-by-one basis separate hedge prevent speculation. Another lack liquidity exist market owe lack private investor participation. Private individual corporation engage option trading due West Germany's civil exchange law define loss future option gamble loss investor pay back. Options hurt lack liquidity pension fund currently forbidden invest instruments. But allow enter soon European Community begin harmonize rule govern funds. Manfred Laux secretary West German mutual fund association Frankfurt harmonize rule adopt October 1 1989 latest. The push adopt instrument past owe wide-spread belief speculative give bad name West Germany. But pressure introduction growing. The start-up Swiss future exchange banker consider similar exchange useful West Germany. They innovation drift London Bundesbank vehemently opposes. An official London International Financial Futures Exchange (LIFFE) exchange currently plan introduce mark-denominated contract beyond exist mark-dollar contract. But exchange study feasibility contract include three-month mark rate possibly government bond contract. A Bundesbank capital market expert Bundesbank objection hedge future liberalization sector planning stage earlier talk end ago. Considerations future drawn participant involve talks. They include parliament Bundesbank Federal Banking Supervisory Board eight West German stock exchange govern West German banking associations. Beyond option future change suggest include replace federal government's current bond consortium auction procedure similar consider U.K. And already practice U.S. This upset exist market provide German foreign bank consortium fix quota eliminate misallocations banker presently arise fix consortium quota system. In addition banker method bond trading West German stock exchange change continuous price-setting current bond price fix day. This trading transparent reduce proportion off-floor interbank bond trading 90 pct volume bond transaction banker say. REUTER 

The central bank Bank Negara yield 91-day Malaysian treasury bill rate rise slightly 2.032 pct week's tender 2.020 pct week. Accepted bid range 1.951 2.060 pct compare 1.874 2.048 pct previously. Applications total 440 mln ringgit 100 mln bill offer. The bank offer 100 mln ringgit 91-day bill 150 mln 182-days tender closing April 20. REUTER 

A 3.22 billion dlr offer Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP.MO> TransCanada Pipelines Ltd TRP.TO> short-circuit Dome's restructuring plan takeover bid oil analyst said. Dome try approval plan refinance debt 4.5 billion dlrs July 1 1987 interim debt plan allow Canadian oil gas firm defer substantial payment creditor expire. Analysts TransCanada's bid signal Dome's debtholders alternative exists Dome's debt plan. Dome announce plan 56 major creditor noteholders March month delicate negotiations. TransCanada's proposal "amounts quasi debt restructuring" oil analyst Doug Gowland Brown Baldwin Nisker Ltd Toronto. Calgary-based Dome's restructuring plan allow creditor convert debt common share formula yet negotiated. Payments remain debt link cash flow generate asset pledge debt. "The weakness debt-refinancing proposal approval creditor assurance Dome able repay debt obligations" Wilf Gobert oil analyst Peters Co Ltd Calgary. TransCanada's announcement surprise Dome wait response creditor propose refinance package Gobert said. The TransCanada proposal bidding Dome potential buyer probably wait lender agree restructuring added. "I debtholders entertain offer (for Dome)" Gobert said. Dome spokesman David Annesley New York TransCanada's announcement see attempt fix bidding price Dome effort preclude buyer make offer. "By draw attention discussion mean little reluctant forward" said. Dome consider TransCanada's proposal formal offer pipeline utility's announcement breach confidential agreement company said. Dome respond statement suspend discussion TransCanada pursue talk unidentified parties. However Dome management financial adviser evaluate proposal include TransCanada's. Gowland TransCanada's offer probably fair price company's 36.1 mln acre oil gas land holdings. However financial detail know Dome's debt restructuring compare value TransCanada's propose offer. REUTER 

Prime Ministers Zhao Ziyang China Anibal Cavaco Silva Portugal sign agreement century Portuguese rule territory Macao return Chinese control 1999. Macao special administrative region December 20 1999 retain degree autonomy except foreign affair defence. Its capitalist remain intact 50 arrangement similar return Hong Kong China Britain 1997. China hope win Nationalist-ruled island Taiwan "one country systems" formula. "The successful settlement question Macao proven continue prove concept 'one country systems' realistic therefore definitely viable" Zhao said. Macao's population 300000 include 40000 Portuguese passport holders. Peking Chinese national category able Portuguese passport 1999 entitle Portuguese consular protection Macao elsewhere China. REUTER 

Eurobonds Texaco Inc subsidiary unquoted morning trader assess implication company's shock weekend decision file bankruptcy Chapter 11 U.S. Bankruptcy law eurobond dealer said. The decision file bankruptcy follow court decision post 11 billion dlr bond continue court battle Pennzoil Co PZL>. One trader U.S. Securities "I don't obstructive genuinely market Texaco bond moment. Everyone stun decision (to file bankruptcy) can't really believe it." One dealer note Texaco subsidiary outstanding eurobonds total billion dlrs total borrowing 6.8 billion dlrs. He add fix eurobonds - dollar straight - trading "basis only" prior weekend's news. This mean trader quote price bond bound trade them. Any trade negotiated. He recently appear speculative buying bond U.S. But European investor overall sellers. Dealers note Chapter 11 filing noteholders receive payments. Texaco eurobonds outstanding convertible Texaco Inc common stock - know convertibles. Trading issue either. One convertible dealer "We're wait result today's court hearing." Texaco apply Texas court relief have post court bond. Texaco share indicate counter share dealer 26 28 dlrs compare Friday's close New York 31-7/8 dlrs. Pennzoil share indicate 85 87 dlrs compare Friday's New York finish 92-1/4 dlrs. REUTER 

The Bank England forecast shortage 400 mln stg money market today. Among main factor affect liquidity bill mature official hand take-up treasury bill drain 1.085 billion stg. Partly offset outflow fall note circulation add 340 mln stg exchequer transaction 300 mln bankers' balance above target 50 mln. REUTER 

Bangladesh's cost living index fell 1.09 pct January 479 1.6 pct decline 484.28 December (1973-74 base 100) Bureau Statistics said. The cost living index fell 0.14 pct 434.49 January 1986. In January inflation ran 10.24 pct 11.3 pct rate month earlier 9.72 pct earlier. REUTER 

Deutsche Bank Finance NV Curacao issue 100 mln Australian dlr eurobond due May 14 1990 pay 14-1/8 pct price 101-1/4 pct lead manager Deutsche Bank Capital Markets Ltd said. The bond guaranteed parent Deutsche Bank AG available denomination 1000 10000 dlrs list Luxembourg. Fees total 1-1/2 pct comprise pct sell concession 1/2 pct management underwriting combined. REUTER 

Rothmans Holdings (Tobacco) Ltd> sttement "no foundation" press speculation sell stake Rothmans International Plc ROT.L> Philip Morris Inc MO.N> buy Morris' stake. In 1986 report Rothmans International RHT control Rupert Foundation SA> own 18.25 mln ordinary 64.37 mln B ordinary share 99.9 pct 26.1 pct respectively. Morris own 79.8 mln B ordinary share 32.4 pct. Rothmans B share firm speculation close 273p 241p Friday ease 245.5p 0838 GMT. REUTER 

Japanese Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's unpopular plan introduce sale tax cause electoral setback ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) Sunday's local election political analyst said. The LDP retain 11 prefectural governorship fail restore governorship Fukuoka place importance winning. In prefectural assembly election fill 2670 seat LDP lose 92 previously held 1487 seat socialist communists. Full election result available today. Discussing election result reporter Nakasone "I wouldn't propose five pct sale tax effect factor low turnout unusually cold weather." The Home Affairs Ministry average turnout 13 gubernatorial election record low 59.78 pct prefectural assembly poll drew average 66.66 pct record low. Noboru Goto president Japan Chamber Commerce Industry longtime friend Nakasone told reporter impact sale tax LDP's setback obvious. "The government action (on sale tax) regard people's wishes" Goto said. Nakasone LDP leader already hint delay implementation tax schedule January cut rate. "The parliamentary approval budget soon arrest rapid appreciation yen" Nakasone said. "We implement measure prop economy." Opposition party election referendum tax continue demand retraction. REUTER 

Union Bank Switzerland NV issue 15 billion yen eurobond due June 1 1992 pay 4-3/8 pct price 101-3/8 pct lead manager Union Bank Switzerland (Securities) Ltd said. The issue call option option par guaranteed Union Bank Switzerland. The sell concession pct management underwriting combine pay 5/8 pct. The issue available denomination mln yen list Luxembourg. The payment date June 1. REUTER 

Member European Community start run patience Japan believe repeatedly promise major initiative market import minor moves. Diplomatic source recent action EC country bear witness disillusionment willingness ability Japanese government reduce massive trade surplus EC. However all-out trade EC suffer Japan. Senior EC diplomat give generally favourable reaction EC executive commission proposal EC raise tariff range Japanese product U.S. Carries threat similar move April 17. The EC tariff involve renounce obligation enter trade body GATT design stop diversion export EC market U.S. The diplomat meeting Tokyo announce EC's trade deficit Japan reach record 2.13 billion dlrs March 1.94 billion February. In 1986 Japanese export EC total 30.67 billion dlrs 4.5 pct 1985 EC export Japan fell pct 12.43 billion dlrs. In Paris trade minister Michel Noir France decide Japan taste medicine. Burgeoning import microwave oven frozen Coquilles St Jacques restrict strict application French quality standard -- EC happens export enter Japan. Britain threaten withdraw licence Japanese bank insurance company operate City London British Cable Wireless company lose competition Japanese telecommucations contract. However British official London government go imply immediate drastic action unless contract reopened. By contrast West Germany EC's successful economy threaten Tokyo sanction prefer rely firm diplomacy encouragement industry surmount obstacle export Japan. The EC Commission switch tactic recent substitute call action Japan market specific demand move key areas. At instance pressure Japan allegedly discriminatory taxation import wine spirit ensure EC company chance win contract building international airport simplify certification safety check import cars. EC official tactic yield benefit Japanese announce modification non-tariff barrier import token amount. They stress action take EC stop beggar-my-neighbour action. One problem Britain withdraw licence Japanese bank banker welcome arm Frankfurt Amsterdam out. REUTER 

Morgan Crucible Co Plc MGCR.L> prospect 1987 encourage order sale significantly divisions. It opportunity growth exist recently acquire business growth acquisition related areas. It earlier announce 6.1 mln stg rise pre-tax profit 24.8 mln stg December 28. Turnover rise 242.1 mln 211.5 mln. Most company perform despite slowdown U.S. U.K. And Australian economy half. Currency fluctuation reduce pretax profit mln stg noted. Morgan profit electronics sector improve 1.0 mln stg 100000 stg previously result nonetheless disappointing. Sales low expect due mainly delayed defence order cancellations. However take necessary remedial action obtain proceed delivery major delayed orders. Morgan share firm penny 318p 0905 GMT 316p Friday's close. REUTER 

Year December 28 1986 Shr 20.1p v 17.6p Div 5.0p v 4.6p make 9.2p v 8.5p Turnover 242.1 mln stg v 211.5 mln Pretax profit 24.8 mln v 18.7 mln Tax 6.7 mln v 5.8 mln Operating profit 28.3 mln v 21.3 mln Investment income 1.0 mln v 0.7 mln Net finance charge 4.5 mln v 3.3 mln Company full name Morgan Crucible Co Plc MGCR.L> Minorities provision preference dividend 0.7 mln v 1.2 mln Extraordinary debit - 0.9 mln v 1.3 mln credit Operating profit include - Carbon 8.3 mln v 7.0 mln Technical ceramic 7.0 mln v 5.6 mln Thermal ceramic 7.6 mln v 4.6 mln Speciality chemical 4.4 mln v 4.0 mln Electronics 1.0 mln v 0.1 mln REUTER^M 

Swedish industrial production rise 2.6 pct February 1.8 pct fall January show 4.4 pct rise February 1986 reach high level Central Bureau Statistics said. The rise reflect recovery sector exceptionally cold spell January Bureau add high rise see forest chemical metal industries. REUTER 

Kenya devalue shill 0.6 pct special draw (SDR) response decline dollar week banker said. The Central Bank Kenya shill 20.7449 SDR compare 20.6226 rate force devaluation March 31. The Kenyan shill lose 5.6 pct value SDR series devaluation design keep value dollar above 16 shillings. REUTER 

Australia lose valuable wheat market lack availability planting come 1987/88 season significantly reduce Australian Wheat Board (AWB) chairman Clinton Condon said. "If prediction 30 pct decrease planting prove true Australia able supply wheat valuable markets" statement. Condon prediction AWB spokesman industry feel farmer hard hit low price rise cost cut planting sharply. Wheat sow normally begin May. However Condon believe planting cut 30 pct realise farmer face enormous financial pressures. He AWB expect sown 10.7 mln hectare 11.3 mln 1986/87 crop 16 mln tonnes. Final crop estimate 1986/87 plant intention 1987/88 yet available. If AWB unable short-term cut planting meet need market developed effort difficulty sell wheat market future Condon said. "Markets rely steady supply Australian wheat understand decrease production due drought difficulty understand deliberate decision decrease production" Condon said. "If Australia want wheat continue major export income earner government government authority closely examine way contribute continue viability wheat industry" added. Australia's lead wheat market include China Egypt Iran Iraq Soviet Union Japan. REUTER 

Williams Holdings Plc> receive acceptance offer Norcros Plc NCRO.L> holder 233448 Norcros ordinary share 0.18 pct 180240 preference share 8.19 pct. Before 568 mln stg contest bid launch month Williams held 850000 ordinary share 0.67 pct acquire option buy far 1.99 mln 1.58 pct. The offer extend April 15. Norcros share ease 26p 410p announcement Williams fell 767p 785p. REUTER 

A major animal feed producer Cehave NV Veghel (CHV) begin legal proceeding application European Community grain co-responsibility levy full backing Dutch animal grain feed trade association Het Comite association chief executive Peter Pex told Reuters. Oral proceeding held Hague Friday court verdict six weeks. "However normal word expect Hague court refer question interpretation application levy European Court Justice Luxembourg" Pex added. Het Comite claim levy apply account currency cross-rates exchange mean compounder country pay high levy currency receive chain original producer grain. "We Business Administration Court Hague ask Luxembourg Court Justice whether Dutch Grain Commodity Board levy collection agency interpret levy regulation correctly whether regulation themselves contravene European law" Pex said. "It regret take route political therefore option years" Pex added. Het Comite CHV act test grain levy bill company receive commodity board include grain wide variety origin therefore consider basis legal challenge levy Pex noted. Het Comite's action run tandem question levy already pose Luxembourg Court brought Association European Animal Feed Manufacturers FEFAC. REUTER 

China raise purchase price corn rice cottonseed shell peanut April 1 encourage farmer grow official China Commercial Daily said. The paper price paid corn 14 northern province city region increase yuan 50 kg. A foreign agricultural expert rise price 17 fen jin (0.5 kg) 16 fen. The paper price long-grained rice 10 southern province city raise 1.5 yuan 50 kg. The paper price round-grained rice 11 province region city central east northwest China increase 1.75 yuan 50 kg. It give price details. It local authority inform farmer price increase farmer begin plant encourage production grain oilseeds. Chinese official farmer unwilling grow grain earn crops. REUTER 

West German quarter cocoa grinding rise 2.9 pct 1986 quarter expectation trade source said. They described result announce Saturday normal unspectacular consider grind fourth quarter carry quarter. Grindings rise 55190 tonne 53643 1986 quarter. A spokesman Confectionery Industry Association West German grinding expect stay relatively comparison West European countries. REUTER 

St.Gobain Netherlands guaranteed Cie de St.Gobain issue 75 mln ECU bond gold warrant attach due May 6 1992 carry 4-1/2 pct coupon price par lead manager Salomon Brothers International Ltd said. Fees comprise 1-1/4 pct sell concession 5/8 pct management underwriting combined. Listing Luxembourg. Each 1000 ECU bond carry gold warrant exercisable May 6 1987 May 6 1990 entitle holder purchase ounce exercise price 490 dlrs. REUTER 

The Commonwealth Bank Australia low prime lending rate 17.5 pct 18.25 effective April 15. The bank's rate low Australia's current prime rates. They range 17.75 pct 18.5 recent series reduction late March follow easy trend short term money market rates. Two major trading bank prime rate 18 pct 18.25. The Commonwealth's move revers increase 17.5 pct February. REUTER 

Bond Corp Holdings Ltd BONA.S> plan 1.05 billion dlr acquisition Kerry Packer's television radio holding springboard global medium chairman Alan Bond said. Bond Corp's broadcasting float Bond Media Ltd> gear international expansion company specialise electronic medium told news conference presentation company shareholder analysts. "It's intend global medium company fullness time" Bond said. Bond Media bring together Bond's exist broadcasting interest recently acquire Packer's Consolidated Press Holdings Ltd>. Bond Corp shareholder offer 50 pct company 1.55 dlrs share three-for-four basis. A presentation underwriter A C Goode Co Ltd Rivkin James Capel Ltd forecast Bond Media's net profit 41 mln dlrs 1987/88 end June 30 rise 72 mln 1989/90. REUTER 

Hepworth Ceramic Holdings Plc HEPC.L> agree sell Western Plastics Corp> unit Globe Machine Manufacturing Co> 16.25 mln dlrs cash. Western make polystyrene foam container product net asset 19.3 mln dlrs report 1986 pre-tax profit 0.9 mln. The proceeds sale reduce borrowing develop activity U.K. Hepworth share ease 0.5p announcement 227.5p. REUTER 

U.S. Legislators call Japan financial market foreign participation boost effort grow U.S. Protectionism Foreign Ministry spokesman said. "We seek opening Japan's financial banking markets" Jake Garn rank Republican Senate Banking Committee told Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone. "Japan's financial banking market increasingly sophisticated yet true reciprocity Japan United States market" ministry official quote Garn saying. Nakasone reply problem exist provide seat Tokyo Stock Exchange foreign firm main step urge U.S. Delegation. "But I promise Tokyo's market New York" told Garn legislators. In separate talk Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa U.S. Group urge Japan U.S. Financial institution big role underwriting long-term Japanese government bond Finance Ministry spokesman said. REUTER 

Euro-medium term note recent phenomenon international capital market hardly attract flood issuer investment banker do breath market. Medium term note (MTNs) met stagger success U.S. Market total outstandings grown 50 billion dlrs 1983 hold financing vehicle bridge gap commercial paper longer term bonds. Convinced stay investment banker attempt adapt MTNs euromarket. Ralph Bunche vice president Morgan Stanley International predict recent Euromoney conference MTNs predominant instrument raise fund late 1980's 1990's. "It (the MTN market) surpass bond market" said. Other banker exception degree MTNs grow. But generally agree instrument provide borrower great flexibility low cost traditional bond. The trick convincing European borrower worth arrange have accomplish persaude European investor -- whose preference differ U.S. Counterparts -- buy securities. Discussions banker prove thing. No exactly sure proceed structure marketing issues. To date 13 Euro-MTN program announce activate unit PepsiCo Inc AB Electrolux. Several firm devise structure Euro-MTNs defend structure adamantly. The PepsiCo note example sell continuously offer basis. This involves amount note similar maturity constantly offer current market rates. The Electrolux us multi-tranche tap note devise Merrill Lynch. Under structure initial tranche minimum 50 mln dlrs fix rate maturity. The borrower issue additional note category pre-determined maximum. Those defend continuously offer method Wendy Dietze Salomon Brothers Inc vice president flexibility offer rate maturity. Furthermore believe structure offer European investor great confidence market liquidity -- major concern buyers. Merrill Lynch Europe Ltd's Kevin Regan defends medium-tranche tap note concept say offer comparable liquidity. But structure option borrowers. Peter Mortimer partner law firm Milbank Tweed Hadley McCloy note legal requirement determine structure chosen. He note tap allows clearly define "lock-up" period tranche specific maturity. In note issue U.S. Borrowers "lock-up" period 90 day completion series security cannot sell U.S. Or U.S. Investors. However Securities Exchange Commission review current regulation ownership foreign security U.S. Citizens soften rule distant future. For borrower feel bit guinea pigs. Petter Skouen executive vice president Nordic Investment Bank (NIB) note week ago NIB disappointed Euro-MTN success recent issue change minds. He concede retrospect wiser establish separate program euromarket U.S. Domestic market try extend U.S. Issue globally. Under NIB's 200 mln dlr 100 mln sell U.S. And 25 mln Europe. REUTER 

Bond Corp Holdings Ltd BONA.S> agree acquire 80 pct stake Merlin International Petroleum Corp> Crowley Maritime Corp> 90.8 mln U.S. Dlrs. Of total 7.8 mln dlrs due exchange contract April 30 69 mln July 7 subject regulatory approval obtain Bond statement. The balance 14 mln dlrs paid require Merlin exploration production commitment said. Bond Merlin 6.25 pct work plus 2.5 pct reversionary Papua New Guinea permit PPL-17 site Iagifu oil discovery. Merlin 12.5 pct stake adjacent Papuan Basin permit PPL-18 contains Juha gas condensate discovery. In addition Papua New Guinea Merlin petroleum exploration production interest U.S. Bond added. REUTER 

Kyushu Electric Power Co Inc issue seven-year 20 billion Euroyen bond April 22 company spokesman said. The straight bond price 101.625 carry 4.75 pct coupon yield 4.445 pct. Lead manager Nomura International Inc. Issue cost include fee 4.8 pct 0.9 percentage below March issue rate Japanese electric company bonds. These normally rate 10-year government bond private corporate bonds. REUTER 

Matsushita Electric Industrial Co Ltd MC.T> launch world's small light personal-use plain paper copier (PPC) domestic market June. It 69800 yen copier 367 mm 407 mm 120 mm weighs six kilo copy picture television VCR's optional adaptor. The company plan produce 2000 set month eventually export provide far details. Total Japanese PPC output rise 12 pct 560000 unit 1986 project rise 610000 said. REUTER 

The five lead West German economic research institute fail agree strongly domestic economy expand revise forecast contain report publish six month ago. The research group Kiel Hamburg Essen predict institutes' joint spring report gross product (GNP) rise pct 1987 compare 2.4 pct 1986. The five institute jointly forecast pct 1987 growth October year. Taking dissent view DIW institute West Berlin Munich's Ifo institute predict pct 1987 growth. The joint report estimate economic development DIW Ifo "markedly favourable" three. The DIW Ifo forecast economy pick slow start year. "In half 1987 weak upward movement" said. The institute external economic factor currently damage export push import dominate economic environment throughout year. They export fall real 2-1/2 pct 1987 predict marked improvement course year. The institute wrote: "The decline demand production (seen) winter month indicate begin cyclical downswing." They sharp rise mark lead corporate uncertainty company carry investment plans. But expect investment cancel off. "It presume brake action (on economy) diminish markedly year." They added: "The domestic prerequisite continuation economic uptrend favourable." These institute diminish external burden combine favourable domestic condition meant upturn demand production expect spring. However projection cloud risk include far development mark dollar. Contrary DIW Ifo institute export continue weak economy 1987 "there reason believe export soon bottom slight rise emerge course year." They predict overall 0.5 pct fall export 1987 1986. The positive institute private consumption rise pct 1987 compare 4.2 pct 1986 DIW Ifo predict pct increase. They climate equipment investment improve predict rise pct 1987 4.6 pct 1986. Ifo DIW investment rise pct. All institute predict slight decline unemployment. The Kiel Hamburg Essen institute jobless total average 2.17 mln 1987 compare 2.23 mln 1986 predict rise 200000. These institute job create mainly private service sector context job creation measures. The construction industry likely engage worker 1980 predict either rise employment manufacture good industry slight expansion. The DIW Ifo rise employment occur tertiary sector "the employ manufacturing industry decline." The DIW Ifo unemployment decline 2.20 mln 1987 2.23 mln 1986. They current account surplus fall 1987 58 billion mark 78 billion 1986. The current account surplus 1987 60 billion mark predict trade surplus fall 100 billion mark 112 billion 1986. The institute agree consumer price start rise 1987 decline 1986 five predict average increase 0.5 pct. REUTER 

Blue Arrow Plc> agree term acquire U.S. Companies collectively know Richards Companies> specialise executive recruitment management consultancy personnel matters. The total consideration 29 mln U.S. Dlrs 50 pct payable cash 50 pct issue 1.36 mln ordinary share Blue Arrow. The Richard Companies pre-tax profit 3.6 mln dlrs end-1986 turnover 7.1 mln dlrs net tangible asset 1986 3.4 mln dlrs. Blue Arrow share trading 9p low 670 morning. REUTER 

The State Bank Victoria raise 50 mln Australian dlrs three-year bullet eurobond 14-1/2 pct price 101-3/8 lead sole manager Commerzbank AG said. The bond due May 15 1990 paid date annually. Payment date May 15. Denominations 1000 10000 dlrs listing London. Fees total 1-1/2 pct half-point management underwriting selling. REUTER 

Saudi riyal interbank deposit rate surge across board bank try build position anticipation far rise U.S. Interest rate dealer said. They trader expect riyal deposit follow recent strong rise eurodollar rate spark fear tighter U.S. Monetary policy halt dollar's slide. "There wave panic buying morning try cover gap build riyal positions" dealer. As result riyal deposit strongly bid trader scramble available offers. One-way trade focus mainly fix period short date rise dealer said. Spot-next one-week deposit climbed 6-5/8 1/8 pct 6-3/8 six Sunday. One-month deposit rise 6-1/2 3/8 pct 6-1/4 six three-month deposit climbed 6-3/4 5/8 pct 6-9/16 7/16. Six-month deposit firm 7-1/8 seven pct 7-1/16 6-7/8 Sunday. The spot riyal steady 3.7500/03 dollar quote 3.7498/7503 yesterday. REUTER 

Gold bullion continued move high support buying fix morning 436.50 dlrs 268.368 stg ounce Friday's close 432.00/50 dealer said. The set high October 8 gold built Friday's gain base weakness dollar fear trade United States Japan. It open slightly firmer 433.50/434.00 move steadily morning support commission trade buying dealer said. Dealers resistance 440.00 sentiment firm trader believe rally gold 500 dlrs. Platinum fix morning 583.50 dlrs ounce Friday's close 578.50/580.50 high set October. REUTER 

Borg-Warner BOR> Corp face unwanted offer GAF Corp GAF> agree 4.23 billion dlr buyout offer company form Merrill Lynch Capital Partners Inc>. Borg-Warner Merrill yesterday enter definitive merger agreement subsidiary company AV Holdings Corp> begin 48.50 dlr share cash tender offer 77.6 mln share 89 pct Borg-Warner common stock. The offer follow merger remain share convert 19.75 dlrs cash 54.25 dlrs principal amount AV Holdings junior subordinate discount debentures. As result merger Borg-Warner wholly own subsidiary AV Holdings. A Borg-Warner spokeswoman management plan participate transaction retain position company. A spokesman GAF unavailable comment. GAF hold 19.9 pct Borg-Warner's shares. GAF offer 46 dlrs share. Borg-Warner's spokeswoman company plan sell financial service unit include Wells Fargo security guard Chilton Corp credit rating service. Borg-Warner focus takeover speculation year. Corporate raider Irwin Jacobs propose takeover firm recently held 10 pct stock. Following GAF offer analyst calculate breakup value company low 50 dlrs share range speculate offer sweetened. In statement Borg-Warner board endorse Merrill offer recommend shareholder tender shares. The board receive opinion offer advisor First Boston Corp Goldman Sachs Co. James Burke president Merrill Lynch Capital Partners "We pleased enter transaction Borg-Warner. We look forward work employee Borg-Warner Borg-Warner maintain strong presence Chicago community." Merrill Lynch dealer-manager offer expires midnight EDT May 8 (0400 GMT May 9) subject condition include completion necessary financing arrangements. The offer subject minimum 44.25 mln share 51 pct outstanding share tendered. Merrill Lynch affiliate commit provide 200 mln dlrs AV Holdings equity 870 mln subordinate financing forward underwriting commitments. Merrill Lynch follow discussion commercial bank confident obtain rest financing require complete transaction. The junior subordinate discount debenture issue merger carry 13 pct coupon begin pay cash five years. The debenture redeemable company's option six 105 pct seventh 102.5 pct 100 pct principal amount. The junior subordinate discount debenture maturity 20 entitle sinking fund commence 16th design retire 60 pct issue maturity. Borg-Warner redeem outstanding 4.50 dlrs cumulative prefer stock series A 100 dlrs share. Holders wish participate offer convert prefer stock Borg-Warner common stock. The board Borg-Warner take step redeem poison pill share purchase right five cent effective immediately. REUTER 

The price index sale manufacture good U.K. Rose provisional unadjusted 0.3 pct March identical rise February Department Trade Industry figure show. The index material fuel purchase manufacturing industry fell provisional unadjusted 1.1 pct 1.7 pct fall February. The Department year-on-year rise producer price March provisional 3.7 pct compare provisional 4.2 pct increase end-February. The index output price non-seasonally adjust provisional 149.7 March 149.3 February. The index input price seasonally adjust 128.2 March February's 129.6. The 1.1 pct fall input price February March mainly due seasonal fall industrial electricity cost low schedule price petroleum product Department said. The Department fall partly offset rise price home-produced food manufacturing materials. The seasonally adjust index input price show 0.2 pct rise February March. Year-on-year input price index 0.7 pct March 2.8 pct drop February. REUTER 

Sri Lanka's cabinet order 12 pct cut budget spending ministry offset rise cost fight Tamil guerrilla Finance Ministry official said. A senior economist Ministry decline name told Reuters cut apply defence-related Ministries involve health education. Defence expenditure project 10 billion rupee forecast 12 billion expect exceed year-end. The economist cut government plan reduce spending satisfy International Monetary Fund (IMF) promise lend Sri Lanka 6.5 billion rupee balance payments. The IMF previously Sri Lanaka reduce budget balance payment deficit satisfy loan conditions. He World Bank IMF team expect month. "If approve loan available November 1988 budget" said. REUTER 

Norway's oil company Den Norske Stats Oljeselskap A/S (Statoil) STAT.OL> told Thai authority interested take 30 pct share offshore Thailand gas field Statoil said. The field southern sector Gulf Thailand currently operate U.S. Oil company Texas Pacific Oil Co Inc unit Canada's Seagram Co Ltd VO.N>. Thailand's oil company Petroleum Authority Thailand> (PTT) hold major stake field. PTT want develop field Statoil consider co-development field's licence renewed. PTT accord Statoil currently negotiate Texas Pacific buy Dallas-based oil company's holding field. "PTT sort problem Texas Pacific. When interested take 30 pct share field" Statoil spokesman Willy Olsen told Reuters. Statoil hire PTT carry independent appraisal field's reserve propose development plan estimate field commercially developed cost 700 mln crowns. Industry source Texas Pacific submit low reserve estimate field Statoil show little development. Statoil refuse disclose upgraded reserve estimate field. The field's reserve sell domestically Thailand's gas distribution network convert gas electricity source said. Sources field Statoil considering. REUTER 

The New South Wales Treasury Corporation issue 100 mln Australian dlr eurobond due May 27 1992 pay 14-1/4 pct price 101-7/8 pct lead manager County Natwest Capital Markets said. The non-callable bond guaranteed crown-in-right New South Wales. The sell concession 1-3/8 pct management underwriting combine pay 5/8 pct. The issue available denomination 1000 10000 Australian dlrs list Luxembourg. The payment date May 27. REUTER 

The ruling Liberal Democratic Party's (LDP) setback Sunday's nationwide local election force government controversial proposal five pct sale tax undermine commitment stimulate economy private economist said. The LDP's failure win seat crucial local constituency weaken government's ability push tax plan compromise tax proposal budget fiscal 1987/88 end March 31 unlikely pass soon said. Without budget government hard-pressed effective package stimulate economy pledge Group Seven meeting Paris late February Washington week said. Opposition protest sale tax stall parliamentary debate budget week force government enact stop-gap 1987/88 budget month. "The LDP's election setback enormous impact already falter economy" Johsen Takahashi chief economist Mitsubishi Research Institute. Takahashi behind LDP's poor show discontent government's high-handed push tax reform lack effective policy cope economic woe cause yen's appreciation. "This explains LDP fail regain governorship hotly contest constituency Fukuoka Hokkaido shipbuilding steel industry suffer heavily yen's extend rise" said. Takahashi government delay introduction sale tax beyond original start date January 1988 implement tax cut now. Sumitomo Bank Ltd chief economist Masahiko Koido favour water propose sale tax suggest government boost work spending modify tight fiscal policies. "The local election result signal economy need government action clear-cut fiscal measures" add move economy Japan's. For five government stuck tight fiscal policy bid halt issue deficit financing bond fiscal 1990/91 economist said. If LDP election setback lead scale sale tax proposal government revenue source finance plan tax cut package measure stimulate economy economist said. Koido government raise additional revenue sell share corporation Nippon Telegraph Telephone Corp. But issue additional bond ensure stable source fund said. "It run counter avow policy balance budget short-term basis" said. Takahashi Mitsubishi Research agree government float bond raise fund need economic expansion. He additional government borrowing burden capital market amass huge excess fund government bond price risen record level lately. "The market wait government bond issues" said. REUTER 

Japanese oil trader refiner consider whether suspend far Texaco Inc TX> yesterday file protection Chapter 11 U.S. Bankruptcy code industry source told Reuters. Texaco third big U.S. Oil company file protect creditor fight legal battle Pennzoil Co PZL> purchase Getty Petroleum Corp GTY> 1984. Many Japanese trading house decide stop deal Texaco month ago rumour file bankruptcy spread market source said. "We haven't dealt six months" Japanese trader. Some Japanese trading house office U.S. May ask letter credit decide continue trading Texaco oil source said. They Texaco bankrupcty protection measure affect majority business industry reaction strong anticipated. "Texaco try buy substantial volume gasoline U.S. Gulf Friday offer them" trading source said. One U.S. Major review relationship Texaco international oil trading company continue limited transaction Texaco send lawyer meet company tonight New York oil source said. But Japanese oil company hold joint venture oil exploration interest Texaco continue usual pending outcome dispute company spokesman said. REUTER 

French commercial bank Credit Commercial de France split share increase share offer privatise month company official said. He told Reuters assembly pass proposal splitting 10.33 mln share 100 franc nominal 41.32 mln share 25 franc nominal. Market source total value CCF's selloff five billion francs. The bank share sale price likely announce April 24 launch flotation offer April 27. REUTER 

The five lead West German economic research institute government stimulate economic growth call introduction tax cut plan 1990. In joint spring report institute divide 1987 growth forecast predict pct expansion pct growth. Gross product grow 2.4 pct year. But report institute believe "more produce dynamic growth additional job created." The institute step improve basic economic condition take quickly possible. "From view tax reform plan 1990 brought forward." The government plan gross tax reduction 44 billion mark major tax reform. The net tax relief tax reform amount 25 billion marks. However institute criticise government timing reform question financing left open. The government specify remain 19 billion mark tax reduction package paid want cut subsidies. The institute lack clarity Bonn cause uncertainty company household exactly receive tax reform urge quick decision government. They government reduce tax preference simplify fiscal urge restriction spending call increase value-added tax. The institute criticise Bonn increase subsidy far reduction pledged. They refer specifically double special writedowns medium size company announce package tax adjustment plan 1988 described increase subsidies. The institute total subsidy include tax preference reach 80 billion mark 1985 risen far then. Given scope subsidy "despite ... Major political difficulties" finance tax reform cut handouts. The institute government raise value add tax indirect tax portion positive effect result low tax lost. The report note government progress slowly plan privatise company deregulation needed. The government aim competition said. REUTER 

Hillsdown Holdings Plc HLDN.L> Christie-Tyler Ltd unit buy European bedding make interest Simmons Co U.S.A. Owned Gulf Western Industries Inc USA GW> 23 mln dlrs. The acquisition include Sleepeeze Ltd> U.K. Compagnie Continentale Simmons SA> France Compagnia Italiana Simmons SpA> Italy. In 1986 business pre-tax profit 2.5 mln stg sale 39 mln stg. Net asset acquire nine mln stg. Hillsdown share unchanged 266p. REUTER 

The European Community (EC) effectively Japan six week move market import decides tough retaliatory trade measure EC diplomat said. They EC foreign minister meet May 25 26 review trade relation sides. The EC executive commission representative member Friday propose renunciation EC pledge trade body GATT unless "adequate measure Japanese market." Such renunciation step impose stiff increase duty quantitative limit Japanese exports. The diplomat unlikely issue discuss detail meeting EC foreign minister April 27 28 Luxembourg need prepare proposal retaliatory action. They commission power limited action get ministerial approval prevent Japanese export electrical photographic good divert Europe wake U.S. Tariff moves. In May minister likely discus prevent Japan get extra trading advantage result Spain Portugal join bloc obliges gradually reduce tariff industrial goods. Meanwhile Japan's trade surplus Community grown steadily register record 2.13 billion dlrs March. REUTER 

Six month end-December Shr 32.6p v 22.3p Div 5.0p v 4.0p Pre-tax profit 376 mln stg v 260 mln Turnover 883 mln v 686 mln Tax 133 mln v 94 mln Note - company full name Glaxo Holdings Plc GLXO.L>. Trading profit 338 mln v 233 mln Share profit associate 14 mln v seven mln Investment income payable 24 mln v 20 mln Profit tax 243 mln v 166 mln Minority interest mln v mln Extraordianry credit eight mln v nil Turnover include - Continuing activity 875 mln v 647 mln Discontinued activity eight mln v 39 mln U.K. 111 mln v 91 mln Europe 299 mln v 218 mln North America 334 mln v 229 mln Central South America 21 mln v 20 mln Africa Middle East 29 mln v 23 mln South East Asia Far East 57 mln v 47 mln Australasia 24 mln v 19 mln Anti-peptic ulcerants 414 mln v 285 mln Systemic antibiotic 112 mln v 82 mln Respiratory 183 mln v 141 mln REUTER 

A takeover battle debt-burdened Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP.MO> TransCanada PipeLines Ltd TRP.TO> announce 4.3 billion dlr offer Dome continue talk buyers. Companies mention market speculation potential buyer Dome include Imperial Oil Ltd IMO.A> 70 pct own Exxon Corp XON.N> PanCanadian Petroleum Ltd> 87 pct own conglomerate Canadian Pacific Ltd CP.N> British Petroleum Co Plc BP.L>. Along TransCanada offer Dome proposal "a substantial company" discussion third company lead offer Dome statement. The statement confirm Dome receive TransCanada's bid identify company involve talks. TransCanada Canada's large natural gas pipeline operator offering Dome package cash common prefer share share subsidiary operate Dome's assets. TransCanada offer Dome management shareholders. Dome massive oil gas landholding Canada total 36.1 mln acre 7.4 mln developed. It tax credit worth 2.5 billion dlrs. Dome's statement TransCanada announcement "violated term spirit confidentiality agreement enter prospective purchasers" apparently time prevent Dome consider proposals. It TransCanada bid "seems require favourable substantial taxation concession federal provincial governments." But Dome add management financial adviser evaluate proposals. TransCanada chief financial officer H. Neil Nichols surprised vehemence Dome's statement deny TransCanada try usurp bids. "I (Dome's statement) bothersome. Once board decision authorise proposal legal obligation announce it" said. Nichols identity bidder term offers. Dome common share close 1.13 dlrs Friday Toronto Stock Exchange. The prefer class A stock close 5.00 dlrs. Common stock trade 25.00 dlrs 1981. REUTER 

The Bank Japan sell 800 billion yen deficit financing bill 51-day repurchase agreement mature June 3 absorb project money market surplus money trader said. The operation raise outstanding supply bill record 4800 billion yen. The yield bill sale bank security house money house 3.8999 pct compare two-month commercial bill discount rate 3.8750 pct two-month certificate deposit rate 4.13/00 pct. The trader estimate surplus 1800 billion yen. They mainly due 1300 billion yen government tax allocation local government entity excessive banking cash holding due continuous central bank dollar purchases. REUTER 

Italian state-owned bank Banca Commerciale Italiana BCI Mediocredito Centrale sign joint venture pact Soviet central bank Gosbank Vneshtorgbank foreign trade financial institution. A BCI spokesman told Reuters agreement involves bank provide financial service take equity stake joint Soviet-Italian industrial ventures. Under agreement Italian bank 50 pct firm form institutions. The accord expect sign tomorrow Venice conference East West trade spokesman said. The spokesman joint venture company operate primarily corporate finance sector. Additional detail firm's activity available said. BCI Italy's large bank Mediocredito provide medium-term export financing. REUTER 

The London Metal Exchange (LME) issue note clarify detail grade aluminium contract response question follow announcement contract due start June 1. All deliverable shape aluminium grade primary aluminium contract (minimum 99.7 pct purity) deliverable standard primary aluminium contract (min 99.5 pct) LME said. Sows constitute delivery standard contract September 1 99.5 pct purity sow delivery cannot place LME warrant. The dollar quotation grade contract multiple U.S. Dollar carry 50 cent tonnage only. Singapore port warehouse outside Europe LME delivery grade metal rent impose owner Steinweg 1.05 U.S. Dlr tonne week LME said. The LME Board response representation trade agree annul LME contract minimum weight requirement 450 kilo T-bars 250 kilo sow effective grade June 1 standard July 24. REUTER 

The yield 91-day banker security deposit account issue week Saudi Arabian Monetary Agency (SAMA) rise 6.43896 pct 6.21563 week ago banker said. SAMA lower offer price 500 mln riyal issue 98.39844 98.45313 Monday. Like-dated interbank deposit quote 6-3/4 5/8 pct. SAMA offer total 1.9 billion riyal 30 91 180-day account bank Kingdom week. REUTER 

Japanese Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's unpopular plan introduce sale tax cause electoral setback ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) Sunday's local election political analyst said. The LDP retain 11 prefectural governorship fail restore governorship Fukuoka place importance winning. In prefectural assembly election fill 2670 seat LDP lose 92 previously held 1487 seat socialist communists. Full election result available today. Discussing election result reporter Nakasone "I wouldn't propose five pct sale tax effect factor low turnout unusually cold weather." The Home Affairs Ministry average turnout 13 gubernatorial election record low 59.78 pct prefectural assembly poll drew average 66.66 pct record low. Noboru Goto president Japan Chamber Commerce Industry longtime friend Nakasone told reporter impact sale tax LDP's setback obvious. "The government action (on sale tax) regard people's wishes" Goto said. Nakasone LDP leader already hint delay implementation tax schedule January cut rate. "The parliamentary approval budget soon arrest rapid appreciation yen" Nakasone said. "We implement measure prop economy." Opposition party election referendum tax continue demand retraction. REUTER 

A Ministry International Trade Industry (MITI) official deny local news agency report Japan seven-month-old semiconductor agreement U.S. If Washington imposes tariff 300 mln dlrs worth Japanese electronic good April 17. Kyodo News Agency report high-ranking MITI official say Japan chip pact U.S. Implements punitive tariffs. Nothing decide official said. As MITI Saturday Japan pursue right General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) added. REUTER 

Eurobonds Texaco Inc subsidiary unquoted morning trader assess implication company's shock weekend decision file bankruptcy Chapter 11 U.S. Bankruptcy law eurobond dealer said. The decision file bankruptcy follow court decision post 11 billion dlr bond continue court battle Pennzoil Co PZL>. One trader U.S. Securities "I don't obstructive genuinely market Texaco bond moment. Everyone stun decision (to file bankruptcy) can't really believe it." One dealer note Texaco subsidiary outstanding eurobonds total billion dlrs total borrowing 6.8 billion dlrs. He add fix eurobonds - dollar straight - trading "basis only" prior weekend's news. This mean trader quote price bond bound trade them. Any trade negotiated. He recently appear speculative buying bond U.S. But European investor overall sellers. Dealers note Chapter 11 filing noteholders receive payments. Texaco eurobonds outstanding convertible Texaco Inc common stock - know convertibles. Trading issue either. One convertible dealer "We're wait result today's court hearing." Texaco apply Texas court relief have post court bond. Texaco share indicate counter share dealer 26 28 dlrs compare Friday's close New York 31-7/8 dlrs. Pennzoil share indicate 85 87 dlrs compare Friday's New York finish 92-1/4 dlrs. REUTER 

U.S. Legislators call Japan financial market foreign participation boost effort grow U.S. Protectionism Foreign Ministry spokesman said. "We seek opening Japan's financial banking markets" Jake Garn rank Republican Senate Banking Committee told Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone. "Japan's financial banking market increasingly sophisticated yet true reciprocity Japan United States market" ministry official quote Garn saying. Nakasone reply problem exist provide seat Tokyo Stock Exchange foreign firm main step urge U.S. Delegation. "But I promise Tokyo's market New York" told Garn legislators. In separate talk Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa U.S. Group urge Japan U.S. Financial institution big role underwriting long-term Japanese government bond Finance Ministry spokesman said. REUTER 

North Yemen weekend tender bought sugar French operator act behalf Swiss 214.70 dlrs tonne c f trader said. The amount bought immediately available country sought 30000 tonne June arrival white said. REUTER 

A Ministry International Trade Industry (MITI) official deny local news agency report Japan seven-month-old semiconductor agreement U.S. If Washington imposes tariff 300 mln dlrs worth Japanese electronic good April 17. Kyodo News Agency report high-ranking MITI official say Japan chip pact U.S. Implements punitive tariffs. Nothing decide official said. As MITI Saturday Japan pursue right General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) added. REUTER 

Japan warn United States retaliatory measure U.S. imposes plan trade sanction April 17 senior government official weekend. Shinji Fukukawa Vice Minister International Trade Industry Ministry statement Japan consider measure General Agreement Tariffs Trade action United States imposes 100 pct tariff Japanese export plan week. However Fukukawa Japan ready continue trade talk United States despite failure convince America call threaten tariff day emergency talk end Washington Friday. In March President Reagan announce sanction retaliation call Japan's failure honor July 1986 pact stop dump computer microchip market outside U.S. market U.S. goods. Fukukawa U.S. listen Japan's explanation effort live pact. He saod U.S detailed reason plan tariffs. Reuter 

The Bank England provide money market 75 mln stg morning session. This compare Bank's estimate shortage 400 mln stg today. The central bank bought bank bill outright comprise mln stg band 9-13/16 pct 15 mln stg band 9-3/4 pct 58 mln stg band 9-11/16 pct. REUTER 

The Bank Japan actively bought dollar afternoon trade 142.20 yen dealer said. The central bank place buy order level prevent dollar fall heavy sell pressure investment trust trading house said. However intervention fail boost U.S. Currency significantly 142.20 yen level added. The dollar trading midday rate 142.30 yen. It open 141.85 yen. REUTER 

Japanese trade figure seriously challenge entrench view policy maker Group Seven industrialise nation relative currency rate key smooth trade problems. Senior Japanese U.S. And European official Tokyo loss fully explain data currency key ask U.S. Exports Japan shrinking? What manipulate currency drive dollar trade problem bad solve fulfil Federal Reserve chairman Paul Volcker's forecast trade recession? U.S.-Japan trade decline 40 pct dollar fall yen September 1985 Group Five pact New York. The low dollar ought U.S. Exports 40 pct competitive Japan. The official economist offer objective reason not. Worse European Community sale Japan rise rapidly European Currency Unit decline 11 pct yen.? Last week's G-7 meeting Washington widely interpret sign policy maker dollar lower. So bad Volcker correct? At loss objective explanation official offer explanation tend highly subjective. "I don't I don't anyone knows" Hugh Richardson act EC delegation Tokyo. "What I Community exporter make hell effort market. If effort money Japan" added. But U.S. Officials businessmen convince low U.S. Exports Japan Japan's fault. They cite restrictive trade practice protect Japanese trade sector agriculture non-tariff barrier unreasonable check custom procedure car imports. Publicly Japanese official remain conciliatory U.S. Aggression. In private blame U.S. Industry uncompetitive. "We don't seem arrogant" senior official decline named. "We refrain accuse make effort." Industrialists Eishiro Saito chairman Keidanren Sony Corp chairman Akio Morita repeatedly accuse foreign firm make effort understand Japan's market foreigner agree. "The real issue inability major sector American European industry compete internationally markets" Peter Huggler President Interallianz Bank Zurich told recent conference Switzerland. REUTER...^M 

Turkey apply tomorrow European Community membership Foreign Ministry official said. They told Reuters Minister State Ali Bozer lodge application Brussels Belgian Foreign Minister Leo Tindemans. Turkey 13th member Belgium current president. REUTER 

Negotiations schedule metalworkers' IG Metall union employer resolve impasse contract start Wednesday union statement. IG Metall demand 35-hour week parallel increase wage five pct. Employers Gesamtmetall offer half-hour shorten current work week 38 hour initial rise 2.8 pct. IG Metall newly-elected leader Franz Steinkuehler propose talk Thursday regional negotiation northern Baden-Wuerttemberg collapsed. REUTER 

Saudi Arabia market 4000 tonne refine bleach deodorise palm olein June 1/10 shipment trader said. REUTER 

The London base trade journal "METAL BULLETIN'S" average producer price ordinary brand zinc week end April 10 790.00 dlrs tonne. Reuter 

U.K. Producer price data March roughly expect take account technical factor affected year-on-year outcome economic analyst said. The figure show 0.3 pct provisional non-seasonally adjust rise output price March unchanged February close average six months. The year-on-year rise 3.7 pct 4.2 pct February. But Chris Tinker economist brokerage Phillips Drew drop year-on-year rate mainly reflect rise excise duty affected index March year. He caution dangerous read monthly figure add rise 0.2 pct April year-on-year rise above 4.2 pct. Analysts note drop manufacturers' input price entirely due anticipate seasonal factor fall industrial electricity costs. Duncan Squire Lloyds Merchant Bank figure slightly disappoint strengthen sterling yet reduce input price expected. Both Tinker factor keep input cost month Tinker add year's fall oil price drop year-on-year comparison likely lead return rise index falls. REUTER 

West German Economics Minister Martin Bangemann indirectly reject call country's lead economic research institute introduction major tax reform involve gross tax cut 44 billion marks. In statement react five institutes' joint spring report Bangemann call bring forward 1990 tax reform concerned -- "The government point positive effect growth policy consolidation (cutting budget deficit) allow endangered." Bangemann recall scope tax cut plan 1988 already increased. Three institute predict pct economic growth 1987 export fall 0.5 pct. The pct growth export fall 2.5 pct. Bangemann "The government agree majority see reason extraordinarily pessimistic estimate export express minority." He reason believe export demand start rise course partly far increase trade. REUTER 

Italy's Gross Domestic Product calculate 1980 price rise 2.4 pct fourth quarter 1986 compare period 1985 National Statistics Institute ISTAT said. ISTAT statement GDP growth fourth quarter 1986 zero compare precede quarter. Italy's budget ministry month 1986 GDP rise 2.7 pct real term 1985. Imports fourth quarter total 26361 billion lira 1.4 pct 1985 fourth quarter 6.6 pct third 1986 quarter ISTAT said. Istat export total 23190 billion lira fourth quarter 4.1 pct comparable 1985 quarter 6.7 pct third quarter 1986. Fixed investment 23438 billion lira fourth quarter 0.7 pct precede quarter 1.1 pct comparable 1985 quarter. REUTER 

Tokyo share price expect weaken far week follow sharp drop Nikkei Dow index 571.01 point mid-afternoon trading broker said. They uncertainty cause dispute Japan main trading partner continue deter investor equities. The market index close 297.05 point 22919.54 probably downturn 22300 point broker predicted. "This short-term correction market probably 22300 week's time" broker Nomura Securities Co. He today's late recovery afternoon low show investor hunt bargain anticipation upturn. Brokers reiterate expectation imminent cut Japan's 2.5 pct discount rate factor see divert money bank account stock boost market. Securities company bank insurance issue likely benefit rate cut bought late trading. The Nomura broker expect rate cut May June Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's schedule visit Washington April 29. Nakasone expect seek Japanese-U.S. Trade dispute hurt investor confidence. "Until concert effort Japanese halt yen's rise dollar settle trade dispute market stay low" equity Jardine Fleming Securities Co Mario Malt. Malt current talk country inflammatory damage stockmarket optimism. Brokers Japan's ruling Liberal Democratic Party show rule Sunday's nationwide local election show dwindle support. "It raise doubt whether LDP push reform plan year" broker. Top policy priority deregulation financial activity stimulation domestic demand boost import removal agricultural subsidies. If policy abandon scale stockmarket investor reason buy stock broker said. REUTER 

Two Utah financial institution Bank Iron County Summit Savings Loan Association fail official spokesman said. The board director Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) approve assumption deposit liability Bank Iron County Parowan Utah Dixie State Bank St George Utah FDIC spokesman said. The bank total asset 20.1 mln dlrs bank Utah fail 59th nationwide. Its office reopen branch Dixie State Bank depositor automatically depositor assume bank. Dixie State Bank assume 19.9 mln dlrs 6300 deposit account purchase fail bank's asset discount 3.575 mln dlrs. The Federal Home Loan Bank Board close Summit Savings Loan Association Park City Utah direct Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corporation (FSLIC) transfer estimate 116.9 mln dlrs insured deposit United Savings Loan Association Ogden Utah FSLIC spokesman said. Summit 120.8 mln dlr institution insolvent spokesman said. The bank board appoint FSLIC conservator association April 14 1986. Summit operate bank board's Management Consignment Program. United Savings 205 mln dlrs asset nine office Utah Idaho. REUTER 

Top official lead industrial nation appear deeply worried financial market ignore effort coordinate policy believe strengthen talk week. Monetary source official exasperate market drove dollar rapidly low severely disrupt bond stock market heed policy commitment Group Seven -- United States Japan West Germany France Britain Italy Canada. Treasury Secretary James Baker reassure market commitment stable dollar statement French Finance Minister Edouard Balladur underscored saying: "I don't believe Americans weaker dollar." West German Finance Minister Gerhard Stoltenberg dollar's late rapid descent "involves risk -- already tangible threat -- strong surge inflation lead renew rise rates." But sign policymakers fear market uproar accept little economic picture change currency settle stable pattern result. Nor seem enthusiasm week's semi-annual meeting IMF World Bank high U.S. Interest rate curb dollar's rapid descent. That distaste stem fear recession. Outgoing Deputy Treasury Secretary Richard Darman told television interviewer policy drive dollar solve U.S. trade deficit. "It slow growth Germany Japan adversely affect trade balance ultimately drive rate throw (into) recession slow growth" said. Asked high U.S. Interest rate stabilize dollar Balladur said: "When currency maintain artificially artificially rate healthy." And resort high rate lead recession said. Acknowledging dollar's late slide Balladur "there adjustment course currency fix rate system." But Federal Reserve Board chairman Paul Volcker rein credit dollar's slide deepens. U.S. Monetary source Washington want understood market seven's commitment genuine. "The United States six major industrial country fully commit implement undertaking agreements" Baker told meetings. Darman Baker misinterpret market wrongly believe earlier remark suggest want far decline dollar. Baker Darman commit stabilize currency current levels. Last week's statement seven reaffirm February 22 agreement Paris Reagan administration agree reach budget deficit compromise Congress fight protectionism. West Germany Japan meanwhile agree stimulate domestic demand lead global upturn. Ministers believe Paris pact bolster Japan's promise 35 billion dlr supplementary budget. The source believe Baker major action. But seven seem accept commitment stable currency apply today's exchange rate Paris agreement dollar stood higher. The Paris accord "currencies (are) range broadly consistent underlie economic fundamental policy commitment summarize statement." Now accept dollar's low level especially yen hard reality nonetheless consistent agreement. "The minister governor reaffirm view current level currency range broadly consistent fundamentals" week's statement read. Monetary source policymakers understood market focus instability create gap U.S. Trade deficit surplus West Germany Japan prospective policy changes. European monetary source Bonn unconvinced Washington meant commitment cut budget deficit. Reuter 

The five lead West German economic research institute revise forecast 1987 growth predict recession West Germany spokesman Hans-Juergen Schmahl said. The institute divide spring report forecast 1987 predict pct growth see pct expansion. Growth 2.4 pct 1986. Schmahl present report news conference "None institute reckons recession begin recession." He add export remain weak economy . Schmahl West Germany expect far encroachment foreign good onto markets. Arthur Krumper Munich's Ifo institute DIW West Berlin present pessimistic view economy "The brake effect (on economy) produce external factor remain considerable year." REUTER 

Shr 1.11 dlrs v 1.10 dlrs Shr dilute 1.03 dlrs v 1.02 dlrs Net 8186000 v 8114000 Reuter 

Computer Associates International Inc start previously-announced 1.92 dlr share tender offer share BPI Systems Inc. In newspaper advertisement company offer approve BPI board follow merger price condition receipt 1813742 shares. The offer withdrawal right expire May 15 unless extended. In addition share sought tender shareholder BPI own 1951720 share 34.6 pct agree sell share Computer Associates tender price. Reuter 

Former Guinness Plc GUIN.L> chairman Ernest Saunders dismiss allegation order shred document stage U.K. Investigation "completely untrue" Press Association news agency reported. The allegation former personal assistant Margaret McGrath statement High Court Friday. Saunders' reply read lawyer start fourth hearing application Saunders U.S. Lawyer Thomas Ward discharge "asset-freezing" order obtain Guinness March 18. McGrath allege document destroyed paper file Distillers Co Plc> bid diary correspondence address book. The temporary order froze property own value 5.2 mln stg sum paid Guinness Jersey bank May Distillers takeover. They contest order require disclose whereabouts money Guinness lawyers. REUTER 

The Federal Home Loan Bank Board close Future Savings Loan Association Albany Ore. transfer insured deposit Williamsburg Savings Bank Salt Lake City Utah. Future 6614 account total deposit 57.3 mln dlrs. On Monday five branch Oregon branch Williamsburg 287 mln dlrs asset 19 office Oregon Washington Utah. The Bank Board close Future association insolvent. The Board Future lose money commercial real estate loan poorly underwritten inadequately appraised. Future violate regulation amount money loan individual Board said. Accounts 100000 dlrs Future insured Federal Savings Loan Insurance Corp (FSLIC). Depositors account 100000 dlrs share Future's asset pro rata basis asset liquidated. Future ninth federal saving association close compare 21 1986. Reuter 

Shr 21 ct v eight ct Net 6597000 v 2602000 Revs 56.4 mln v 23.2 mln 1st half Shr 57 ct v 32 ct Net 17.6 mln v 9810000 Revs 137.7 mln v 76.0 mln Reuter 

Year end-December Shr 76.7p v 67.7p Div 17p make 23p v 21p Pretax profit 127.0 mln stg v 116.9 mln Turnover 1.10 billion v 947.2 mln Tax 25.0 mln v 26.3 mln Note - company full name Blue Circle Industries Plc BCIL.L>. Company proposes one-for-one capitalisation issue Gross profit 390.9 mln v 321.6 mln Distribution cost 215.6 mln v 177.6 mln Administrative expense 65.1 mln v 58.9 mln Other operating income 5.3 mln v 11.0 mln Share profit related company 50.0 mln v 58.1 mln Operating profit 165.5 mln v 154.2 mln Net payable 33.6 mln v 32.2 mln Exceptional item 4.9 mln debit v 5.1 mln debit Minorities 3.4 mln v 6.9 mln Extraordinary item tax 39.5 mln v 4.2 mln Pretax profit include - U.K. 37.7 mln v 20.5 mln U.S. 27.5 mln v 22.8 mln Mexico 15.0 mln v 20.7 mln Australasia 15.7 mln v 13.2 mln Africa 12.0 mln v 12.6 mln REUTER 

Railway cargo handler yesterday call three-day strike start April 19 press high wage union source said. Workers Contratas Ferroviarias franchise firm responsible train railway station maintenance ask eight pct wage rise. The company offer pct. Reuter 

Northrop Corp Eaton Corp select McDonnell Douglas Corp/Textron Inc team codevelop aircraft survivability equipment U.S. Army's helicopter experimental program. The Army expect pick contractor produce helicopter 1992. Reuter 

Crazy Eddie Inc negotiate acquisition Benel Distributors Ltd operates Crazy Eddie Record Tape Asylums Crazy Eddie stores. It acquisition probably include affiliate Disc-o-Mat Inc operates record tape store New York metropolitan area. Other detail disclosed. Reuter 

Crazy Eddie Inc board adopt defensive shareholder right plan receive "friendly inquiries" acquisition. It plan shareholdrs record April 21 receive purchase circumstance price 42 dlrs 0.01 prefer share common share held. The right expire April Nine. The company right exercisable 20 day party acquire 20 pct Crazy Eddie common stock announce tender exchange offer result ownership 30 pct more. Crazy Eddie party own 20 pct stock merge party acquire 40 pct Crazy Eddie stock holder acquire party entitle acquire common share security asset market value equal twice rights' exercise price. If party acquire 20 pct stock Crazy Eddie acquire 50 pct earnings asset sell rightholders acquirer entitle buy share acquirer's common stock worth twice rights' exercise price company said. Crazy Eddie party acquire 30 pct common stock fail acquire Crazy Eddie 180 day thereafter rightholders entitle exchange Crazy Eddie common stock subordinate note Crazy Eddie mature either above dollar limt five issuance. Crazy Eddie adoption plan response know effort acquire control it. But company aware "possible accumulations" stock receive "friendly inquiries." Reuter 

Six worker kill injured undeground rock fall South Africa's large gold mine mine owner said. It third major mine accident country week. Thirty worker die methane gas explosion coal mine Thursday. Reuter 

The Zambian kwacha fell week's foreign exchange auction 18.75 kwacha dollar week's 16.95 Bank Zambia said. The rate low auction resume week ago two-tier exchange rate work World Bank International Monetary Fund. The Bank Zambia receive 370 bid range 13.00 20.75 kwacha six mln dlrs offer. One hundred thirty-five bid successful. A British High Commission spokesman Britain eight mln stg auction rate mln week soon Zambia reach full agreement IMF. The money spent good produce supply British firm exclude luxury defence equipment spokesman added. Reuter 

Senate Finance Committee Chairman Lloyd Bentsen (D-Tex.) call major industrial country pledge come economic summit Venice cut rates. "I summit meeting Venice ought try major industrial nation involve bring rate pct" Bentsen told NBC Television's "Meet Press." Bentsen coordinate rate cut "billions debt service Latin countries" ease protectionist pressure industrial countries. Bentsen South Korea Taiwan pressure revalue currency relation U.S. dollar. "You Taiwanese enormous capital surplus enormous trade surplus we've little cooperation there" said. Departing Deputy Treasury Secretary Richard Darman told television network agree U.S. dollar fall currency countries. "I negotiation country involve so-called NICs (newly industrialize countries)" said. Darman negotiation newly industrialize country underway privately. Bentsen predict Congress White House agree fiscal 1988 budget raise 18 22 billion dlrs revenues. The Texas senator series excise tax consider Congress include extension telephone tax levy liquor cigarettes. Bentsen support oil import fee happen President Reagan's support. Darman call "top level negotiation" White House Congress budget compromise include asset sale excise tax cut middle-class entitlement program "a reasonable steady rate growth defense" reform budget process. Reuter 

A 3.22 billion dlr offer Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP.MO> TransCanada Pipelines Ltd TRP.TO> short-circuit Dome's restructuring plan takeover bid oil analyst said. Dome try approval plan refinance debt 4.5 billion dlrs July 1 1987 interim debt plan allow Canadian oil gas firm defer substantial payment creditor expire. Analysts TransCanada's bid signal Dome's debtholders alternative exists Dome's debt plan. Dome announce plan 56 major creditor noteholders March month delicate negotiations. TransCanada's proposal "amounts quasi debt restructuring" oil analyst Doug Gowland Brown Baldwin Nisker Ltd Toronto. Calgary-based Dome's restructuring plan allow creditor convert debt common share formula yet negotiated. Payments remain debt link cash flow generate asset pledge debt. "The weakness debt-refinancing proposal approval creditor assurance Dome able repay debt obligations" Wilf Gobert oil analyst Peters Co Ltd Calgary. TransCanada's announcement surprise Dome wait response creditor propose refinance package Gobert said. The TransCanada proposal bidding Dome potential buyer probably wait lender agree restructuring added. "I debtholders entertain offer (for Dome)" Gobert said. Dome spokesman David Annesley New York TransCanada's announcement see attempt fix bidding price Dome effort preclude buyer make offer. "By draw attention discussion mean little reluctant forward" said. Dome consider TransCanada's proposal formal offer pipeline utility's announcement breach confidential agreement company said. Dome respond statement suspend discussion TransCanada pursue talk unidentified parties. However Dome management financial adviser evaluate proposal include TransCanada's. Gowland TransCanada's offer probably fair price company's 36.1 mln acre oil gas land holdings. However financial detail know Dome's debt restructuring compare value TransCanada's propose offer. Reuter 

Investor Martin T. Sosnoff raise offer Caesars World Inc share 32 dlrs 28 dlrs reduce share seek 29.1 mln already owned. In newspaper advertisement Sosnoff bid MTS Acquisition Corp withdrawal right proration period expire June 19 unless extended. The offer schedule expire May 15. In late March Sosnoff receive "negligible" share response offer reject Caesars inadequate. Sosnoff already own mln Caesars' 30 mln common share outstanding 13.3 pct primary basis. Last week Caesars' board approve recapitalization plan alternative Sosnoff offer shareholder receive special dividend 25 dlrs share subject approval shareholder special meeting held June. The company plan borrow 200 mln dlrs sell 800 mln dlrs debt finance payout. Sosnoff newspaper advertisement amend offer condition receipt share majority fully dilute basis arrangement financing approval New Jersey Nevada game authorities. He tender step acquire Caesars' share successful follow merger transaction. Sosnoff statement 29.1 mln share seek together 4217675 share own 92.4 pct fully dilute basis. He receive "negligible" share response tender. In letter Caesars' chairman Henry Gluck include statement Sosnoff Gluck refuse April 8 meet willing increase price offer. Sosnoff financing offer fully place. Sosnoff PaineWebber Group Inc PWJ> deliver commitment purchase 475 mln dlrs increase dividend cumulative exchangeable prefer stock MTS Holding Corp indirect parent corporation MTS Acquisition. He Marine Midland Banks Inc MM> lead syndicate provide commitment 500 mln dlr margin facility believe able arrange far commitment margin facility advance additional 25 mln dlrs need permit purchase share offer. Sosnoff merger follow tender 2750000 Caesars share cover offer 7.6 pct fully dilute basis convert Series A prefer stock value 32 dlrs shareby independent investment baking firm. He "To extent few 29100000 sdhares purchase offer stockholder receive combination cash Series A prefer stock have value 32 dlrs share Caesars." Sosnoff believe term offer superior Caesars' recapitalization. Sosnoff meeting week game official Nevada effort expedite investigatory process require regulatory approval process already underway New Jersey. He offer extend base likely duration regulatory process. He intend far extend offer approval process complete expiration date. Reuter 

Crazy Eddie Inc executive vice president chief financial officer Sam Antar turn 66 soon resign board replace William H. Saltzman vice president counsel Sun/DIC Acquisition Corp. Sam Antar executive vice president Mitchell Antar Isaac Kairey name Office President duty chief executive officer chairman Eddie Antar January. Reuter 

U.S. Secretary State George Shultz Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze met elegant Moscow mansion pursuit superpower arm control agreement nearly decade. Shultz accompany senior adviser technical expert arrive Helsinki aboard U.S. Air Force plane straight closed-door meeting Shevardnadze Soviet negotiators. State Department spokesman Charles Redman told reporter U.S. Arms control adviser told discus U.S. Proposals press. U.S. Officials optimistic possibility progress talk schedule Wednesday. Shultz guard say Soviet official approach talk constructive spirit Americans "we able move ball positive way." Shultz expect protest spy network U.S. Embassy cast shadow talks. For Soviet Union diplomatic mission United States subject surveillance accuse Washington "spy-mania." Shevardnadze met Shultz handshake ornate guest built Russian merchant belonging Foreign Ministry. Later marble discussion held prompt photographer shake hand again. "There instinctive warmth" observer said. Reuter 

Shr loss 67 ct v loss ct Net loss 3721000 v loss 107000 Revs 155.7 mln v 24.2 mln NOTE: Results 12 month end Dec 31 1986 eight month end Dec 31 1985. Because acquisition Brooks Drug September 1986 company's change fiscal prior-year result comparable Compact Video explained. Reuter 

Leaders nation's unionized automobile worker signal intent major stoppage General Motors Corp. GM> Ford Motor Co. F> fail satisfy demand job security pay raise protection shift U.S. production foreign sources. United Automobile Workers (UAW) president Owen Bieber loudly cheer 3000 local delegate special bargaining strategy convention yesterday declare 1.1 mln-member union ready "war" major auto maker support goals. "It take peace ... it's UAW ready it. War insecurity layoff" UAW chief said. The militant tone four-day convention open underscored probability bitter confrontation summer's labor negotiation UAW auto company contract cover 500000 U.S. worker G.M. Ford. The current pact expire September 14. GM Vice President chief labor negotiator Alfred Warren recently told Reuters 1987 bargaining round likely difficult decade carmaker's drive cut cost shed uncompetitive parts-making operation employ thousand workers. Job security union's main theme years. A master resolution state UAW goal note union's membership work auto industry fall 200000 1978 current level 690000. GM hit six-day selective strike 1984 signing current labor agreement contains billion dlr job security fund protect worker whose job threaten technology move outside suppliers. At Ford 8 billion dlrs cash reserve out-earned large GM 1924 executive oppose UAW's demand return guaranteed percentage annual pay increase drop recession. Ford hit strike 1976 prompt union analyst suggest Ford's "turn" UAW strike target. Bieber yesterday described UAW's situation 1987 "crucial" view grow penetration U.S. market import car truck move Detroit automaker foreign non-union source secure cheaper vehicle auto parts. He union stress job security annual pay raise improve profit-sharing limit companies' ability transfer work. Reuter 

Oper shr 45 ct v 26 ct Oper net 2258000 v 1166000 NOTE: 1986 net excludes 842000 dlr tax credit. Reuter 

The Newspaper Advertising Bureau preliminary estimate show spending newspaper advertising January total 2.06 billion dlrs increase 10.5 pct earlier month. The bureau retail advertising month 10.7 pct 1.02 billion dlrs. National advertising 0.7 pct 264 mln dlrs. Classified increase 14.7 pct 777 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Deutsche Texaco AG Texaco Inc's TX.N> 99.15 pct-owned West German subsidiary affected legal dispute Pennzoil Company PZL.N> manage board chairman Armin Schram said. Schram told news conference Deutsche Texaco's affected "legal proceeding U.S. Our liquidity sufficient guarantee supply crude oil product refinery customers." Schram West German law prohibit parent company "touching basic capital 500 mln mark reserve 81 mln." REUTER 

Pakistan's Corporate Law Authority CLA begin enquiry import tea Kenya trade imbalance country CLA chairman Irtiza Husain confirmed. He told Reuters telephone importer Liptons Brooke Bond supply data authority hearing held. The CLA report Commerce Ministry request enquiry. Husain date yet hearing decline far detail matter. Industry source told Reuters report companies' tea import licence suspend incorrect. Reuter 

Portugal's economy enjoy buoyant period decade strong shrug country's late government crisis analyst said. But April 3 oust Prime Minister Anibal Cavaco Silva's government slow economic reform investment Portugal continue adapt membership European Community join January said. Cavaco Silva's minority Social Democratic Party PSD topple parliamentary censure vote left-wing parties. The centre-right administration economic growth reform priority 17 month office. In 1986 Portugal's economy grow pct current account surplus swell billion dlrs inflation fell 10 pct 20 pct 1985. Analysts businessmen prospect instability worry foundation continued growth badly shaken. "The economy developed self-confidence dependent political situation" Fritz Haser economics professor Universidade Livre Lisbon. "The market doesn't real crisis yet" economist Jorge Braga de Macedo told Reuters. Businessmen identify political instability 13 big obstacle last economic progress. The PSD administration 16th form 1974 revolution. Portugal's develop stock market remain buoyant. Brokers unit trust manager recent surge economic confidence PSD rule largely underpinned continue optimistic forecasts. Investment grow nearly 10 pct 1986 Bank Portugal forecast release PSD government fell predict pace investment overall economic growth remain similar level year. But analyst crisis interrupt current policy slow economic development. Soares expect announce decision month either call election form government party exist left wing-dominated parliament. Many businessmen strongly favour quick election solution. "There chance majority government result elections" Confederation Portuguese Industry (CIP) president Pedro Ferraz da Costa said. He optimistic mean continuation near future liberalisation policy introduce year. The left-wing party favour parliamentary solution PSD want election opinion poll win overall majority. A PSD majority wide-ranging reform relaxation labour law denationalisation industry analyst said. Cavaco Silva accuse left-wing opposition party block key economic reforms. The left-winger Portugal's positive economic result product favourable international condition cheaper oil raw material import PSD policies. REUTER 

Malaysia reduce budget 1986-1990 development plan 49 billion ringgit original 74 billion limit expenditure Economic Planning Unit (EPU) Prime Minister's Department said. EPU director-general Radin Soenarno quote news agency Bernama say suspend project recession-hit economy improved. Radin specify project suspend Fifth Malaysian Plan review annually instead mid-term basis. REUTER 

U.S. Secretary State George Shultz arrive Moscow talk Soviet leader likely focus nuclear arm reductions. Shultz flew Helsinki drove straight airport meeting Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze. The day talk overshadow espionage row powers. Shultz want discus Soviet official indicate expect concentrate disarmament issues. Reuter 

Shr primary dlr v 85 ct Shr dilute 97 ct v 81 ct Net 108.6 mln v 86.8 mln Rev 2.70 billion v 2.17 billion Reuter 

Cooper Canada Ltd plan consolidate common class A non-voting share class common share subject shareholder approval May 1. Cooper Canada proposal result voting share available respond Charan Industries Ltd CHN.TO>'s previously announce six dlr share takeover bid. Reuter 

International Corona Resources Ltd board director believe term Royex Gold Mining Corp's previously announce offer fair reasonable decide recommendation offer shareholders. Royex March 31 offer buy mln Corona shares. For Corona share offer dlrs cash series B share Royex series C share Royex share purchase warrant. It bid Corona warrant expire Aug 31 1987. Reuter 

South Atlantic Financial Corp agree principle merge Independence Holding Co company call SAFCO International Ltd. It South Atlantic share exchange SAFCO share Independence share 2.822 SAFCO shares. Independence own 40 pct South Atlantic's 9.8 mln primary common shares. South Atlantic chairman chief executive officer Sheldon S. Gordon post SAFCO Independence president Ronald G. Strackbein president SAFCO. The company transaction subject execution definitive agreement receipt fairness opinion investment bank approval board shareholder companies. It proxy material expect maioled quarter. Both South Atlantic Independence insurance companies. Reuter 

Shr 47 ct v Net 2100000 v 1277000 NOTE: Company fourth quarter 1986. Home Federal Savings Loan Association Upper East Tennessee. Reuter 

StateWest Airlines Inc start service Las Vegas Nev. Tucson Ariz. San Diego enter joint fare agreement Trans World Airlines TWA>. StateWest fare agreement result low fare StateWest passenger continue Trans World's 50 U.S. destinations. The company destination expand daily flight 49 add company's fourth advanced Shorts 360 fleet aircraft. Reuter 

The U.S. Feeder Steer Price USFSP post CME calculate Cattle Fax represent price cash settlement CME Feeder Cattle contract. The USFSP seven-calendar-day average feeder steer price 27 base auction direct country sale feeder steer weigh 600 800 lb estimate grade 60 80 pct choice fed slaughter weight. April 9 Previous quote 70.03 69.87 Reuter 

Nova An Alberta Corp redeem 12 pct cumulative redeemable convertible prefer share May 15 1987 redemption price 26.25 dlrs share. Holders convert share class A common share basis 3.435 class A common share 12 pct convertible prefer share held Nova said. Nova retain Burns Fry Ltd Merrill Lynch Canada Inc Gordon Capital Corp maintain market bid 26-3/8 dlrs prefer share May 12 1987. Nova 12 pct prefer share acquire broker share convert class A common shares. Reuter 

Columbia Gas Transmission corp abbreviate streamline filing Federal Energy Regulatory Commission recover portion cost renegotiate high-cost gas purchase contracts. Recently Columbia Gas System Inc pipeline subsidiary FERC deny procedural ground prejudice proposal include cost company's recent purchase gas adjustment -- PGA -- filing. Noting rehear denial ruling Columbia Gas withdraw alternative filing commission grantes request rehear include contract renegotiation cost PGA consolidates issue pipeline's rate filing permit recovery subject refund effective April one. The company alternative filing seek recover 79 mln dlrs pipeline's non-gas sale commodity rates. This annual amortization amount base recovery 653 mln drls 8-1/4 period begin April 1 1987. Columbia Gas filing increase pipeline commodity rate 15.74 ct mln Btu 2.95 dlrs mln. The company orginially sought include cost PGA payment product result five billion dlrs prospective price relief related take-or-pay buyout costs. It explain interpretation base FERC's April 10 1985 Statement Policy take-or-pay buyout cost recover rate filing Natural Gas Act. As result renegotiate contract high-cost gas Columbia Gas able reduce average price paid gas purchase Southwest producer 1.96 dlrs mln Btu December 1986 3.64 dlrs mln April 1985. The pipeline Southwestern producer account 46 pct total available gas supply year. Reuter 

Turkey apply tomorrow European Community membership Foreign Ministry official said. They told Reuters Minister State Ali Bozer lodge application Brussels Belgian Foreign Minister Leo Tindemans. Turkey 13th member Belgium current president. Reuter 

Mellon Bank Corp J. David Barnes retire chairman chief executive officer resign board company Mellon Bank subsidiary. The company senior director Nathan W. Pearson succeed Barnes appoint special search committee review internal external candidate chairman. Mellon "Mr. Barnes change management bank move quickly constraint meeting need shareholder customer employees." Pearson 75 financial advisor Paul Mellon Family Interests. Barnes 57. On Friday Mellon report 59.8 mln dlr quarter loss. It place 310 mln dlrs Brazilian loan nonaccrual basis cut quarterly dividend 35 ct share 69 ct due energy foreign commercial real estate heavy industry loans. Reuter 

Hungary announce sharp price increase range food consumer product effort curb soar budget deficit. The official MTI news agency government decide consumer price subsidy cut reduce spending. From price meat rise average 18 pct beer spirit 10 pct MTI said. The measure aim cool overheat economy dampen Hungarians' appetite import Western good consume increasingly expensive hard currency diplomat said. The diplomat expect unrest follow sharp price rise East Bloc notably Poland. MTI consumer good expensive price refrigerator rise five pct. It announce measure ease hardship include high pension allowances. Reuter 

Leaders nation's unionized automobile worker signal intent major stoppage General Motors (GM) Ford Motor Co. fail satisfy demand job security pay raise protection shift U.S. production foreign sources. United Automobile Workers (UAW) president Owen Bieber loudly cheer 3000 local delegate special bargaining strategy convention yesterday declare 1.1-mln-member union ready "war" major auto maker support goals. "It take peace ... it's UAW ready it. War insecurity layoff" UAW chief said. Reuter 

Shr profit ct v nil Net profit 74000 v profit 10000 Revs 925000 v 112000 Avg shrs 10 mln v nine mln Six mths Shr loss nil v loss ct Net loss 16000 v loss 90000 Revs 1855000 v 333000 Reuter 

The Commodity Futures Trading Commission CFTC expect accept Chicago Board Trade's CBT proposal establish trading session commission meet Wednesday CFTC official said. CBT propose start even trading session 1800 2100 local Treasury bond Treasury note future option future contracts. The exchange hope launch experiment April 30. While CFTC staff raise numerous question even session operate discover major obstacle approval CFTC source said. "We anticipate problem approval" CBT official said. CBT President Thomas Donovan CBT Chairman Karsten Mahlmann Far East month drum support session. Reuter 

1st qtr Shr 1.30 dlrs v 1.65 dlrs Net 785 mln v 1.02 billion Gross income 10.68 billion v 10.13 billion Avg shrs 604.6 mln v 615.6 mln NOTE: Pretax net 1.34 billion v 1.83 billion. Sales 6.50 billion v 6.10 billion maintenance gross income 1.95 billion v 1.77 billion product gross income 1.40 billion v 1.15 billion rental service 825 mln v 1.10 billion. Reuter 

USAir Group Inc announce final proration factor tender offer Piedmont Aviation Inc PIE> 17.0 mln share 90 pct share validly tendered. USAir purchase pay 9.3 mln share represent 55 pct tendered. Reuter 

The British gold article hallmarked quarter rise 11 pct correspond period figure release Assay Offices Great Britain show. More 2.5 mln British item hallmarked quarter 11.1 pct ago period. The Assay Offices marked 832222 foreign gold article 2.5 pct year. In weight term 7.19 mln gram British gold assayed 15.3 pct increase 2.95 mln gram foreign gold represent rise 3.1 pct. British silver good assayed total 698132 increase 6.2 pct 78457 foreign item marked fall 11.1 pct. A total 10968 kilo silver assayed 11.1 pct rise. The platinum item marked fell 12.5 pct 1785 weight term total slip 8.1 pct 9849 grams. A spokesman Assay Offices Great Britain particularly encourage percentage increase British manufacture goods. Reuter 

Texaco Inc.'s plunge bankruptcy shield post bond 10.53 billion dlr legal battle Pennzoil Co. PZL> strategy breathing fight 1984 acquisition Getty Oil Co. wind U.S. Supreme Court analyst said. Texaco nation's third-largest oil company file protection Chapter 11 U.S. bankruptcy code earlier say choice Pennzoil's refusal negotiate reasonable settlement. But unlike Chapter 11 case Texaco proceed result major reorganization company affect daily operation expert said. "This piece financial history" Sanford Margoshes analyst Shearson Lehman Brothers bankruptcy filing. "What Texaco do buying fight battle courts. They hope upheld go U.S. Supreme Court." Margoshes anticipate significant change Texaco's oil exploration production bankruptcy filing affect pct giant oil company's 32.6 billion dlrs annual revenues. Texaco executive bankruptcy filing effectively halt payment stock dividend repayment 6.8 billion dlr debt add company's asset exceed liabilities. "Texaco's cash flow respectable rate 15 dlrs share annually" Margoshes said. "Obviously Chapter 11 seek protection creditor seek protection predator Pennzoil." The company lock acrimonious struggle Texas court jury November 1985 order Texaco pay Pennzoil 10.53 billion dlrs improperly interfere Pennzoil's plan acquisition Getty Oil Co. In major setback Texaco week U.S. Supreme Court Texaco abide Texas law require post bond full amount judgment merit appealed. Although Texas appeal court hearing schedule Monday (April 13) Texaco's motion reduce amount bond require law Texaco elect risk lose court ruling require post 10 billion dlrs collateral. The bankruptcy filing analyst effectively freeze Texaco's obligation continue appeal merit Pennzoil lawsuit. "This drastic measure" Rosario Ilacqua analyst L.F. Rothschild New York. "But it's indictment legal country Texaco force seek bankruptcy couldn't fair hearing." Ilacqua predict Texas jury judgment ultimately overturn whittle original 10.53 billion dlrs amount increase 2.5 mln dlrs accumulate daily. Texaco contest ruling insist Pennzoil valid contract New York law acquire Getty Oil. Suggestions expert Texaco bankruptcy incentive Pennzoil low settlement demand widely believe 3 billion 5 billion dlrs discount indignant Pennzoil executives. "I make difficult settle" Baine Kerr Pennzoil's retire president act company's chief negotiator Texaco litigation. "I that's main reason it." Joseph Jamail Houston lawyer Pennzoil company late settlement offer Texaco Saturday take surprise Texaco file bankruptcy. He decline reveal amount proposal cite confidentiality agreement companies. "Texaco told instead chose bankruptcy court" Jamail said. "This irresponsible unneeded move." Ilacqua bankruptcy filing appear eliminate chance settlement near-term. "There crazy number float settlement discussions" Ilacqua said. "I 1 billion dlr settlement adequate Pennzoil. I don't Texas jury really understood money is. They give Pennzoil astronomical judgment." Analysts expect Texaco stock close Friday 31 7/8 slip 25 New York Stock Exchange open Monday morning. Lawyers Pennzoil believe company prevail court appeal add Texaco's asset ample ultimately pay Pennzoil judgment full. Reuter 

Sight deposit commercial bank Swiss National Bank fell 4.64 billion Swiss franc 7.88 billion 10 day April National Bank said. Foreign exchange reserve rise 9.4 mln franc 33.12 billion. Sight deposit measure money market liquidity Switzerland. The National Bank bank repaid 5.8 billion franc traditional central bank credit take meet end-of-quarter liquidity requirements. This partially offset swap arrangements. Bank note circulation fell 440.2 mln franc 24.48 billion deposit call National Bank -- mainly government fund -- fell 840.5 mln franc 941.5 mln. REUTER 

The Bank England provide market far 68 mln stg assistance afternoon bring total assistance 143 mln stg. Shortly Bank revise estimate shortage 450 mln stg earlier forecast 400 mln. During afternoon bank bought 22 mln stg band bank bill 9-13/16 pct mln stg local authority bill plus 44 mln stg bank bill band 9-11/16 pct. These rate case unchanged previous intervention levels. REUTER 

Goodyear Tire Rubber Co expect report earnings continue operation dlr share 71.3 mln average share outstanding. In year's quarter company lose 60.0 mln dlrs 55 ct share 108.4 mln share outstanding 110.8 mln dlr writedown oil reserve Celeron Corp unit. Goodyear report quarter result April 27. Goodyear chairman Robert E. Mercer told annual meeting unless major downturn economy expect debt normal level restructuring cash flow improve margins. The company restructuring fend hostile takeover attempt Sir James Goldsmith. As restructuring Goodyear execute major stock buyback result increase debt. Reuter 

Taiwan announce plan round import tariff cut 862 foreign good shortly trade talk Washington official described move balance trade United States. Wang Der-Hwa Deputy Director Finance Ministry's Customs Administration Department Saturday told reporter list product include 60 item Washington. He ministry sent proposal cabinet tariff product cosmetic bicycle apple radio garment soybean television set cut five 50 pct. The cabinet expect approval Thursday tariff cut implement possibly start April 20 added. Reuter 

Prime Ministers Zhao Ziyang China Anibal Cavaco Silva Portugal sign agreement century Portuguese rule territory Macao return Chinese control 1999. Macao special administrative region December 20 1999 retain degree autonomy except foreign affair defence. Its capitalist remain intact 50 arrangement similar return Hong Kong China Britain 1997. China hope win Nationalist-ruled island Taiwan "one country systems" formula. Reuter 

Chicago Mercantile Exchange floor trader commission representative guesstimate today's hog slaughter 280000 300000 versus 294000 week ago 303000 ago. Cattle slaughter guesstimate 120000 126000 versus 120000 week ago 124000 ago. Reuter 

Member European Community start run patience Japan believe repeatedly promise major initiative market import minor moves. Diplomatic source recent action EC country bear witness disillusionment willingness ability Japanese government reduce massive trade surplus EC. However all-out trade EC suffer Japan. Senior EC diplomat give generally favourable reaction EC executive commission proposal EC raise tariff range Japanese product U.S. Carries threat similar move April 17. The EC tariff involve renounce obligation enter trade body GATT design stop diversion export EC market U.S. The diplomat meeting Tokyo announce EC's trade deficit Japan reach record 2.13 billion dlrs March 1.94 billion February. Reuter 

The European Community (EC) effectively Japan six week move market import decides tough retaliatory trade measure EC diplomat said. They EC foreign minister meet May 25 26 review trade relation sides. The EC executive commission representative member Friday propose renunciation EC pledge trade body GATT unless "adequate measure Japanese market." Such renunciation step impose stiff increase duty quantitative limit Japanese exports. The diplomat unlikely issue discuss detail meeting EC foreign minister April 27 28 Luxembourg need prepare proposal retaliatory action. They commission power limited action get ministerial approval prevent Japanese export electrical photographic good divert Europe follow U.S. Tariff moves. In May minister likely discus prevent Japan get extra trading advantage result Spain Portugal join bloc obliges gradually reduce tariff industrial goods. Japan's trade surplus Community grown steadily register record 2.13 billion dlrs March. Reuter 

P.H. Glatfelter Co reach agreement acquire capital stock Ecusta Corp> 149177857 dlrs cash. Glatfelter printing write paper maker Ecusta operates uncoded sheet light-weight specialty paper mill Pisgah Forest N.C. The mill produce convert paper product doemstic foreign tobacco industry. Glatfelter expect close deal May 31. Reuter 

Greenwhich Pharmaceuticals Inc GRPI.O> complete private placement common stock generate eight mln dlrs net proceeds. These fund together mln dlrs cash currently held company complete Therafectin rheumatoid arthritis drug development develop drug company said. Reuter 

CECOS International Inc subsidiary Browning-Ferris Industries Inc expect U.S. Environmental Protection Agency sue company claim non-compliance regulatory requirement CECOS' Livingston Louisiana hazardous waste treatment plant. CECOS EPA advise company intendend seek penalty range five mln dlrs 10 mln dlrs. CECOS consider propose penalty "grossly excessive" offer 125000 dlrs earlier negotiation settle dispute issues. CECOS believe strongly EPA's claim propose remedy concern Livingston waste disposal site unreasonable. The company 125000 dlr settlement offer consistent monetary penalty previously accepted EPA concern dispute hazardous waste treatment storage disposal operations. CECOS major issue dispute include Livingston waste site's analysis operation plan inspection record freeboard limit rainwawater hold impoundments. Reuter 

First Marathon Inc plan two-for-one stock split effective shareholders' approval June 4 annual meeting. The financial service company complete previously report 29.6 mln dlr private placement 1.5 mln non-voting prefer share convertible one-for-one non-voting class A shares. Reuter 

Shr 66 ct v 57 ct Net 20.0 mln v 17.1 mln Avg shrs 30.3 mln v 30.0 mln Reuter 

International Business Machines Corp shipment revenue high quarter net earnings fell 22.8 pct due high expenses. IBM net income fell 785 mln dlrs 1.30 dlrs share 1.02 billion dlrs 1.65 dlrs 1.8 pct few share outstanding. While total sale income rise 5.5 pct 10.68 billion dlrs 10.13 billion dlrs cost expense rise 12.1 pct 9.61 billion dlrs 8.57 billion quarter computer maker said. The company continue action competitive include cost expense reduction measures. "Although worldwide economic situation remains unsettled encourage sign business" IBM statement. "In addition increase quarter shipment announce offering processor personal compute product lines" said. "We yet fully benefit recent product announcement retirement incentive resource balance measure expect action significant impact 1987 progresses" company added. It expect 12000 U.S. employee advantage retirement incentive announce year. Pretax earnings fell 27 pct 1.34 billion dlrs 1.83 billion IBM said. Pretax margin slip 12.5 pct 1987 18.1 pct 1986 said. Reuter 

Graan Elevator Mij GEM balance port grain oilseed derivative rise 146000 tonne April 11 111000 week earlier arrival 404000 tonne discharge 369000 tonne week. The balance comprise 21000 tonne grain plus oilseed 125000 tonne derivatives. This week's estimate arrival total 274000 tonne 71000 grains/oilseeds 203000 derivatives. The figure cover 95 pct Rotterdam traffic product concerned. Reuter 

Shr 15 ct v 15 ct Net 689561 v 784088 Sales 19.2 mln v 19.8 mln Avg shrs 4.7 mln v 5.3 mln NOTE: 1986 net include gain 108000 dlrs ct share proceeds sale property. Reuter 

Belgelectric Finance BV raise 300 mln Luxembourg franc five non-callable bullet bond carry 7-1/4 pct coupon par lead manager Banque Internationale Luxembourg SA (BIL) said. The private placement Belgian utilities' finance company payment May 26 coupon payment annually May 27. Fees total 1-3/4 pct issue guaranteed Belgian utility Intercom Ebes Unerg. REUTER 

Four West Germany's five lead economic research institute warn excessive monetary growth threaten resurgence inflation. But dissent view DIW institute West Berlin echo recent statement lead Bundesbank official expansion see 1-1/2 necessarily threaten stability. The five institute issue joint spring report -- Kiel Hamburg Essen -- forecast pct rise GNP 1987 West Berlin Munich predict pct. The institute expansive policy welcome view slowdown economic activity. But experience show strong monetary growth eventually lead price rise undoes beneficial effect monetary policy. Given virtual zero inflation West Germany fear seem exaggerated said. "But past price climate quickly deteriorate force central bank restrictive policy" said. The economic cost preventive stability policy fight inflation take hold said. The institute dispute view monetary expansion slow accord 1987 domestic investor switch liquidity longer term capital market investment follow low rates. "Such redisposition temporarily dampen expansion central bank money stock automatically lead small expansion money supply" said. A return growth stability require spectacular central bank move quietly market operation repurchase pact avoid rate rise dampen inflationary expectations. The DIW institute monetary policy focus simply growth production potential. Because uncertainty exchange rate development economic weakness factor take account. Monetary policy aim far rate cut avoid rise boost economy discourage revaluation speculation. Recent strong monetary expansion threat price stability. The 1979/81 inflation follow strong 1977/78 money growth reflect cause rise oil price fall mark. REUTER 

Shr 65 ct v 51 ct Net 61.5 mln v 50.2 mln Revs 1.12 billion v 960.8 mln Avg shrs 95.3 mln v 99.4 mln Reuter 

West German producer price fell 0.1 pct March compare February stand 3.9 pct low March Federal Statistics Office said. In February producer price fell 0.3 pct January drop 4.2 pct level earlier. The Statistics Office producer price natural gas fall 3.0 pct March February heavy heating oil price 3.2 pct liquefy gas price fell 14 pct coffee 7.4 pct cheaper. REUTER 

The U.S. Agriculture Department lower ASCS terminal price low protein hard red winter hard red spring wheat location senior USDA official said. USDA reduce price hard red winter wheat Kansas City Texas six cent Minneapolis Duluth 32 cent St Louis nine cent Ralph Klopfenstein deputy administrator commodity operation Agricultural Stabilization Conservation Service said. The department lower terminal price hard red spring wheat Minneapolis Duluth 32 cent said. In addition USDA cut Pacific Northwest price hard red spring wheat 31 cent USDA official identify said. The official hard red spring wheat price Chicago Denver Toledo adjust amount Pacific Northwest Duluth Minneapolis. The price change lead pickup PIK roll activity Klopfenstein said. The price change decide week effective said. Klopfenstein department raise premium protein wheat offset drop low protein wheat price meaning net price wheat command protein premium remain unchanged. Reuter 

Alcide Corp preliminary experimental result obtain use formulation developed disinfection blood platelet indicate feasibility approach. The company note recent increase report transmission microbial infection recipient platelet blood transfusion patient undergo cancer therapy. The company related blood test baboon blood show significant loss vitro activity survival. The company followup study thje bacterial disinfection platelet planning evaluate inactivation virus presence platelets. The virus include Herpes Simplex Virus Type I cytomegalovirus Human Immunodeficiency Virus responsible AIDS. Reuter 

Texaco Canada Inc operation plan financial integrity unaffected yesterday's move 78 pct-owner Texaco Inc TX> file protection U.S. bankruptcy law. Texaco Canada chief executive Peter Bijur statement "it usual Monday morning." Texaco Inc add statement "has operate outside U.S. relation foreign government activity citizen affected" legal dispute Pennzoil Co PZL>. Reuter 

The Federal Home Loan Bank Board adjust rate short-term discount note follows: MATURITY NEW RATE OLD RATE MATURITY 30-140 day 5.00 pct 5.00 pct 30-179 day 141-160 day 6.13 pct 6.08 pct 180-200 day 161-182 day 5.00 pct 5.00 pct 201-274 day 183-200 day 6.17 pct 6.18 pct 275-290 day 201-360 day 5.00 pct 5.00 pct 291-360 day Reuter 

Shr 51 ct v 40 ct Net 1.4 mln v 851000 Revs 9.8 mln v 6.5 mln Six month Shr 74 ct v 50 ct Net 2.0 mln v 1.1 mln Revs 17.7 mln v 11.3 mln Avg shrs 2.7 mln v 2.1 mln NOTE:Quarter end March 31. 1987 six month include charge 115000 dlrs due reversal investment tax credits. Reuter 

Boston Five Cents Savings Bank Neworld Bank Savings agree merge form hold company Boston Five Bancorp. Boston Five proposal call holder receive 1.163 share company's stock share held Neworld Bank holder recieve share share held tax free exchange. Boston Five plan merger Newworld Bank Savings Will create large saving bank Massachusetts third large New England combine asset 3.1 billion dlrs. Boston Five chairman Robert J. Spiller "There natural fit banks. We consider merger equals." Spiller Chairman Boston Five Bancorp Neworld president James M. Oates president chief executive officer. Boston Five President Peter J. Blampied vice chairman chief operating officer hold company. The board hold company equal director institution. "Unlike recent combination merger acquisition premium associate it" Blampied said. Boston Five assetsof 1.9 billion dlrs 35 officers. Neworld asset 1.2 billion dlrs 24 officer Massachusetts. It loan center New Hampshire. Reuter 

Coopervision Inc prepare recapitalization plan include common stock repurchase exchange debt security common stock. The plan proposal change name Cooper Cos Inc submit shareholders' approval company's annual meeting June 22. The meeting postpone original date May 14 management review recapitalization option said. In addition Coopervision operating income current fiscal quarter end April 30 expect show improvement prior fiscal quarter's 82.5 mln dlrs ago quarter. Income continue operation immediately availalbe prior year's quarter report net loss 14.9 mln dlrs. At Drexel Burnham Lambert Investor Conference Coopervision chairman Parker Montgomery previously announce listen bid make shareholders. He Coopervision's stock fell 1986 due quarter loss rumor liquidation 30 dlrs 35 dlrs share Ivan Boesky's subsequent sale position. "The stock drop six dlrs day Boesky sell position recovered" Montgomery said. The company's stock currently trading 19-1/4. Montgomery far told conference "Don't investor stock basis short term recovery operating net income 1987 1988." "Our concentration maintain increase market share core business regardless impact bottom line" said. Reuter 

Colombia open coffee registration June shipment limit private exporter April May National Coffee Growers' Federation official said. Colombia sell average 900000 bag month begin calendar year. Reuter 

Spain's principal measure money supply broad-based liquid asset hand (ALP) grow annualised rate 17.6 pct March 16.6 pct February 19.6 pct March provisional Bank Spain figure show. The bank's target range 6.5 9.5 pct Bank Spain Governor Mariano Rubio month aim low range. ALP grow 11.4 pct 1986. REUTER 

Shr 72 ct v 52 ct Net 38.6 mln v 25 mln Revs 281.8 mln v 174.5 mln Avg shrs 53.5 mln v 48.2 mln NOTE: 1987 1st quarter amount include sale AVIA Group International Inc acquire quarter. 1987 1st quarter revenue include Rockport revenue 31 mln dlrs. 1986 1st quarter amount include Rockport Reebok acuqired company October 1986. Reuter 

Oper shr 16 ct v ct Oper net 1930000 v 391000 Revs 313.9 mln v 308.9 mln Avg shrs 11.9 mln v 12.0 mln Year Oper shr 60 ct v 27 ct Oper net 7215000 v 3340000 Revs 1.23 billion v 1.16 billion Avg shrs 11.9 mln v 12.0 mln NOTE: Prior net excludes gain 4896000 dlrs quarter 8873000 dlrs termination overfunded pension plans. Backlog 1.0 billion dlrs v 942 mln dlrs. Reuter 

The Bank England give market late assistance 210 mln stg bring total 353 mln stg. This compare Bank's estimate liquidity shortage 450 mln stg raise forecast 400 mln stg. REUTER 

Giant Bay Resources Ltd sign agreement principle Hecla Mining Co operating joint venture Hecla's Stibnite Idaho gold deposit. Giant Bay bioleaching technology ore processing acquire work property. It spend mln U.S. dlrs exclude capital cost bring mine production. It drilling indicate substantial sulphide reserve gold grade 0.1 ounce ton test show gold ore responds bioleaching. Reuter 

Blue Arrow PLC sign agreement acquire Richards Consultants Ltd 29 mln dlrs cash securities. Richards privately-owned New York-based executive recruitment firm. As agreement Blue Arrow principal shareholder manage Richards enter long-term service contract it. The agreement subject approval Blue Arrow shareholders. Reuter 

Merry-Go-Round Enterprises Inc board declare three-for-two stock split payable May One holder record April 17. Reuter 

Asarco Inc increase base spot sale price refine lead one-half cent 27.0 cent lb FOB deliver carload lot effective immediately. Reuter 

Italy's state-owned Ente Nazionale l'Energia Elettrica (ENEL) issue 15 billion yen eurobond due May 27 1994 pay 4-3/4 pct price 101-7/8 pct joint-lead bookrunner IBJ International Ltd said. Morgan Stanley International joint-lead bookrunner appear left documentation. The non-callable bond available denomination mln yen list Luxembourg. The sell concession 1-1/4 pct management underwriting combine pay 5/8 pct. The payment date May 27. REUTER 

Saudi Arabia speed reform financial package measure design boost economy Kingdom lucrative investment banking. Bankers Saudi Arabia detect fundamental shift policy stem tackle underlie contradiction Islamic legal framework western banking system. One senior banker Jeddah said: "There wind blowing... Saudi Arabia move front manner extraordinarily aggressive." The speed reform begin gathering pace surprised banker contend financial restrict internationalisation riyal religious court debt collect difficult. Saudi bank profitable generally report fall profit 1986 -- fourth successive decline -- loan loss provision ate already dwindle earnings. Bankers Saudi Finance Ministry Saudi Arabian Monetary Agency (SAMA) seem developed strategy remains see implemented. Reform start 1986 measure boost previously dormant stock trading earnest year. -- From January 1 SAMA liberalise money market give bank great access liquidity aid via repurchase agreements. -- From March 22 Finance Ministry abolish withholding tax fund borrow Saudi bank abroad. -- From date bank notify committee auspex SAMA hear bank dispute creditor non-payment loans. -- Also date bank allow mortgage collateral lending ban 1981. -- Within week Kingdom's stock market trading floor expect opened. Housed central Riyadh building Saudi Industrial Development Fund floor initially trade share auction system. Staff 11 commercial bank train ahead launch computer network up. One banker said: "The abolition withholding tax bank opportunity participate instrument rate currency swaps. At SAMA Finance Ministry opening market investment banking." Bankers Saudi authority appear shock reform pressure bank alarm bank reluctance extend far loan private sector. Banks lobby hard change argue religious Sharia legal framework inconsistent Kingdom's western banking nigh impossible collect bad loan courts. As result bank virtually stop lending found themselves cut investment banking series restrictions. Withholding tax punitively expensive rate currency swaps. The private sector's frustration virtual standstill bank lending overflow businessmen's conference mountain resort Abha month powerful merchant family call change banker said. "Banks lobby hard ultimate weapon force change -- stop lending" banker said. "That stifle growth economy." It unclear whether committee hear bank dispute creditor prove efficient non-Sharia already force Committees Settlement Commercial Disputes (CSCDs). Some banker believe committee yet form simply delay pending case force bank series private deal creditors. Nor clear stance committee payment generally recognise Islamic law. But banker move clear recognition SAMA Finance Ministry Sharia court CSCDs correct body hearing bank disputes. Other reform take pipeline. Finance Minister Mohammed Ali Abal-Khail March body examine late government payment contractors. In addition far move align Gregorian calendar company urge adopt financial year. A black list borrower start ago bank recently effectively sanction SAMA banker say. Banks permit lend engage security transaction party list. REUTER 

Shr 1.51 dlr v 1.62 dlr Net 28.6 mln v 30.4 mln Assets 23.8 billion v 20.9 billion Deposits 15.5 billion v 14 billion Loans 13.8 billion v 12 billion Reuter 

General Nutrition Inc file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission secondary offering eight mln common shares. All share sell estate David Shakarian founder company. Kidder Peabody Co Inc sole manager underwriting. The Shakarian estate own 25.6 mln share General Nutrition. There 33.1 mln share outstanding. Reuter 

Shr 28 ct v 32 ct Net 2823000 v 3216000 Rev 47.9 mln v 42.9 mln NOTE: The 1986 earnings share adjust stock distribution paid May 1986. Reuter 

Shr 15 ct v 14 ct Net 2028000 v 1879000 Revs 32.1 mln v 29.5 mln Reuter 

NVHomes LP April 30 distribution date unit result previously-announced two-for-one split unitholders record April 20. Reuter 

Bankers Trust Co raise broker loan rate 7-1/2 pct 7-1/4 pct effective immediately. U.S. Trust Co bank publicize broker rate already post 7-1/2 pct. Reuter 

Pennzoil Co lawyer plan file document challenge Texaco Inc's Chapter 11 bankruptcy proceeding Southern District New York. John Jeffers Houston lawyer represent Pennzoil 10.53 billion dlr dispute Texaco acquisition Getty Oil Co expect challenge file sometime week. "We'll challenge bad faith filing" Jeffers told Reuters follow brief hearing Texas State Court Appeals. The court schedule hear argument Texaco motion reduce amount bond require appeal judgement. Instead court agree Texaco lawyer issue moot Texaco's bankruptcy petition file yesterday stay debt obligations. "We abuse process" Jeffers refer Texaco's bankruptcy filing. D. J. Baker lawyer represent Texaco told reporter nation's third large oil company force seek bankruptcy protection precarious fianncial condition problem suplliers banker stem 10.53 billion dlr judgement. "All activity filing conduct normal terms" Baker said. He Texaco seek permission court continue appeal Texas court Pennzoil judgement. "There bond require court litigation stayed" Baker said. When whether Texaco's reorganization plan include major restructuring company Baker decline eventual plan include. "I Texaco succesfully complete Chapter 11 proceeding reorganization plan approve court" said. Baker Texaco expect Pennzoil seek seat creditors' committee appoint bankruptcy court add whether Texaco oppose attempt. Lawyers side company continued interested settlement decline whether negotiation schedule companies. "Texaco try settle continue try settle" Baker said. The company reportedly remain apart considers fair settlement Pennzoil seek five billion dlrs Texaco maintain cannot pay billion dlrs accord analysts. Reuter 

Pentland Industries PLC report substantial capital gain sale holding Reebok International Limited cut stake Reebok 32.2 pct 36.7 pct. It Reebok file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission offering six mln share Reebok common. Reebok sell mln share Pentland sell 1404866 share reduce stake Reebok 18.1 mln 19.5 mln shares. After offering Reebok 56.1 mln share share outstanding. Pentland amount capital gain sale depends offering price Reebok share negotiate Reebok sell stockholder offer 1.6 mln share Reebok common underwriters. Pentland proceeds offering Reebok retire bank debt incur acquisition AVIA Group 180 mln dlrs. Is afterwards Reebok bank credit line available corporate purpose include acquisitions. Reebok's stock sell 45-1/2 1/8. At price 1.4 mln Reebok share Pentland sell worth 64 mln dlrs mln share Reebok sell worth 136.5 mln dlrs. Pentland proceeds fund growth acquisitions. Pentland 4500000 share Rebbok offer U.S. syndicate lead Kidder Peabody Co Inc 1500000 share offer outside U.S. international syndicate lead Kidder. It U.S. underwriter grant option buy sell stockholder additional 900000 share cover overallotments. Pentland chosen participate allotment. Pentland soon date price offering determine release far details. It expect offering close May. Reuter 

The Office Finance Federal Home Loan Banks announce debt offering total 2.135 billion dlrs consist issues. The issue 1.2 billion dlrs mature April 25 1989; 635 mln dlrs mature April 27 1992; 300 mln dlrs mature April 25 1994. The office issue price offer sale tomorrow. Secondary trading occur April 15. The issue settlement April 27 office said. The office 120 mln dlrs 1989 issue 63.5 mln dlrs 1992 issue 30 mln dlrs 1994 issue reserve Federal Reserve System customer accounts. It bond available book entry form increment 10000 dlrs 5000 dlrs thereafter. No definitive bond available. Reuter 

Canada's lead composite indicator rise 0.4 pct January eight 10 major component post gain widespread monthly advance past Statistics Canada said. The index gain 0.4 pct preceeding month. The unfiltered index fell 0.1 pct January rise 1.0 pct December. The gain lead residential construction index manufacturing group continued improve stock market index federal agency reported. Reuter 

Net 17.7 mln v 15.3 mln NOTE: National Westminster Bank PLC> subsidiary. Loan loss provision 13.8 mln v 13.0 mln Investment securitiesd gaons 2003000 dlrs v 169000 dlrs. Figures dollars. Reuter 

Irving Bank Corp decline quarter earnings 28.6 mln dlrs 30.4 mln dlrs year-ago period due placement non-accrual basis 215 mln dlrs 33 mln dlrs medium long-term loan borrower Brazil Equador. Excluding impact non-accrual loan Irving quarter net income rise 8.4 pct 32.9 mln share amount risen eight pct 1.75 dlr. In quarter bank report earnings share 1.51 dlr compare 1.62 dlr period year. Reuter 

Sears Roebuck Co redeem outstanding adjustable rate prefer share series. The redemption price 103.79 dlrs share include accrue unpaid dividend April 1 1987 date redemption 79 ct share. Of 50 mln share authorize 2.5 mln issue company said. It dividend accrue share May 15 1987. Reuter 

Global Petroleum corp lower post cargo price six fuel york harbor 45 75 ct barrel effective today. The decrease brings price pct sulphur 20.75 dlrs 45 ct pct sulphur 20.10 dlrs 75 ct 2.2 pct sulphur 19.75 dlrs 75 ct 2.5 pct sulphur 19.50 dlrs 75 cts. Prices 0.3 pct 0.5 pct sulphur remain unchanged 22.50 21.85 dlrs said. Reuter 

shr 1.58 dlrs v 1.93 dlrs net 86220000 v 102629000 avg shrs 50831512 v 49156828 asset 61.04 billion v 57.95 billion loan 38.76 billion v 39.68 billion deposit 38.20 billion v 33.14 billion return asset 0.57 pct v 0.71 pct return common equity 11.47 pct v 15.19 pct NOTE: 1987 qtr net reduce 12 mln dlrs 1.04 billion dlrs Brazil loan place non-accrual Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) accepted bid export bonus cover sale 2750 dairy cattle Canary Islands U.S. Agriculture Department said. The cattle delivery May 1987-October 1988 said. The bonus 1379.00 dlrs Holstein-Friesian Inc paid form commodity CCC inventory. An additional 175 head dairy cattle available Canary Islands Export Enhancement Program initiative announce July 28 1986 said. Reuter 

Shr primary 54 ct v 41 ct Shr dilute 51 ct v 38 ct Net 9098000 v 5.924000 Revs 111.7 mln v 85.0 mln Avg shrs primary 16889254 v 14500737 Reuter 

Preparatory construction 450 mln dlr alumina plant near village Aghia Efthymia Greek province Fokida begin month plant operational 1992 Industry Undersecretary George Petsos said. Greece yesterday sign contract Soviet Union joint venture project big investment country 20 years. Petsos Soviet Union initially agree buy 380000 tonne purchase plant's entire output 600000 tonne year. Reuter 

Shr 62 ct v 26 ct Net 2312000 v 944000 NOTE: 1987 include five ct shr charge loan loss provision. Reuter 

Commonwealth Aluminum (Comalco) Goldendale Wash. smelter market would-be buyer Columbia Aluminum Corp Hermiston Ore. fail pull together financing April deadline. The plant ask price 18.7 mln dlrs plus mln dlrs inventory said. Commonwealth continue talk Columbia open talk interested parties. Commonwealth bought plant January 1985 close Feb 15 1987 leave 400 worker jobless. Reuter 

Alza Corp AZA> U.S. Pharmaceutical product concern issue 75 mln dlr convertible eurobond due May 8 2002 indicate coupon 5-1/2 5-3/4 pct par pricing lead manager Merrill Lynch Capital Markets said. The bond available denomination 1000 10000 dlrs list Luxembourg. Fees comprise 1-1/2 pct sell concession 1/2 pct management underwriting combined. The conversion premium indicate 17 22 pct. Final term fix April 21. REUTER 

Interfinco S.A. Of Luxembourg launch 50 mln Swiss franc five-year convertible bond indicate coupon 2-1/2 pct lead manager S.G. Warburg Soditic SA said. The issue guaranteed Cofide-Compagnia Finanziaria de Benedetti SpA Turin Italy convertible share CIR SpA - Compagnie Industriali Riunite> indicate premium five pct. REUTER 

Standard Poor's Corp downgrade D 8.4 billion dlrs debt Texaco Inc oil company's subsidiaries. The rating agency cite Texaco's filing weekend protection Chapter 11 Bankruptcy Code Texaco seek judicial relief 8.5 billion dlr plus cost judgement suit brought Pennzoil Co PZL>. S P us D rating grade security issue company Chapter 11 reorganization agency said. Reduced D B senior debt Texaco Getty Oil Co Getty Oil International (Caribbean) N.V. Pembroke Capital Co Inc Reserve Oil Gas Co Texaco Capital Inc Texaco Capital N.V. Texaco Convent Refining Inc Tidewater Oil Co Loop Inc. Cut D C MAGEC Finance Co CCC subordinate debt Texaco Capital N.V. Reuter 

Shr 84 ct v 80 ct Net 82416000 v 67819000 Revs 703.9 mln v 759.7 mln Avg shrs 98369307 v 84807498 Loans 19.06 billion v 19.51 billion Deposits 21.60 billion v 19.86 billion Assets 27.16 billion v 27.15 billion Note: Prior qtr shr figure adjust three-for-one stock split May 1986. Reuter 

Du Pont Overseas Capital N.V. unit Du Pont Co redeem May 15 189 mln dlrs outstanding 13-3/4 pct guaranteed retractable note due 1997. It buy note par value plus accrue Du Pont Overseas said. Reuter 

Berkey Inc elect Jonathan Taplin chairman replace A. Michael Victory remain company director. Taplin formerly director company Berkey said. In addition company raise mln dlrs privately-placed convertible prefer stock offering securities. It offering holder exercise acquire approximately 1.5 mln share company's common stock. Reuter 

Pakistan report bought 100000 tonne sugar weekend tender North Korean operator trader said. The purchase believe price 210 dlrs tonne cost freight fine/medium grain due ship arrival May (30000 tonnes) June (45000) July (25000 tonnes) said. Reuter 

EKN Bank Nidwalden launch 25 mln Swiss franc 2-1/2 pct 10-year bond warrant par lead manager Bank Leu AG said. Each 1000-franc bond carry warrant entitle holder buy 200-franc nominal EKN bearer share 510 francs. Subscriptions close April 24. REUTER 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade top-flight Aaa rating Societe Generale Banque Nationale de Paris Credit Lyonnais. The rating agency cite ongoing deregulation French banking industry financial markets. Moody's anticipates increase competition reduce profitability banks' core businesses. The senior debt certificate deposit bank rat Aaa. However Prime-1 commercial paper rating review. Issues support long-term letter credit bank affected. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve expect enter U.S. Government security market add temporary reserve directly arrange three-day System repurchase agreement economist said. They Fed add reserve indirectly instead via round billion dlrs customer repurchase agreements. Federal fund average 6.35 pct Friday open 6-7/16 pct trade 6-1/2 pct. Reuter 

Dillard Department Stores Inc base Little Rock Ark. Allied Stores Corp jointly enter definitive purchase agreement sale Dillard Joske's Cain-Sloan division Allied 255 mln dlrs cash subject closing adjustments. The sale excludes real estate asset Joske's Cain-Sloan Allied estimate aggregate value 30 mln dlrs base current market conditions. Joske's 26 store Texas Arizona. Cain-Sloan store Nashville. Joske's large unit Allied slat sale restructuring. Allied Stores Corp subsidiary Campeau Corp acquire acquire Canadian developer year. Robert Campeau chairman Allied "this terrific start disposition proceed ahead schedule. This sale fulfill requirement bank agreement sell asset June 30 additional flexibility disposal remain division sold." Allied Stores require pay 200 mln dlrs bank debt June 30. There doubt Wall Street company meet payment. A Campeau source "We believe cash sale put strong negotiate position maximize proceeds Allied receive divisions." "Allied able position know able meet June 30 payment schedules" source said. About 1.1 bilion dlrs Allied asset target sale Dec. 31 1988 pay aquisition Allied Campeau. Allied take bid divisions. Targeted sale Bonwit Tellers Garfinckel's Dey's Donaldson's Herpolsheimer's Heer's Miller's Miller Rhoads Pomeroy's Catherine's Plymouth Shops Jerry Leonard. The division provide 38.4 pct Allied net sale 11.8 pct store profit fiscal 1985. Reuter 

A Texas State Court Appeal agree Texaco Inc's bankruptcy petition effectively stay company's obligation Texas law post bond 10.53 billion dlr litigation Pennzoil Co PZL>. In brief hearing three-judge appeal court Texaco attorney James Sales company's motion reduce amount bond require appeal moot Texaco's Chapter 11 petition protects company previously exist debt obligations. Lawyers Pennzoil won 10.53 billion dlr judgment struggle Texaco's acquisition Getty Oil Co object. Texaco lawyer plan pursue appeal Texas court Federal court necessary. The Texaco lawyer company seek permission bankruptcy court Southern District New York pursue Pennzoil litigation. Reuter 

The Chicago Board Trade's (CBT) April Major Market Index (MMI) stock index future expire 1515 CDT Thursday instead Friday Good Friday holiday exchange said. The Chicago Board Options Exchange April option Standard Poor's 100 500 stock index currency option one-third list individual equity option expire normal Saturday April 18 trading Thursday contracts. Reuter 

U.S. drilling activity slow marginally week end active rotary rig fell 749 917 ago Hughes Tool Co said. The late total include 662 work land rig 70 offshore rig 17 inland waters. Among individual California drop Colorado six  Wyoming West Virginia six. Drilling increase report Kansas five rig add Michigan Louisiana Oklahoma 11. Rig count unchanged New Mexico Texas. Reuter 

NCR Corp earlier reporting high quarter profit continue expect report record earnings revenue 1987. "Our optimism base incoming rate strength product lines" company said. NCR Corp plan additional product announcement elaborating. NCR earlier quarter profit increase 61.5 mln dlrs 65 ct share 50.2 mln dlrs 51 ct share prior year. NCR's 1986 full-year earnings rise 336.5 mln dlrs 315.2 mln dlrs prior year. NCR increase quarter profit result strong revenue growth particularly strong Europe Pacific marketing groups. Growth U.S. revenue improve company said. First quarter revenue increase 1.12 billion dlrs 960.8 mln dlrs prior year. NCR's U.S. dollar value 1987 quarter worldwide incoming order post substantial gain prior quarter NCR give specific figures. Order growth broad base across NCR's product line great growth come U.S. said. Reuter 

Period end February 28 Shr loss 11 ct v loss 11 ct Net loss 1309000 v loss 937000 Revs 5271000 v 4417000 Avg shrs 11690000 v 8724000 Reuter 

Prime Computer Inc tomorrow introduce high-end superminicomputers. The company machine significantly expand performance 50 Series product line. It give far details. Reuter 

Entre Computer Centers Inc discontinue European Australian operations. The company report loss quarter end February 28 2733000 dlrs 6705000 dlr pretax provision shutdown overseas unit 2511000 dlr tax credit. A earlier earn 911000 dlrs. It overseas operation lose 400000 dlrs quarter appear strong provide future growth. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 950 mln dlrs debt Irving Bank Corp lead bank Irving Trust Co. The rating agency ass Irving's ability substantially improve operating result increasingly competitive markets. The review focus Irving's shift risk profile modest capital base. Moody's cite bank's significant exposure developed countries. Under review parent's Aa-3 senior debt A-1 subordinate debt Aa-3 prefer stock Irving Trust's Aa-1 long-term desposits letter credit. Reuter 

State bank Banca Commerciale Italiana (BCI) launch 50 billion lira eurobond behalf Merrill Lynch  Co. Due May 26 1992 pay 10 pct price 100 -1/2 pct. BCI statement lead international underwriting consortium 25 bank financial institutions. The bank Merrill Lynch International Co co-lead manager. The non-callable bond available denomination mln lira list Luxembourg BCI said. REUTER 

Shr loss 29 ct v profit 10 ct Net loss 2733000 v profit 911000 Revs 21.5 mln v 18.5 mln 1st half Shr loss 23 ct v profit 26 ct Net loss 2154000 v profit 2445000 Revs 37.8 mln v 37.7 mln NOTE: Current net period include 6705000 dlr pretax provision closing overseas operation tax credit 2511000 dlrs quarter 1977000 dlrs half. Reuter 

Merrill Lynch Co investment banking revenue strong quarter rise 257.4 mln dlrs 152.9 mln quarter 1986. "We steady progress period market activity marked unprecedented activity" William Schreyer chairman cheif executive officer Daniel Tully president chief operating officer said. Earlier company report quarter net income 108.6 mln dlrs dlr share 86.8 mln dlrs 85 ct share 1986's quarter. Merrill Lynch insurance revenue big gain quarter rise 242.3 mln dlrs quarter 68.3 mln dlrs year's quarter. Reuter 

DSC Communications Corp amend exist term supply contract MCI Communications Corp MCIC> delivery tandem switch. Deliveries switch DEX 600E schedule begin third quarter 1988 year-end 1989 telecommunication system company said. The switch increase port capacity DSC's exist 600 switch said. Under amend agreement DSC deliver signal transfer product MCI. Reuter 

Woodward Lothrop Inc president David Mullen resign replace Tom Roach effective April 20 1987. Woodward Lothrop privately held retailer Mullen state desire pursure interests. Roach join J.W. Robinson Inc Los Angeles chairman March 1986 resign shortly parent company Associated Dry Goods acquire May Co. Reuter 

Feb 28 Shr profit ct v loss nil Net profit 448000 v loss 28000 Revs 15.1 mln v 11.5 mln Avg shrs 11.2 mln v 11.1 mln Year Shr profit ct v profit nil Net profit 459000 v profit 51000 Revs 53.2 mln v 44.5 mln Avg shrs 11.2 mln v 11.1 mln NOTE: Net include tax credit 53000 dlrs v 1023000 dlrs quarter 48000 dlrs v 2557000 dlrs year. Reuter 

Oper shr 39 ct v 47 ct Oper net 2104462 v 2452420 Revs 4675904 v 4744248 Avg shrs 5427561 v 5139415 1st half Oper shr 82 ct v 93 ct Oper net 4418718 v 4609613 Revs 9346483 v 9338590 Avg shrs 5427486 v 4943966 NOTE: Current net excludes gain sale real estate 470778 dlrs quarter 1533273 dlrs half. Period end February 28. Reuter 

Shr profit ct v loss ct Net profit 172000 v loss 180000 Revs 4.2 mln v 883000 Six month Shr profit nine ct v loss ct Net profit 315000 v loss 107000 Revs 7.4 mln v 1.8 mln Avg shrs 4.4 mln v 2.6 mln Reuter 

Combustion Engineering Inc C-E Environmental Systems Services Inc unit agree Keeler/Dorr-Oliver unit Standard Oil Co SRD> develop system destroy hazardous wastes. Under team arrangement Keeler/Dorr-Oliver supply fluid bed technology equipment services. C-E Environmental provide environmental consult site investigation engineering construction service operation maintenance training services. Reuter 

Shr 37 ct v 37 ct Net 687888 v 441659 Revs 7.9 mln v 6.8 mln Nine month Shr 1.12 dlrs v 1.07 dlrs Net 1.8 mln v 1.3 mln Revs 23.2 mln v 19.7 mln Avg shrs 1.6 mln v 1.2 mln NOTE:Full name Scott Stringfellow Financial Corp. Reuter 

General Nutrition Inc file secondary offering eight mln common shares. It share sell estate founder David B. Shakarian. Lead underwriter Kidder Peabody Co Inc. General Nutrition 33.0 mln share outstanding. Reuter 

Texaco Inc's decision file protection bankruptcy code chill effect stock sent Pennzoil Co's share sharply low trader said. Texaco drop 3-1/2 28-3/8 Pennzoil fell 12-7/8 79-3/8. "A lot bid Pennzoil expect settlement five billion dlrs case" energy analyst Rosario Ilacqua L.F. Rothschild "and nobody know settle out." "It seem hope court settlement run court great relative impact Pennzoil's stock Texaco's" analyst Sanford Margoshes Shearson Lehman Brothers cite sharper decline Pennzoil morning. The litigation arose Pennzoil sue Texaco interfere 1984 agreement acquire Getty Oil. In 1985 Texas court rule favor Pennzoil order Texaco pay 10.53 billion dlrs damages. Citing burden court Supreme Court ruling week favor Pennzoil concern amount Texaco bond appeal Texaco file Chapter 11 protection Sunday. "That decision put Pennzoil unsecured creditor catagory mean lose prefer position cause damage stock today" Margoshes said. "They able collect payment secure creditor collected" said. "From standpoint attractiveness Texaco's stock" Margoshes "I quite bullish." "I overreaction downside (Texaco) stock investor believe Texaco cannot effectively conduct business. But Texaco Inc subsidiary protection indication able proceed adequately" Margoshes said. In addition note "there insitutions cannot legally--according regulations--hold stock bankruptcy. That cause sell opening" said. L.F. Rothschild's Ilacqua "you wonder interim settlement reach full legal route investment decision hinge on." He "if settle Texaco owe lot 10 billion dlrs speculate Texaco stock quite interesting." He expect stock trade 25 dlr 30 dlr share range take decision case. Reuter 

John Mowlem Plc U.K. Building construction company arrange 50 mln stg commercial paper option issue note U.S. Dollars Mowlem treasurer Philip Ridal said. He company hope drawing May advantage low borrowing cost great flexibility afford program. It increase company's arbitrage opportunity added. The arrange Kleinwort Benson Ltd act dealer Morgan Grenfell Co Ltd Swiss Bank Corp International Ltd. The sterling note sell denomination mln 500000 stg maturity seven 364 days. Ridal complement note issuance facility company arrange increase investor base. REUTER 

Foster Wheeler Corp FWC> audit Stearns Airport Equiment Co Inc unit reveal "substantial discrepancies" Stearns account require material adjustment previously announce consolidated result company subsidiaries. Foster Stearn officer senior management Stearn's operation appear profitable improperly record job costs. It Stearn's president controller resigned. A Foster spokesman name president controller immediately comment release. Foster amount involve "discrepancy" 13.7 mln dlrs tax 8.2 mln dlrs net tax due "improper record job cost period continue quarter 1987." Stearns unit Foster's Conergic Corp subsidiary. The company impact result 1987 "likely significant" amount charge prior period determined. Foster report tax earnings 28 mln dlrs 26 mln dlrs 35.4 mln dlrs 1986 1985 1984 respectively. Stearns base Crowley Texas make airport baggage conveyor equipment passenger load bridges. Foster diversified international concern 27 subsidiary operating worldwide base Livingston New Jersey. Its report revenue period end December 26 1986 1.3 billion dlrs. The company detailed audit investigation continuing. A company spokesman decline comment far investigation. Reuter 

Bank Mees en Hope NV fully-owned subsidiary Algemene Bank Nederland NV launch tranche 100 mln guilder commercial paper city The Hague. Mees en Hope decline comment size tranche tranche end March 10 50 mln guilders. The tranche period April 14 July 14. Denominations mln guilder issue price discount yield basis tomorrow 1000 hour local. Clearing delivery via short term paper clearing institute Dutch Central Bank. The Hague Dutch city start commercial paper allow Dutch capital market January 1986. Rotterdam Amsterdam follow program 400 mln 300 mln guilder respectively. REUTER 

Drilling activity slow substantially Canada. The active rotary rig fell 19 week end Hughes Tool Co reported. A total 66 rig work week compare 71 ago said. Reuter 

Taiwan announce plan round import tariff cut 862 foreign good shortly trade talk Washington official described move balance trade United States. Wang Der-Hwa Deputy Director Finance Ministry's Customs Administration Department told reporter list product include 60 item Washington. "The move government effort encourage import trading partner particularly United States" said. He ministry sent proposal cabinet tariff product cosmetic bicycle apple radio garment soybean television set cut five 50 pct. The cabinet expect approval Thursday tariff cut implement possibly start April 20 added. Taiwan introduce sweep tariff cut 1700 foreign product January aim help reduce grow trade surplus United States island's large trading partner. Washington satisfied cut press reduction cut huge trade deficit Taipei. Washington's deficit Taipei rise record 13.6 billion U.S. Dlrs 10.2 billion 1985. It widen 3.61 billion quarter 1987 2.78 billion earlier Taiwan's official figure show. Today's announcement departure 15-member Taiwan delegation Washington series trade talk U.S. Officials. The delegation's leader Vincent Siew told reporter leave "a heavy heart" meaning tough talk Washington rise protectionist sentiment U.S. Congress. Taiwan's 1986 trade surplus Washington third large Japan Canada. Siew talk start April 14 cover U.S. Calls Taiwan market American product purchase major U.S. Machinery plant equipment import tariff cut protection intellectual property. "I be afraid talk U.S." elaborating. REUTER 

Despite sharp fall Texaco Inc bond 125 billion dlr U.S. junk bond market largely unaffected Texaco's weekend filing protection Chapter 11 Bankruptcy Code analyst said. "Texaco's filing little effect junk bond price morning. It spill overall market LTV Corp's LTV> bankruptcy filing summer" analyst. Traders Texaco debt issue fell 30 point morning thin trading recouped half that. "Because Texaco filing investor bid paper mid-60 (around 650 dlrs 1000 dlr value) 95 Friday" dealer high-yield low rat bonds. "But seller found level bid soon rebound 75 85 area" add refer issue Texaco's 13 pct note 1991 13-1/4s 1999 13-5/8s 1994. All mid-90s Friday. The rebound occur Standard Poor's Corp downgrade debt rating 8.4 billion dlrs debt Texaco subsidiary D trader noted. S P cite weekend bankruptcy filing. The agency us D grade security issue company Chapter 11 reorganization. Moody's Investors Service Inc follow suit cut debt Texaco unit Caa. The junk bond market experienced short-lived downturn summer LTV's bankruptcy filing spark worry credit condition steel company worsen. "This clearly Texaco" trader. Because yield junk bond lately outperform investment grade corporates said. Analysts portfolio manager view Texaco's bankruptcy filing defensive move. Indeed Texas State Court Appeal morning bankruptcy petition effectively stay Texaco's obligation Texas law post bond 10.53 billion dlr litigation Pennzoil Co PZL>. "The filing result credit weakness. The company oil crisis alright" portfolio manager. Others run junk bond portfolio agree assessment buy high-yield issues. Reuter 

Current prospect year's grain crop Bulgaria Romania appear favorable 1986 U.S. Agriculture Department's officer Belgrade field report. The report assessment base travel country March 30 April 4. It crop condition earlier expect follow extreme dry condition fall prolong winter temperature spring. However plant development week behind normal spring condition varied greatly region report said. Fields seed optimum period fall especially receive supplemental irrigation (about 65 pct field observed) appear condition little evidence winterkill varied considerably report said. Fields lack adequate moisture fall show weak uneven stands. Spotty germination winterkill field average 10 30 pct said. Reuter 

Shr 21 ct v eight ct Net 1.5 mln v 536000 Revs 26.6 mln v 17.7 mln Nine month Shr 1.11 dlrs v 43 ct Net 7.8 mln v 3.0 mln Revs 86.9 mln v 82.9 mln NOTE:Shares adjust 2-for-1 stock split payable May 28 1987 holder record May 14 1987. 1987 3rd qtr nine month include tax loss carryforward gain 695000 dlrs 3.6 mln dlrs respectively. 1986 3rd qtr nine month include tax loss carryforward gain 260000 dlrs 1.4 mln dlrs respectively. Reuter 

Borrowing international capital market contract significantly March 23.1 billion dlrs medium long-term fund raise 3.4 billion February nine billion dlrs March 1986 Organisation Economic Cooperation Development late monthly report. Borrowing external bond market total 19.7 billion dlrs 1.1 billion below February figure. The market float rate note far setback volume offering fell 800 mln dlrs 1.4 billion February. For quarter OECD fund raise float rate bond market total billion dlrs low figure third quarter 1982. Activity straight bond market buoyant previous month equity-related offering continued benefit performance major stock markets. Exchange rate uncertainty continued major impact currency composition bonds. Dollar issue total 6.8 billion dlrs accounting 35 pct total offering borrowing particularly heavy euroyen market (3.3 billion dlrs) sterling (2.8 billion dlrs). Offerings mark bond decline 1.3 billion dlrs billion dlrs previous month whilst strong advance record euro-Australian euro-Canadian dollar sector offering exceed billion dlrs OECD said. In syndicate credit market volume loan fell 2.4 billion dlrs March 4.2 billion February. Similarly activity market note issuance back-up facility fell billion dlrs 1.5 billion. In March OECD borrower account 90 pct total borrowing. Japan large fund-raiser 4.5 billion dlrs follow U.S. With 3.9 billion Britain 2.4 billion dlrs. France West Germany Norway raise fund billion dlrs each. Borrowing develop country total billion dlrs amount February. But borrowing east European country fell 300 mln dlrs 600 mln February OECD added. REUTER 

Saudi Arabia bought 4000 tonne Malaysian refine bleach deodorise palm olein June 1/10 shipment 356 dlrs tonne cost freight Jeddah trader said. Reuter 

Shr 27 ct v Net 617000 v 550000 Loans 92.8 mln v 84.7 mln Deposits 121.9 mln v 119.4 mln Assets 155.4 mln v 152.4 mln Note: prior share due June 18 1986 conversion stock ownserhip Reuter 

Great Lakes Forest Products Ltd plan 390 mln dlr modernization expansion fine paper newsprint operation northwestern Ontario five years. It install 175 mln dlr fine paper machine Dryden 215 mln dlr newsprint machine Thunder Bay replace age machines. The Dryden machine capacity produce 175000 metric ton fine paper annually start 1989 third quarter Thunder Bay machine design capacity 240000 metric ton annually expect operation 1991. Great Lakes expect pay mainly internally generate cash flow external financing available support peak spending periods. It expansion's effect company employment level minimal. Great Lakes decision joint venture five publisher-partners construct newsprint mill northeastern Washington State come partner near future. Great Lakes' capital investment project 60 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Shr 29 ct v Net 3508000 v 2483000 NOTE: Company August 1986. 1986 figure restated. Net include loan loss provision 550000 dlrs v 203000 dlrs gain sale security 309000 dlrs v 638000 dlrs gain sale loan 403000 dlrs v 553000 dlrs. Reuter 

Kuwait agree charter tanker Soviet Union move protect oil export Mideast Gulf diplomatic source said. They agreement follow month talk Soviet Union U.S. On way secure oil export Iran start attack Kuwaiti-connected vessel retaliation Kuwait's backing Iran's enemy Iraq. Diplomats expect Soviet tanker initially reinforce flag already support Kuwait's 22-tanker fleet. The diplomat deal Moscow provide naval escort vessel "the idea protection implicit" said. They Soviet cargo ship bound Kuwait past unload arm materiel road delivery Iraq know sail escort. So none Soviet ship know attack Iran. Diplomats expect charter Soviet tanker sail Kuwait Khor Fakkan United Arab Emirates (UAE) coast short outside Strait Hormuz mouth Gulf. Reuter 

Chemical New York Corp first-quarter profit fell 16 pct largely place 1.04 billion dlrs loan Brazil non-accrual. Chemical report first-quarter net income 86.2 mln dlrs 102.6 mln earlier declare Brazilian loan non-performing cost Chemical 21 mln dlrs lose income 12 mln dlrs after-tax. A 13.3 pct jump non-interest expense 471.3 mln dlrs 415.9 mln hit bottom line. It rise mainly due staff cost associate continued growth consumer capital market investment banking activities. Excluding effect place Brazil non-accrual Chemical net income 98.2 mln dlrs 4.3 pct below 1986 earnings. Brazil suspend payment 68 billion dlrs medium- long-term debt February 20. If resume year's Chemical after-tax net 1987 reduce 51 mln dlrs. Chemical place 52 mln dlrs loan Ecuador non-accrual Quito government suspend payment foreign debt. This reduce income 1.5 mln dlrs. Chemical net income fell 476.4 mln dlrs 488.9 mln net spread narrow 3.61 pct 3.96 pct. This reflect reclassification Brazilian loan reduce federal income tax rate (which affected calculation taxabale-equivalent adjustment tax-exempt assets) narrow spread prime rate Chemical's cost funds. Foreign exchange trading profit rise 37.9 mln dlrs 27.0 mln bond trading profit drop 21.9 mln dlrs 26.2 mln. Fees trust banking service rise 146.5 mln dlrs 129.3 mln earlier Chemical said. The provision loan loss 87.2 mln dlrs compare 83.8 mln. Net loan charge-offs 86.5 mln 60.7 mln leave allowance loan loss 672.6 mln dlrs quarter's 1.74 pct loan outstanding compare 594.3 mln 1.50 pct earlier. Non-accruing loan March 2.39 billion dlrs (1.35 billion exclude Brazil) compare 1.35 billion 1986 1.22 billion March 1986. Reuter 

Borrowing international capital market contract significantly March 23.1 billion dlrs medium long-term fund raise 3.4 billion February nine billion dlrs March 1986 Organisation Economic Cooperation Development late monthly report. Borrowing external bond market total 19.7 billion dlrs 1.1 billion below February figure. The market float rate note far setback volume offering fell 800 mln dlrs 1.4 billion February. Reuter 

Genetics Institute Inc earlier reporting increase quarter net loss expect incur loss fiscal 1987 "that somewhat high report fiscal 1986." It loss 4504000 dlrs fiscal 1986 end November 30 compare fiscal 1985 loss 173200 dlrs. The company loss result strategic decision invest prudent level equity development product company manufacture bring market. Genetics earlier quarter end February 28 loss rise 1309000 dlrs year-ago loss 937000 dlrs. Reuter 

Investor Albert Kahn statement head increase stake Trans-Lux Corp 8.9 pct 8.1 pct fully dilute basis. Kahn indicate filing Securities Exchange Commission bought additional 7300 Trans-Lux common share 100000 dlrs nine pct convertible subordinate debenture due 2005 convertible additional 6803 shares. Kahn consider seek representation Trans-Lux board start proxy contest connection upcoming annual meeting. Kahn seek examination Trans-Lux shareholder list corporate book record Delaware law. Trans-Lux Connecticut concern lease teleprinter display unit brokerage office airport places. Kahn Miami insurance executive investor. Reuter 

Period end February 28 Shr 40 ct v 15 ct Net 1747000 v 775000 Revs 13.2 mln v 13.3 mln Avg shrs 4321376 v 5148318 Year Shr 67 ct v 67 ct Net 3300000 v 3299000 Revs 49.5 mln v 50.2 mln Avg shrs 4895788 v 4951177 Note: 1986 819000 dlr tax provision 660000 dlr tax credit 1985 559000 dlr credit anticipate income tax settlement 1970 331000 dlr tax provision Reuter 

National Computer Systems Inc board authorize company repurchase 2.0 mln share common stock market. The company currently 19 mln share outstanding. It share retain employee stock purchase plan stock option plan corporate use. Reuter 

Shr 51 ct v Net 4661000 v 2499000 NOTE: Net include security gain 663000 dlrs v 1173000 dlrs. Company December 1986. Reuter 

The Michigan Attorney General reach settlement Michigan Bell Telephone Co subsidiary American Information Technologies Corp reduce rate result 79.6 mln dlrs low revenue Michigan Bell. The settlement reflect Michigan Bell's reduce federal income tax result tax reform legislation submit approval Public Service Commission Attorney General's office said. The low rate expect effective July Michigan Bell's tax rate fall 34 pct 46 pct. Reuter 

Shr 11 ct v 12 ct Net 301820 v 248419 Revs 12.1 mln v 10.2 mln Avg shrs 2855966 v 2033881 Reuter 

Shr 21 ct v 18 ct Net 2256000 v 1915000 Revs 38.2 mln v 35.3 mln Nine mths Shr 62 ct v 56 ct Net 6474000 v 5808000 Revs 125.9 mln v 112.3 mln Backlog nine mln v six mln NOTE: Share adjust five-for-four stock split June 1986. Reuter 

Command Airways Inc March load factor rise 44.6 pct 40.8 pct March 1986. Revenue passenger mile rise 43.2 pct March 4573200 3192700 34.3 pct year-to-date 41.6 mln 30.9 mln company said. Available seat mile increase 30.8 pct March 10.2 mln 7832800 25.9 pct 10 month 101.4 mln 80.6 mln. Year-to-date load factor rise 41 pct 38.4 pct said. Reuter 

Swift Independent Packing Co agree principle sell Huron South Dakota pork plant Huron Dressed Beef undisclosed terms. Completion propose transaction subject Huron's ability hire experienced force competitive rate receive government approval purchase operation plant Swift said. Reuter 

Shr primary 88 ct v 83 ct Shr dilute 84 ct v 78 ct Net 8869000 v 8176000 Avg Assets 2.62 billion v 2.42 billion Deposits 2.06 billion v 1.80 billion Reuter 

Primary dealer U.K. Government gilt require underwrite government's offering security auction begin Mid-May Bank England said. In official notice release Bank "There formal informal underwriting arrangement auction Bank encourages gilt-edged market maker commitment market participate actively auction process." The Bank originally believe favour require dealer underwrite auction pattern U.S. Treasury market. However Treasury believe baulk request 27 market maker allotment commission discourage large institutional investor place order stock directly Bank England deny primary dealer customers. Commission pass customer order via primary dealer make expensive buy directly Bank. Market source Bank discussion dealer upcoming auction agree allotment commission reasonable dealer concurrent commitment buy auction regardless market conditions. Indeed Bank gilt dealer believe disappointed Treasury agree plan. However paper Bank suggest condition apply auction abandon modify future sale gilt prove inefficient unwieldy. Among item document Bank auction consist 1.25 billion stg conventional short-dated stock maturity seven less. Subsequent auction held 1987-88 financial billion stg long-dated stock have maturity 15 longer billion stg medium date stock seven 15 maturity. The remainder gilt-edged funding met traditional tap offering stock via government broker. To protect buyer newly auction stock Bank agree establish so-called fallow period 28-day period agrees issue stock type necessarily resume sell stock fallow period expires. In event price offer stock sell substantially line market condition Bank agree stock onto books. The bank free sell stock fallow period price below minimum tender price. The Bank initially auction allot bid price basis bidder allot stock price bid. However Bank reserve limit money market maker buying 25 pct single auction. The Bank widely believe concerned prevent single market maker corner stock drive price up. The Bank repeatedly signal intention prevent dealer corner market stock issue additional stock occasion market shortage. The Bank agree publish information auction result soon sale complete widely expect day. Information release include amount stock allot term competitive non-competitive bid high low average price successful bids. REUTER 

Utilization offshore mobile rig Gulf Mexico fell 0.5 percentage 35.0 pct week total 82 work 152 idle Offshore Data Services said. In European-Mediterranean utilization remain unchanged 46.1 pct rise percentage point previous weeks. Out total 154 rig 71 work 83 idle said. Worldwide utilization offshore rig steady 53.8 pct reflect 391 rig work 336 idled. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve enter U.S. Government security market arrange 1.5 billion dlrs customer repurchase agreement Fed spokesman said. Dealers Federal fund trading 6-1/2 pct Fed temporary indirect supply reserve banking system. Most expect Fed supply reserve directly via System repurchase agreement add indirectly billion dlrs customer repurchase agreements. Some believe Fed add few reserve need keep upward pressure rate dollar. Reuter 

(Burroughs-Wellcome Inc) plan invest 10 mln dlrs research development-related activity five change plan Canada's patent act law. The company increase commitment clinical research patent act change provide far protection patent right planned. Reuter 

Shr 54 ct v 51 ct Net 2151000 v 2439000 Sales 90.3 mln v 96.8 mln Avg shrs 3960000 v 4782000 Reuter 

Shr 15 ct v 14 ct Net 2028000 v 1879000 Revs 32.1 mln v 29.5 mln Reuter 

Software Services America Inc board extend expiration date warrant August 31 April 30. Reuter 

Shr 34 ct v 32 ct Net 2891844 v 2666278 Revs 13.7 mln v 12.7 mln Reuter 

Bache Securities Inc 80 pct-owned Prudential-Bache Securities Inc unit Prudential Insurance Co America change name April 15 Prudential-Bache Securities Canada Ltd major expansion Canada. The investment dealer expansion involve increase research retail staff Canadian branch year-end enhance corporate financing ability. Bache chief executive George McGough told news conference Bache expand 20 mln Canadian dlr capital base seven time years. McGough move result propose June 30 deregulation Ontario's security industry lift exist restriction growth foreign dealer Bache allow access U.S. parent's 134 billion U.S. dlrs capital product offer Prudential Insurance Co Canada own Bache's U.S. parent. Stressing company growth internal McGough told reporter "that game plan call acquisition" say Bache recently reject merger overture investment dealer Canada. McGough decline identify name dealer approach Bache. He Bache hop rank top five Canadian investment dealer years. It rank 14th. McGough voiced confidence Bache's plan unaffected delay past June 30 implementation financial deregulation result ongoing dispute Canadian Ontario government regulatory jusisdiction. He regulator already approve name change indicate approve Bache's expansion. Reuter 

Shr 38 ct v 36 ct prior Pay July 31 Record June 23 Reuter 

Charterhouse Group International> specializes leveraged buyout purchasing troubled company raise 310 mln dlrs capital compete acquisition market U.S. companies. Charterhouse form Charterhouse Mezzanine Partners limited partnership capitalizaed 152 mln dlrs provide subordinate financing leveraged buyout transactions. Charterhouse recently receive infusion 100 mln dlrs capital shareholders. In addition company complete form Recovery Group limited partnership establish invest distressed companies. Then Recovery Group co-managed Charterhouse investor Jay Goldsmith Harry Freund capitalize 58 mln dlrs investor Europe America company said. Charterhouse acquire equity debt security distressed companies. Reuter 

Mthly div 6.6 ct v 6.9 ct prior Pay April 30 Record April 15 NOTE: Franklin michigan Insured Tax-Free Income Fund. Reuter 

Mthly div eight ct v 7.1 ct prior Pay April 30 Record April 15 NOTE: Franklin High Yield Tax-Free Income Fund. Reuter 

Franklin Pennsylvania Tax-Free Income Fund board declare initial monthly dividend six ct share payable April 30 holder record April 15. Reuter 

General Partners Texas partnership recently end bid GenCorp Inc told Securities Exchange Commission sell nearly remain 8.6 pct stake company. General Partners sell 1930500 share GenCorp April 10 118.25 dlrs share market transaction New York Stock Exchange. It sale leaf 108 GenCorp common shares. The partnership include Wagner Brown Midland Texas Irvine Calif.-based AFG Industries Inc week drop 100 dlr share hostile tender offer. Reuter 

Franklin Pennsylvania Investors U.S. Government Securities Fund Fund board declare initial monthly dividend 7.8 ct share payable April 30 holder record April 15. Reuter 

Duff Phelps lower senior debt rating Mellon Bank Corp. DP-8 (High BBB) DP-6 (middle A) lower prefer stock rating DP-9 (middle BBB) DP-7 (low A). These rating change affect approximately 607 mln dlrs securities. In addition certificate deposit rating Mellon Bank lower Duff minus Duff one. The rating affect approximately 2.7 bln dlrs CDs. "A sharp deterioration asset quality" result "significant" first-quarter loss cite change. Reuter 

GAF Corp study agreement Merrill Lynch Capital Partners Borg-Warner Corp private 4.23 billion dlr transaction GAF spokesman said. The spokesman far comment. Analysts speculation GAF offer Chicago-based plastic automobile part company. Borg-Warner's stock rise 7/8 49-1/4 above Merrill Lynch 48.50 dlrs share tender offer price. Merrill Lynch Capital Partners unit Merrill Lynch Co tender 89 pct Borg-Warner offering package cash security balance shares. GAF offer 46 dlrs share previously. It hold 19.9 pct Borg-Warner's stock. Reuter 

National Westminster Bank USA high loan core deposit volume substantial increase net income contribute 16 pct rise first-quarter earnings 17.7 mln dlrs 15.3 mln report earlier. The earnings gain despite 1.5 mln dlr reduction income result place Brazilian loan non-accrual. Net income total 92.5 mln dlrs compare 91.7 mln dlrs 1986 period loan mostly middle market business increase 896 mln dlrs. But gain offset low level rates. Provision loan loss rise 13.8 mln dlrs 13.0 mln earlier. At March 31 allowance loan loss 114.2 mln dlrs versus 94.8 mln March 1986. Non-accrual loan rise 286 mln dlrs 132 mln quarter 1986 largely 119 mln dlrs loan Brazil non-accrual status. The bank loan remain non-accrual remainder net income 1987 reduce 4.9 mln dlrs. National Westminster Bank USA wholly-owned subsidiary National Westminster Bank PLC. Reuter 

Shr loss 26 ct v loss ct Net loss 699000 v loss 20617 Revs 883000 v 1.1 mln Year Shr loss 62 ct v loss eight ct Net loss 1.7 mln v loss 185003 Revs 3.6 mln v 4.5 mln Reuter 

Qtly div 57-1/2 ct v 54-1/2 ct prior qtr Pay May 15 Record May 1 Reuter 

Carlo De Benedetti's food company Industrie Buitoni Perugina Spa acquire Italian food Vismara. Buitoni statement Vismara 1986 sale 181 billion lira net profit 11 billion lira employ 950 subsidaries. Buitoni disclose financial detail acquisition. De Benedetti week negotiate purchase unidentified Italian food firm. Vismara primarily produce variety pork products. "The acquisition represent diversification market sector annual consumption 8500 billion lire" Buitoni said. Buitoni consolidated revenue quarter 429 billion lira 51 pct comparable 1986 period. As report Buitoni's consolidated revenue rise 1623 billion lira 1177 billion 1985. Net profit rise 18.5 billion lira 448 mln lira 1985. Reuter 

McGraw-Hill Inc sell McGraw-Hill Book Co South Africa Pty Ltd subsidiary local management undisclosed amount cash halt sale product service South Africa. The company divestiture follow resolution board February cite increase political unrest South Africa refusal South African government abolish apartheid system. Reuter 

Oak Industries Inc agree buy stock Electronic Technologies Inc New York undisclosed amount cash. Electronic Technologies manufacture quartz crystal component Oak said. It acquisition ongoing stategy restructure core business cost reduction program purchase compatible companies. Reuter 

Shr 51 ct v Net 4661000 v 2499000 NOTE: Includes net security gain 663000 dlrs v 1.2 mln dlrs from. Company convert stock ownership December 1986. Reuter 

U.S. Trust Co raise broker loan rate 7-3/4 pct 7-1/2 pct effective immediately. Bankers Trust Co BT> quote broker loan rate publicly raise rate 7-1/2 pct earlier today. Reuter 

Firestone Tire Rubber Co Chairman John Nevin enter employment agreement allow continue executive consultant company becomes 65 February 1992. Firestone Nevin agree remain chief executive officer board elect successor. The company immediately available comment. In release Firestone Nevin serf chief executive paid current salary continue eligible supplemental compensation. Firestone Nevin serve consultant company chief executive found Nevin becomes 65. Firestone agree period Nevin paid fee pension entitle retired. It Nevin agree engage competitive becomes 67. On February 17 Firestone grant Nevin option buy 100000 share company's common 34.19 dlrs share. Reuter 

Crazy Eddie Inc board adopt defensive shareholder right plan reacived inquiry friendly merger. It plan shareholder record April 21 receive purchase circumstance price 42 dlrs 0.01 prefer share common share held. The right expire April 9 1997. The company right exercisable 20 day party acquire 20 pct Crazy Eddie common stock announce bid 30 pct more. Adds drop right expiration. Reuter 

Shr eight ct v one-half ct Net 508000 v 21000 Revs 7.2 mln v 7.4 mln Nine mths Shr 28 ct v 11 ct Net 1523000 v 567000 Revs 26.2 mln v 22.6 mln Note: period end February 28. REUTER Reuter 

Texcan Corp> reach agreement principle major creditor reorganization plan lift bankruptcy. The plan proposes Texcan pay bank debt partially 15 mln dlr secure obligation pay trade debt mln dlrs satisfy subordinate debenture holder issuance 45 pct stock reorganize corporation said. Texcan bank debt paid United Bancorp Arizona's UBAZ> United Bank Arizona Security Pacific's Corp's SPC> Security Pacific Bank. Subordinated bondholder subscribe buy additional 40 pct common stock reorganize corporation mln dlrs arrangement announce week Texscan said. Total debt claim file Chapter 11 proceed 110 mln dlrs said. Texscan exist stock extinguish propose reorganization plan. The company file reorganization Nov 22 1985. Reuter 

Nomura International Ltd use special purpose issue vehicle "Lives 2 Ltd" repackage Denmark's 7-1/8 pct dollar straight issue launch Nomura January 8 due 1992 zero coupon 17 billion yen bond price 82-1/4 pct. The note swap agreement secure charge 97 mln dlrs Denmark bond. The bond due March 5 1992. Payment date issue list Luxembourg April 24 coupon short. Fees comprise 85 basis point sell 70 management underwriting. Denominations 10 mln yen. REUTER 

(Rhone Poulenc Pharma Inc) plan spend 29 mln dlrs five research development Canada. It investment depends passage federal government bill proposes great protection holder drug patents. The company spend 7.9 mln dlrs upgrade Montreal operations. It patent law drug company reasonable protection generic drug copying compounds. Reuter 

Texaco Petroleum Maatschaapij (Netherlands) BV operation unaffected yesterday's move Texaco Inc TX.N> file protection Chapter 11 U.S. Bankruptcy code. A Texaco spokesman Dutch unit wholly own Texaco Inc hold company financial relationship bank distribution facility refinery bought crude oil products. There negative reaction trading partner U.S. Move negative influence publicity said. "The Dutch operation dependent U.S. For money products. We inform customer affected way" spokesman said. He trading partner demand stricter credit term normal international oil markets. Spot market trader Dutch arm major company act usual towards Texaco maintain contact headquarters' credit control offices. One trader company hop meet representative Texaco personally clarify position. Reuter 

Portugal's consumer price rise 1.4 pct March pct increase February 1.2 pct rise March 1986 National Statistics Institute said. The consumer price index (base 100 1976) rise 772.0 761.3 February compare 703.4 March 1986. This give year-on-year March inflation rate 9.8 pct 9.5 pct February 12.2 pct March 1986. Measured annual average rate inflation March 10.9 pct compare 11.1 pct February. The government forecast annual inflation eight pct year. REUTER 

Dest Corp expect 17 pct increase revenue fourth quarter end March 31 compare 4.8 mln dlrs report quarter earlier. The company increase due increase demand PC Scan product family. The scan product desktop publishing system Dest said. Reuter 

Shr 22 ct v 18 ct Net 803708 v 642534 Sales 21.0 ln v 18.8 mln NOTE: Per share figure adjust ten pct stock dividend paid August 1986. Reuter 

Resdel Industries San/Bar Corp agree merge San/Bar Resdel. The arrangement call San/Bar spin-off asset Break-Free division shareholder exchange share Resdel stock ratio Resdel share San/Bar share held Resdel said. Reuter 

Midlantic Corp agree acquire County Bancorp 23 mln dlrs agreement call County Trust Co County Bancorp subsidiary merge Midlantic National Bank/North. Midlantic pay 83.73 dlrs share cash 2.36 time County Bancorp's March 31 book value County's 2760000 share outstanding. It receive option principal shareholder 40 pct County's outstanding. The acquisition expect third quarter 1987 subject regulatory shareholder approvals. Reuter 

Net 646000 v 470000 Assets 173.0 mln v 152.9 mln NOTE:Quarter end March 31. The company complete conversion mutual stock form October 1986 raise 14.1 mln dlrs net proceeds sale 2.3 mln share common stock. Reuter 

Period end December 28. Shr nil v loss six ct Net loss 6319 v loss 265651 Revs 1117778 v 1090001 Avg shrs 6874383 v 4323614 Year Shr nil v loss 10 ct Net profit 4323 v loss 432458 Revs 4711350 v 4256708 Avg shrs 6837871 v 4322816 Reuter 

The United Automobile Workers Union UAW ask local leader renew drive high wage upcoming bargaining car major industry acknowledge futher job loss inevitable traditional U.S. manufacturing shrinks. The UAW begin bargaining summer contract cover 380000 General Motors Corp world's large corporation nearly 110000 Ford Motor Co U.S. automaker. National UAW labor contract company expire midnight September 14. The union expect chose company strike target September concentrate efforts. UAW president Owen Bieber loudly cheer 3000 local delegate special bargaining strategy convention yesterday declare union ready "war" major auto maker support goals. "It take peace ... it's UAW ready it. War insecurity layoff" UAW chief said. In 101-page document propose 1987 collective bargaining leadership 1.1 mln member union urge "full resumption traditional wage formula" "a top priority round bargaining." But union concedes increase foreign competition technology shift low-cost offshore production U.S. manufacturer continue cut worker motor vehicle agricultural equipment industries. Union leader told Reuters 1987 round bargaining GM Ford difficult 51-year history union view GM's announce goal close plant deems non-competitive increase purchase part outside supplier massive reduce cost 10 billion dlrs reverse profit decline suffer years. At Ford record 3.3 billion dlrs profit swell cash reserve past eight billion dlrs analyst company's healthy position tempt target union drive increase wages. Labor executive GM Ford oppose attempt return annual wage increase drop 1982 Detroit-based industry mire deep recession. But UAW point pct pay increase implement contract negotiate Chrysler Corp 1985 strike intend seek full reinstatement annual percentage wage increase year's bargaining GM Ford. Reuter 

Shr 78 ct v 86 ct Net 265.0 mln v 283.0 mln Revs 3.7 billion v 3.6 billion Avg shrs 329.0 mln v 319.0 mln Reuter 

Mitel Corp introduce digital telephone switch system additional application software current product line. The SX-2000s digital private branch exchange small version SX-2000 direct line capacity 100 500 telephone extensions. The product small SX-50 30 100 telephone software specification design hotel motel industry. Mitel developed software package "extend data capability SX-2000 speed application found IBM-type environment." Reuter 

A shareholder consist foreign investment firm investor raise stake Scandinavia Fund Inc 2607900 share 40.0 pct total outstanding 2309700 share 35.4 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission consider informal offer Scandinavia Fund President Bjorn Carlson March 31 grant representation company's board. The include VBI Corp Turks Caicos Islands investment firm Ingemar Rydin Industritillbehor AB Swedish investment firm Erik Martin Vik Norwegian investor Vik's son Alexander. The VBI elder Vik bought combine 298200 Scandinavia Fund common share March 13 price range 9.500 10.000 dlrs share. Reuter 

Shr 79 ct v 73 ct Net 22901000 v 21042000 Sales 336.1 mln v 334.1 mln Reuter 

Triton Energy Corp proven reserve Villespedue oil field France's Paris Basin estimate total 67.5 mln barrel March 39 pct 48.7 mln barrel May 31 1986. Triton 60 pct own Triton Europe Plc> subsidiary 50 pct field locate 50 mile east Paris. The 50 pct held Total Exploration S.A.> field's operator. Reuter 

International Business Machines Corp start aggressively industry analyst company face tough round fight stop two-year earnings slump. "I be impressed what's happen IBM I time" PaineWebber analyst Stephen Smith. "But they're wood yet" added. At 1.30 dlrs share IBM's first-quarter net income easily topped estimate Wall Street range dollar 1.20 dlrs. Most analyst pleasantly surprised IBM's performance. But indicate IBM's chance full recovery hinge key factor whose impact year. These include success IBM's personal computer line introduce week ago 9370 minicomputer begin volume shipment July. In addition IBM full benefit early-retirement cost-cutting move emerge progresses. Analysts note IBM chairman John F. Akers relatively upbeat assess company's outlook nearly year. "Although worldwide economic situation remains unsettled encourage sign business" Akers point high first-quarter shipments. "We remain optimistic prospect industry IBM" said. "Akers encouraging" PaineWebber's Smith. A weak dollar low tax rate strong mainframe computer sale contribute better-than-expected first-quarter result analyst said. "Shipments 3090 mainframe strong March" weak January February Ulric Weil Washington-based Weil Associates. Sales top-of-the-line mainframe commonly call Sierras "bailed quarter" Weil add "If continue auger rest year." REUTER...^M 

BankEast Corp BENH> Superior Court enjoin Suncook Bank> deliver notice shareholder meeting produce shareholder list. The effectively prevents Suncook hold shareholder meeting BankEast copy shareholder list BankEast said. The give BankEast eye takeover bank 30 day communicate shareholder Suncook said. BankEast substantial stockholder Suncook Bank Merrimack County Superior Court. At Bank New Hampshire Corp's BNHC> Bank New Hampshire bid Suncook Bank. Reuter 

Oper shr loss 20 ct v loss 63 ct Oper net loss 439000 v loss 1347000 Sales 6303000 v 5062000 Six mths Oper shr loss 43 ct v loss 1.02 dlrs Oper net loss 934000 v loss 2333000 Sales 12.1 mln v 9878000 Note: oper data include 1986 loss discontinue operation 60000 dlrs ct shr qtr 151000 dlrs seven ct shr six mths. Reuter 

Japanese crusher bought 3000 4000 tonne Canadian rapeseed export overnight half May/first half June shipment trade source said. Reuter 

Irving Bank Corp six pct drop first-quarter net income earlier largely result place medium- long-term loan borrower Brazil Ecuador non-accrual status. Income month fell 28.60 mln dlrs 30.43 mln 1986 period. Earnings share drop 1.51 dlrs 1.62. Irving 215 mln dlrs Brazilian 33 mln dlrs Ecuadorean loan non-accrual reduce first-quarter net income total 4.4 mln dlrs tax. Irving estimate full net reduce 15.3 mln dlrs tax cash payment receive loan remainder 1987. Also adversely affect earnings loss trading security high non-interest expense partly offset increase trust income profit foreign exchange trading investment security gain bank said. The allowance loan loss 224.8 mln dlrs 185.2 mln earlier. The provision loan loss 21.8 mln versus 19.5 mln quarter 1986. Reuter 

Alza Corp plan offering Europe 75 mln dlrs principal amount 15-year convertible subordinate debentures. The company expect annual coupon rate bond 5-1/2 pct 5-3/4 pct. It bond convertible Alza common stock expect premium 17 22 pct share price pricing date. Alza expect debenture list Luxembourg Stock Exchange. Reuter 

Morgan Stanley (Jersey) Ltd issue 45000 cover equity warrant exercisable share Japan Synthetic Rubber Co Ltd issue price 212 Swiss franc warrant lead manager Morgan Stanley SA said. The initial exercise price 494 yen share final maturity February 4 1992. The issue price represent premium 6.57 pct stock's closing price 653 yen. Each warrant exercisable 100 share common stock Japan Synthetic Rubber. The exercise period June 5 1987 February 4 1992. REUTER 

Qtly div 7-1/2 ct v six ct prior Pay June 3 Record May 15 NOTE: Full name Allegheny Western Energy Corp. Reuter 

Standard Oil Co contract award CBS Engineering Inc> drilling production platform instal Ewing Bank Block 826 Gulf Mexico Standard Mobil Corp 40 pct interest. Standard Standard Oil Production Co subsidiary operate platform design produce 15000 barrel oil 50 mln cubic foot gas daily. The platform expect instal summer 1988. Other owner Kerr-McGee Corp KMG> 16.66 pct Prudential Insurance Co America> 3.34 pct. Reuter 

Shr profit ct v loss 28 ct Net profit 23000 v loss 725000 Sales 20.6 mln v 18.5 mln Avg shrs 3959011 v 2608571 Reuter 

The February monthly merchandise trade figure report Tuesday Commerce Department basis reflect recent data avoid future revision monthly figure Commerce official said. The overall January deficit 14.8 billion dlrs revise February figure final official said. Previously initial monthly figure revise subsequent month lag report compile final estimate import exports. The reporting February trade data delayed week permit gathering late figure import export clearer picture monthly trade balance. Reuter 

MacAndrews Forbes Group> Revlon Group Inc REV> enter definitive mergewr agreement MacAndrews acquire Revlon 20.10 dlrs common share cash. MacAndrews increase offer purchase Revlon common share 20.10 dlrs share April 1 offer 18.50 dlrs share. Following consummation offer unit MacAndrews merge Revlon remain share convert receive 20.10 dlrs share cash company said. Revlon board director unanimously approve merger agreement. MacAndrews Revlon reach settlement plaintiff pending litigation challenge acquisition share MacAnrews. The company tender offer withdrawal right expireon Tuesday April 28 unless extended. MacAndrews promptly file revise tender offer material Securities Exchange Commission. Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc act dealer-manager offer company said. Revlon currently 42 mln share outstanding. The current offer price 782 mln dlrs company spokesman previous offer 720 mln dlrs. On April 1 MacAndrews Forbes own Ronald Perelman offer 18.50 dlrs share 63 pct Revlon share already own. Since offer dozen shareholder lawsuit brought Revlon allege original offer low. But company lawsuit settle amend offer. Reuter 

Roland International Corp Coconut Grove Fla. real estate development company cut stake Intermagnetics General Corp 308400 share 4.8 pct total outstanding 358400 share 5.6 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Roland sell 50000 share Feb 4 5.13 dlrs each. As Roland's stake Intermagnetics General below five pct require report far dealing company's stock. Reuter 

Data Technology Corp register Securities Exchange Commission initial offering 1700000 share common stock. It share offer company anticipate price eight ten dlrs share. The offering manage Hambrecht Quist Inc Smith Barney Harris Upham Co Inc. Data Technology design develops market intelligent storage controller chip set primarily IBM-compatible personal computers. Reuter 

DHL Worldwide Express> add 35 overseas 10 domestic service center delivery network. The private air express company addition include German Democratic Republic (East Germany) bring eight Eastern Bloc country serves. Reuter 

USG Corp proxy May 13 annual meeting ask shareholder increase authorize common share 300 mln 100 mln prefer share 36 mln 12 mln. The company insufficient share available two-for-one stock split plan action. It availability additional share discourage attempt obtain control company. But USG unaware pending takeover attempt. As April 1 1987 USG 51128191 share common stock outstanding. It 784350 share reserve issuance various stock option plans. Of 12 mln authorize share prefer stock 124641 share 1.80 dlrs Convertible Preferred Stock issue outstanding additional 6800000 share reserve issuance Junior Participating Preferred Stock Series A 1.00 dlr par value share. USG shareholder approve amendment restate certificate incorporation include stagger election director requirement 80 pct vote merger asset sale leases. The company ask shareholder approve amendment limit liability directors. Reuter 

Shr 40 ct v 31 ct Net 5151000 v 4078000 Reuter 

Dataproducts Corp sign letter intent acquire Imaging Solutions Inc unit Reliance Electric Co undisclosed terms. This acquisition right proprietary solid liquid ink technology developed joint venture operate Exxon Corp XON> Dataproducts said. It Imaging Solutions formerly name Exxon Printing Systems Inc Reliance Electric Co subsidiary. But Reliance recently become independent company result leveraged buyout former owner Exxon. Reuter 

Jannock Ltd Jannock Imaging Co Ltd unit acquire 50 pct stake Arthurs-Jones Lithographing Ltd Toronto undisclosed terms. It acquisition lift Jannock Imaging revenue 50 mln dlrs year. It specify Arthurs-Jones' 1986 revenues. Reuter 

Presidential Airways Continental Jet Express begin daily non-stop service Dulles International Airport Akron/Canton Ohio Lexington/Frankfort Kentucky. Presidential reiterate marketing agreement Texas Air Corp's TEX> Continental Airlines Jan 12 call Presidential Continental Jet Express. Reuter 

Northern Trust Corp file Securities Exchange Commission offer 150 mln dlrs debt securities. The company sell security underwriter include Goldman Sachs Co directly purchasers. Proceeds purpose include acquisition refund outstanding security repay short-term debt bank hold company said. Reuter 

Northern Trust Corp file Securities Exchange Commission shelf registration statement cover 150 mln dlrs debt. Proceeds future acquisition repayment outstanding debt corporate purposes. The company Goldman Sachs Co underwrite deal. Reuter 

Shr 30 ct v 17 ct Net 2526000 v 1452000 Revs 71.9 mln v 25.2 mln Year Shr 1.20 dlrs v 68 ct Net 10.2 mln v 4738000 Revs 291.5 mln v 83.0 mln Avg shrs 8511000 v 6983000 NOTE: Current period include gain 299000 dlrs qtr 1.2 mln dlrs change pension accounting. Year-ago shr figure restate 3-for-2 split paid June 1986 January 1987. Reuter 

Pacific Nuclear Systems Inc Nuclear Packaging Inc unit won contract U.S. Department Energy worth 2.3 mln dlrs. The company initial phase contract award 1.2 mln dlrs optional phase 1.1 mln dlrs. Under pact Pacific Nuclear design license fabricate truck cask trailer defense wastes. The contract wil begin immediately cask delivery plan May 1989. Reuter 

Aequitron Medical Inc wrongful death suit company name defendant voluntarily dismiss prejudice plaintiffs. The suit ask mln dlrs damage originally file U.S. district court Atlanta August 1986 said. It allege defective performance Aequitron respiration heart rate monitor result death infant October 1985. Under term settlement plaintiff release right far legal proceeding Aequitron said. In return Aequitron agree release plaintiff claim cost attorney fees. "The dismissal prejudice plaintiffs' retraction claim Aequitron support original contention suit merit" company said. Reuter 

Electrohome Ltd agree sell asset computer service sector AABEX service division Canadian General Electric Co Ltd CGE.TO>. Terms disclosed. The closing date expect May 1 1987. Reuter 

Period end February 28. Shr 14 ct v 10 ct Net 741000 v 510000 Revs 5980000 v 4836000 Six Mths Shr 29 ct v 20 ct Net 1556000 v 1080000 Revs 12.2 mln v 9214000 Reuter 

Laser Photonics Inc complete previously announce sale 615385 share 18 pct common stock investor mln dlrs. A 400000 dlrs loan investor repaid proceeds said. It restructure board include designate investor include Pierre Schoenheimer Roger Kirk Leonard Lichter. Reuter 

AmSouth Bancorp issue 3166000 share stock acquire First Tuskaloosa Corp. Under previously announce merger agreement Amsouth offer 66 dlrs share Amsouth stock First Tuskaloosa. The company First Tuskaloosa shareholder receive 1.978825 share Amsouth stock First Tuskaloosa share held merger effect April 17. First Tuskaloosa asset 425 mln dlrs. Amsouth's asset six billion dlrs. Reuter 

Shr 25 ct v 23 ct Net 670105 v 599107 Revs 21.4 mln v 20.1 mln Reuter 

Royal Palm Savings name Joseph Burgoon president position vacant Jay Rosen left December 1985 pursue ventures. Burgoon recently serve executive vice president chief operating officer Cardinal Federal Savings Bank Cleveland. Reuter 

Hadson Corp complete acquisition 85 pct Seaxe Energy Corp's SEAX.O> common stock 182415 share Hadson's stock. Seaxe engage international oil gas exploration development primarily Paris basin France. Reuter 

Hugh Keith Mobile Enterprises Ltd complete acquisition 59 acre land adjacent mobile park near Stuart Fla. 850000 dlrs cash notes. Reuter 

Arrays Inc complete merger Haba Systems Inc. Terms merger call share Arrays exchange share Haba transaction value 4.1 mln dlrs company said. Both company produce market microcomputer software. Reuter 

Consul Restaurant Corp extend deadline exchange offer 13 pct convertible debenture due 1992 1700 CDT April 24. The offer originally schedule expire April 13. It investor response offer favorable high exchange level need company meet 90 pct acceptance level. On March 16 Consul offer exchange 1000 dlr value bond 10 share prefer stock convertible Dec 1 1987 total 500 share common stock. In addition tender non-tendering investor receive bonds' May One payment common stock. Reuter 

Michael Foods Inc newly form multi-regional food processing distribution company name Richard Olson president chief executive officer. Olson former vice president food service Pillsbury Co PSY> recently president Fil-Mor Express Inc transportation company. Michael Foods' subsidiary 1986 combine sale 153.3 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Mthly div 6.5 ct v 6.5 ct prior Pay April 30 Reord April 15 NOTE: Franklin Massachusetts Insured Tax-Free Income Fund. Reuter 

Mthly div 6.6 ct v 6.6 ct prior Pay April 30 Reord April 15 NOTE: Franklin Minnesota Insured Tax-Free Income Fund. Reuter 

Mthly div 7.1 ct v 7.1 ct prior Pay April 30 Reord April 15 NOTE: Franklin Insured Tax-Free Income Fund. Reuter 

Mthly div 6.1 ct v 6.1 ct prior Pay April 30 Reord April 15 NOTE: Franklin Ohio Insured Tax-Free Income Fund. Reuter 

Mthly div 7.1 ct v 7.1 ct prior Pay April 30 Reord April 15 NOTE: Franklin Puerto Rico Tax-Free Income Fund. Reuter 

Mthly div 6.5 ct v 6.5 ct prior Pay April 30 Reord April 15 NOTE: Franklin California Insured Tax-Free Income Fund. Reuter 

The Bank England step reporting requirement primary dealer U.K. Government gilt when-issued trading period date auction announce date sale actually held. In document auction Bank "The Bank content (when-issued) trading cevelop subject condition particular predential supervision credit risk gilt-edged market maker Inter-dealer broker exposed." The Bank widely expect require dealer report wehn-issued trading position daily basis. When-issued trading present unusual risk dealer buying sell security technically exist uncertainty issued. Still physical delivery present credit risk well. The Bank widely expect expand reporting requiremenmts unsettled trade require firm report unsettled when-issued trade occur. Normally unsettled trade report day occur. REUTER 

Dome Petroleum Ltd share move high U.S. Canada TransCanada PipeLines Ltd TRP> 4.3 billion Canadian dlr bid Dome Dome talk unidentified companies. Market speculation potential bidder Canadian company DuPont's DD> Conoco Atlantic Richfield Co ARC> mention possibility Wilf Gobert Peters Co Ltd said. Dome rise 1/4 1-1/8 American Stock Exchange. TransCanada PipeLines 1/4 15-3/4 New York Stock Exchange. Dome active stock Toronto exchange 1.50 dlrs share 37 cts. Gobert characterize market action Dome "awfully optimistic" investor hop compete offer shareholders. TransCanada PipeLines' offer Dome management shareholders. However proposes issue equity subsidiary operate Dome assets. Current Dome shareholder 20 pct subsidiary. Reuter 

Shr 13 ct v 47 ct Net 13492000 v 46417000 Revs 720.2 mln v 793.6 mln Avg shrs 99085000 v 96804000 NOTE: Per-share result reflect payment prefer dividend requirement Reuter 

Hoechst Celanese Corp recently form subsidiary Hoechst AG Frankfurt West Germany file Securities Exchange Commission 500 mln dlr debt offering repay merger debt. Hoechst acquire Celanese Corp Feb 27 plan offer 200 mln dlrs note due 1997 300 mln dlrs debenture due 2017 repay debt incur takeover. A lead First Boston Corp underwrite offering company said. Reuter 

Shr 15 ct v 13 ct Net 8753000 v 7804000 Avg shrs 32.6 mln v 23.2 mln NOTE: Includes gain 4.1 mln dlrs 12 ct v 3.3 mln dlrs 15 ct tax loss carryforwards. Reuter 

Clark Copy International Corp acquire majority Datagraph GMBH Lich West Germany. The acquisition Clark Copy's majority own subsidiary Interactive Computer Aids Norway. No price disclose acquisition. Clark Copy worldwide sale Datagraph make color graphic workstation 10 mln dlrs end Dec. 31 1986. Reuter 

Ended Feb 28 Shr loss 29 ct v profit 10 ct Net loss 2733000 v profit 911000 Revs 21.5 mln v 18.5 mln Six mths Shr loss 23 ct v profit 26 ct Net loss 2154000 v profit 2445000 Revs 37.8 mln v 37.7 mln Reuter 

GTE Corp decline quarter net income reflect 121 mln dlr loss 50 pct share ownership U.S. Sprint's operations. This loss increase 60 mln dlrs loss report operation GTE own ago quarter prior enter joint venture United Telecommunications UT> July 1986. Under joint venture company own 50 pct Sprint. Earlier company report net income decline 265.0 mln dlrs 283.0 mln dlrs quarter ago. Theodore Brophy chairman GTE "we expect US Sprint's loss diminish customer traffic migrates fiber-optic network distance telecommunications. The reason high loss reflect low price high operating cost related fraudalent network. Operating income telephone operation account 91 pct total rise eight pct 736.0 mln dlrs. Revenues telephone operation rise eight pct 2.9 billion dlrs. Reuter 

Penn Pacific Corp plan mln dlrs convertible debenture person outside U.S. Euro Continental Securities. The offering register U.S. company said. It discuss place additional convertible debenture London-based financial institutions. Reuter 

Goodyear Tire Rubber Co expect sell Celeron Corp oil gas subsidiary billion dlrs months. After company's annual meeting Rober Mercer Goodyear's chairman chief executive officer Goodyear expect report profit dlr share continue operation quarter. In year-ago period Goodyear report loss 64 cent share continue operations. Mercer seven company interested buying Celeron form consortium buy unit. Celeron consists oil gas reserve complete pipeline link drilling operation Santa Barbara Calif. Texas refineries. Mercer Celeron's reserve sell separately pipeline. Concerning speculation billion dlr price tag Celeron Mercer "There fire sale continue keep Celeron profitable operation throughout year." Mercer expect 1st quarter operating profit base share total Goodyear's share repurchase fend Sir James Goldsmith's hostile takeover bid. Reuter 

The follow propose security offering file recently Securities Exchange Commission: Northern Trust Corp NTRS> - Shelf offering 150 mln dlrs debt security include senior subordinate security term determine sale Goldman Sachs Co. GardenAmerica Corp GACO> - Secondary offering 489764 share common stock Montgomery Securities. Reuter 

BankAmerica Corp name Richard Rosenberg vice chairman newly designate California Banking Group. Rosenberg president chief operating officer BankAmerica's Seafirst Corp. Seafirst Chairman Richard Cooley resume additional duty president. Rosenberg report directly BankAmerica Chairman A.W. Clausen. He responsible BankAmerica's California banking activity serve bank's Managing Committee Money Loan Policy Committee. BankAmerica creation California Banking Group refinement call Retail Bank intend improve development delivery service product California. BankAmerica President Chief Operating Officer Thomas Cooper act California Operations previously. BankAmerica Cooper continue lead aggressive cost reduction operating improvement program. Before join Seafirst Rosenberg vice chairman Crocker National bank Wells Fargo Bank. Reuter 

Shr 44 ct v Net 3499000 v 2295000 NOTE: Converted stock ownership Aug 1 1986. Reuter 

Net 12.8 mln v 12.2 mln Loans 2.8 billion v 2.5 billion Deposits 3.2 billion v 2.9 billion Assets 4.5 billion v 3.8 billion NOTE: American National Corp wholly-owned subsidiary First Chicago Corp. Reuter 

AB Astra ASTS.ST> propose two-for-one share split issue June series foreign-targeted share low voting right strategy internationalise company. The deal require Swedish government approval raise percentage foreign voting right allow medical 22.5 pct 20 pct Astra said. An extraordinary meeting Astra's board propose creation B free share foreign buyer tenth voting share. At Astra stock consists series restrict share free shares. Reuter 

Chambers Development Co Inc sign easment license agreement Passaic County Utilities Authority disposal nonhazardous solid waste Passaic County N.J. Chambers expect agreement generate 12 mln dlrs throughout term. The company accord agreement accept municipal waste generate Passaic County disposal county's plan waste-to-energy facility operational five years. Chambers Passaic Authority enter agreement Penpac Inc> transport waste Chambers' landfills. The company agreement sunbject approval New Jersey Board Public Utilities New Jersey Department Environmental Protection. Reuter 

Net 17.7 mln v 15.3 mln NOTE: National Westminster Bank PLC> subsidiary. Loan loss provision 13.8 mln v 13.0 mln Investment security gain 2003000 dlrs v 169000 dlrs. Figures dollars. Corrects name subsidiary parent. Reuter 

Turkey tomorrow formally apply join European Community face major obstacle bid unlikely bloc's 13th member 2000 EC official said. Turkey's move come surprise official application relatively poor country territory Asia Europe likely spark process soul-searching EC's current European Community want term. Officials echoed view diplomat Ankara Turkey's move EC dilemma want clear value Ankara ally NATO alliance see huge problem accept fellow EC member. They industrialise Community try dissuade Turkey make long-discussed formal application EC digest accession Spain Portugal year. Several feel Ankara EC fully implement 23-year-old association agreement Turkey becomes full member. REUTER 

Shr 76 ct v 51 ct Net 5952000 v 4374000 Avg shrs 7837511 v 7446356 NOTE: Includes gain 1.3 mln dlrs v 239000 dlrs benefit tax loss carryforwards. Includes operation Bank Hartford acquire Feb 23. Year-ago shr figure reflect 2-for-1 split April 15 1986. Reuter 

Nor-Quest Resources Inc takeover offer acquire share Northair Mines Ltd basis Nor-Quest share plus dlr share Northair. Nor-Quest plan bring Northair's Willa Mine Nelson British Columbia production use Nor-Quest's recently acquire 1200-ton mill locate area. Reuter 

Morgan Stanley (Jersey) Ltd issue 45000 cover equity warrant exercisable share Japan Synthetic Rubber Co Ltd issue price 212 Swiss franc warrant lead manager Morgan Stanley SA said. The initial exercise price 494 yen share maturity February 4 1992. The issue price represent premium 6.57 pct stock's closing price 653 yen. Each warrant exercisable 100 share common stock Japan Synthetic Rubber. The exercise period June 5 1987 February 4 1992. REUTER 

Aristech Chemical Corp chairman chief executive officer Thomas Marshall analysts' estimate 1987 fiscal earnings 2.25 dlrs 2.50 dlrs share right. Addressing gathering analyst institutional investor Marshall analysts' estimate qtr earnings - 50 ct 55 ct share - "in ballpark." Marshall full estimate represent 32 pct increase 1986's fiscal net 1.70 dlrs share. He quarter estimate 70 pct high 1986's quarter net 29 ct share. Marshall attributibuted quarter earnings growth factor include sustain demand Aristech's major domestic market continued growth exports. Aristech plan spend approximately 200 mln dlrs capital investment Marshall added. Reuter 

United Telecommunications Inc low quarter earnings include loss 63055000 dlrs equity US Sprint. US Sprint form July 1 1986 partnership combine United Telecommunications' distance voice data operation GTE Corp GTE>. Earlier United Telecommunications report first-quarter earnings 12.6 mln dlrs 13 ct share compare 46.4 mln dlrs 47 ct share ago. Revenues decline 720.2 mln dlrs 793.6 mln dlrs. United Telecommunications transition US Sprint's nationwide fiberoptic network proceed ahead schedule. It transition fiber network interim network reduce operating cost half 1987 assist control unauthorized network use. Reuter 

State bank Banca Nazionale Del Lavoro BNL sign joint venture accord Bank Foreign Trade USSR State Bank USSR financial service field. BNL statement bank provide broad range corporate finance service joint Italian-Soviet industrial ventures. The bank study formation jointly own company Soviet banks. Earlier bank Banca Commerciale Italiana BCI Mediocredito Centrale sign financial service joint venture Soviet bank Gosbank Vneshtorgbank. REUTER 

Apollo Computer Inc enter joint marketing agreement Inference Corp> whereby Apollo join Inference market Inference's Automated Reasoning Tool software Apollo workstations. Reuter 

ProGas Ltd issue export licence sell 10.3 billion cubic meter natural gas Ocean State Power Co Burrillville Rhode Island federal energy department said. The sale cover 20 period begin May 1 1989 previously recommend National Energy Board. Contract term released. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Services Inc downgrade 8.2 billion dlrs debt Texaco Inc units. Moody's cite Texaco's filing Chapter 11 Bankruptcy Code Sunday. The filing name Texaco Inc Texaco Capital Inc Texaco Capital N.V. Moody's noted. The rating downgrade Caa Ba-1 include Texaco's senior unsecured debt Texaco Capital Inc's Texaco Capital N.V.'s senior unsecured debt industrial revenue pollution control bonds. Moody's reduce Caa Ba-3 Texaco Capital N.V.'s convertible subordinate Eurodebentures. The agency lower Caa Ba-1 rating Getty Oil Co's note Getty Oil International N.V.'s Eurobonds. Pembroke Capital Co Inc's debt remains review. Moody's note Texaco guaranteed debt issue brought market. Reuter 

The dollar straight sector eurobond market end low nervous day's trading operator keep sideline ahead tomorrow's U.S. Trade figure February dealer said. Prices longer date issue end 1/2 5/8 low short date 1/8 3/8 easier. Bonds Texaco Inc unit hardly trade follow weekend news company file Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection twist run dispute Pennzoil Co dealer added. The Chapter 11 filing mean Texaco pay eurobonds. Dealers straight bond note market basis prior weekend's news. "It wasn't true market someone price give idea" said. However company's convertible bond trading company's share price provide benchmark dealer establish proper price level. The company actively trade convertible outstanding 500 mln dlr bond due 1994 pay 11-3/4 pct billion dlr deal due 1994 pay 11-7/8 pct. Traders disagreed week's closing level convertible bond median appear 97 99 pct. Today trader indicate initially 65 70 pct end 79 83 pct. But add "That's idea. There's real market today. I've dealt I'm level." Other dealer reluctant indication bonds' levels. Dealers market Texaco deal certainly remain indicate negotiate basis event weekend far clarified. The primary market steady Australian dollar yen sector see activity dealer said. Deutsche Bank Finance NV Curacao become issuer Australian dollar market morning 100 mln dlr bond due 1990 pay 14-1/8 pct price 100-1/4 pct. The issue lead manage Deutsche Bank Capital Markets (DBCM) guaranteed Deutsche Bank itself. A DBCM official firm place 60 mln Australian dlrs issue quote deal 7/8 pct comfortably inside 1-1/2 pct total fees. The State Bank Victoria issue 50 mln Australian dlr bond pay 14-1/2 pct price 101-3/8 pct. Commerzbank AG sole manager deal offer broker screen 1-1/2 pct. The day's borrower sector New South Wales Treasury Corporation guaranteed crown-in-right New South Wales. The five bond pay 14-1/4 pct price 101-7/8 pct. Lead manager County Natwest Capital Markets. It quote 1-7/8 1-3/4 pct inside pct total fees. Secondary market Australian dlr bond end little change dealer say operator await Australian trade figure March. A deficit 800 mln billion dlrs expect active sector. Union Bank Switzerland (Securities) Ltd lead manage 15 billion yen bond Union Bank Switzerland NV. The five deal pay 4-3/8 pct feature call option par years. Priced 101-5/8 pct issue quote 1-1/4 pct bid grey market compare total fee 1-5/8 pct. Ente Nazionale l'Energia Elettrica issue 15 billion yen bond due 1994 4-3/4 pct price 101-7/8 pct. The deal quote 1-7/8 pct total fees. Elsewhere Alza Corp issue 75 mln dlr convertible bond due 2002 Merrill Lynch Capital Markets. The par price issue indicate coupon 5-1/2 5-3/4 pct. REUTER 

Brand Companies Inc expect report 1987 quarter loss 15 17 ct share revenue 20 22 mln dlrs. In 1986 quarter Brand report earnings 21 ct revenue 28.5 mln dlrs. No reason expect loss. Final quarterly result report month begin May company spokesman said. Reuter 

Canada's population increase 4.2 pct 25.4 mln 1981 1986 low growth rate five period past 25 accord final census figure release Statistics Canada. Lower immigration level fall birth rate behind slow growth federal agency said. Canada's growth rate peaked 9.7 pct 1961-1966 period. Ontario populous province 9113515 lead province 5.7 pct increase. Newfoundland trail 0.1 pct rise 159917 people. Reuter 

Turkey tomorrow formally apply join European Community face major obstacle bid unlikely bloc's 13th member 2000 EC official said. Turkey's move come surprise official application relatively poor country territory Asia Europe likely spark process soul-searching EC's current European Community want term. Officials echoed view diplomat Ankara Turkey's move EC dilemma want clear value Ankara ally NATO alliance see huge problem accept fellow EC member. They industrialise Community try dissuade Turkey make long-discussed formal application EC digest accession Spain Portugal year. Several feel Ankara EC fully implement 23-year-old association agreement Turkey becomes full member. Reuter 

The February monthly merchandise trade figure report Tuesday Commerce Department basis reflect recent data avoid future revision monthly figure Commerce official said. The overall January deficit 14.8 billion dlrs revise February figure final official said. Previously initial monthly figure revise subsequent month lag report compile final estimate import exports. The reporting February trade data delayed week permit gathering late figure import export clearer picture monthly trade balance. Reuter 

Fischer-Watts Gold Co Inc> Horizon Gold Shares Inc begin sample jointlyl-held Rich Hill Placer Prospect mine Yavapai County Arizona. The 60-day sample begin consist 2000 cubic yard placer gravel take 40 sample sites. Reuter 

Some 340 General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) secretariat staff stag half-day strike protest sharp decline salary pensions. The stoppage force postponement tomorrow schedule meeting check progress global round negotiation liberalise commerce launch September. Pickets entrance GATT office seven eight staff strike. REUTER 

Eurocapital Corp Europharmaceutical Corp> affiliate submit application U.S. Food Drug Administration approval market U.S. condom product Inkey SA> Barcelona. The company approval market condom contain spermicide monoxynol-9 condom spermicide third fourth marketing condom diffierent spermicide identify effective reduce risk sexual transmission AIDS virus. The company approval process application lengthy. It increase ownership Europharmaceutical 51 pct 45 pct. It Europharmaceutical's obligation pay Inkey exclusive distribution right Inkey product cut 500000 dlrs mln dlrs payment extend 180 day FDA approval market condom product 30 days. It Europharmaceutical obligate pay Inkey ct condom distribute Inkey ship Europharmaceutical account. Reuter 

Maryland National Corp file Securities Exchange Commission registration statement cover 125 mln dlr issue subordinate capital note due 1999. Proceeds corporate purpose Maryland National said. The firm name Goldman Sachs Co Merrill Lynch Capital Markets manager offering. Reuter 

Boothe Financial Corp diversified hold company acquire Robert Half Accountemps> franchise New England include office Boston Eastern Massachusetts office Providence R.I. Boothe previously announce purchase Robert Half International Inc> franchisor Robert Half Accountemps office U.S. The company aggregate purchase price paid Robert Half International franchise 59 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Some 340 General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) secretariat staff stag half-day strike protest sharp decline salary pensions. The stoppage force postponement tomorrow schedule meeting check progress global round negotiation liberalise commerce launch September. Pickets entrance GATT office seven eight staff strike. Reuter 

Atlantic Financial sign definitive agreement acquire Centurion Savings Loan Association>. Atlantic disclose purchase price. Atlantic originally announce intention acquire Centurion locate Los Angeles Feb 23 1987. Centurion asset 105 mln dlrs Atlantic said. Reuter 

GAF Corp acquire Borg-Warner Corp's valuable plastic believe analyst prepare increase offer Chicago-based company. Yesterday Borg-Warner agree acquire 4.23 billion dlrs company form Merrill Lynch Capital Partners. Merrill offer 48.50 dlrs cash share 89 pct Borg-Warner's common stock package cash security balance. Borg-Warner stock rise 1-3/8 49-5/8. "I it's (the stock price) tell GAF come bid" analyst value company 51 52 dlrs share. GAF offer 46 dlrs share. It hold 19.9 pct Borg-Warner's stock. "You're cat mouse game you're price. Obviously nobody want pay to. I GAF look company we're look - it's worth more" Pershing Co analyst Richard Henderson said. Henderson estimate worth abouth 55 dlrs share. GAF review situation. Merrill Lynch official return phone calls. Analysts believe GAF Chairman Samuel Heyman sought Borg-Warner chemical plastic business. The rigid plastic telephone computer terminal appliances. "Where heck buy class chemical operation days" Henderson. "He's (Heyman's) bucks. He's heavy hitter push around" Henderson. GAF roof chemical concern attempt takeover large Union Carbide Corp ago. While GAF win company substantial gain investment Carbide. Analysts GAF already profit built Borg-Warner holdings. They GAF raise offer succeed high bid company GAF million dollar profit stock. "It's win-win situation" analyst. One analyst speculate offer GAF forthcoming shortly. "I finally final paragraph book" said. Borg-Warner's business include automotive part protective service include Wells Fargo security guard Chilton Corp credit rating service. Charles Rose Oppenheimer Co analyst follow GAF GAF sell Merrill Lynch offer realize 125 mln dlrs net profit 3.50 share. "I there's probability go price" Rose. Rose really predict Heyman do. "Sam's low-risk high-return player." "Is try build major industrial chemical enterprise try investment bank" Rose said. Analysts Borg-Warner's chemical add earnings momentum GAF. "I work pay 50 dlrs share additive GAF sell non-chemical facilities" John Henry E.F. Hutton. Borg-Warner's chemical plastic provide 1986 operating profit 153.3 mln dlrs revenue 1.04 billion dlrs. Total operating profit 349.7 mln dlrs net earnings 206.3 mln dlrs 1986. "The Borg chemical great" Rose add U.S. competitor Monsanto Co MCT> Dow Chemical Co DOW>. Reuter 

The American Stock Exchange> start trading American Businessphones Inc's common share trade NASDAQ system. Reuter 

The Foothill Group Inc Foothill Captial Corp unit complete placement 23 mln dlrs senior debt 27 mln dlrs senior subordinate debt. Goldman Sachs Co privately place debt institutional lender company said. It senior debt bear 9.4 pct rate senior subordinate debt bear 10.15 pct. Reuter 

Osicom Technologies Inc> file initial offering million share common stock. Osicom file registration statement April 10 Securities Exchange Commission. Sherwood Securities Corp proposes act manage underwriter offering Osicom said. The company distributor product primarily increase data storage capacity microcomputer said. A spokeswoman company expect stock trade Nasdaq exchange symbol OSIC.O>. Reuter 

Personal Computer Products Inc complete 4.2-mln-dlr five pct convertible prefer stock issue private investors. Net proceeds 3.8 mln dlrs expand marketing sale research development effort supplement work capital repay company's entire bank debt 650000 dlrs. Reuter 

Qtly div five ct v five ct prior Pay June Two Record April 27 Reuter 

Swift Independent Packing Co agree principle sell Huron South Dakota pork plant Huron Dressed Beef undisclosed terms. Completion propose transaction subject Huron's ability hire experienced force competitive rate receive government approval purchase operation plant Swift said. Reuter 

Simmons Airlines Inc load factor March decline 42.2 pct 46.1 pct earlier. It revenue passenger mile increase 16.5 mln 12.7 mln available seat mile rise 39.1 mln 27.5 mln Year date Simmons load factor fell 41.5 pct 45 pct. It revenue passenger mile rise 45.8 mln 36.3 mln available seat mile gain 110.3 mln 80.6 mln. Reuter 

Gen Term Corp enter escrow 5.2 mln dlr purchase Lewis-Westco Co privately-held bottler distributor wine distil spirits. Lewis-Westco sale 45 mln dlrs fiscal end June 30 Gen Term said. Separately Gen Term trade over-the-counter plan apply NASDAQ listing completes acquisition. Reuter 

Shr 1.46 dlrs v 66 ct Net 1514312 v 714670 Sales 62.1 mln v 57.2 mln Reuter 

CCX Network Inc enter letter intent acquire privately-held Modern Mailers Inc> affiliate AnWalt Inc> 3200000 dlrs common stock. The company Modern Mailers revenue 8600000 dlrs end October 31 provide computer service computer printing lettershop facilities. Reuter 

Medical Imaging Centers America Inc Shared Imaging Partners L.P. Delaware limited partnership file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission cover plan offering partnership units. SI Management Corp wholly-owned Medical Imaging subsidiary partner Shared Imaging. The company partnership intend offer 7.5 mln dlrs 18.5 mln dlrs limited partnership interest price 1000 dlrs unit. Reuter 

Grain trader analyst expect today's weekly U.S. corn export inspection figure above wheat slightly soybean same. Corn export inspection guess range 40.0 44.0 mln bushel week end April 9 compare 46.6 mln inspect week earlier 15.2 mln year-ago week. Soybean export estimate range 12.0 15.0 mln bushel versus 10.8 mln export week 13.2 mln year. Export guess wheat range 16.0 20.0 mln bushel compare 16.4 mln week 11.2 mln year. Reuter 

NWA Inc Northwest Airlines unit add nonstop Detroit Tokyo flight April 17. The flight operate time week June fly seven day week. Reuter 

Personal Computer Products Inc expect report loss 195000 dlrs third quarter end March 31 compare ago loss quarter 169000 dlrs. It revenue quarter expect 1200000 dlrs compare 564000 dlrs earlier. For nine month end March 31 Personal Computer expect net loss 325000 dlrs compare loss 584000 dlrs previous year. Revenues nine month expect 3880000 dlrs compare 1828000 ago. The company report earnings soon. Reuter 

Flexible Computer Corp receive 418000 dlr General Dynamics Corp FLEX/32 multicomputer. Reuter 

Scan-Graphics Inc receive 500000 dlrs order CF1000 Scanner RAVE software document scan vectorizing McDonnell Douglas Corp. Reuter 

Gander Mountain Inc acquire privately held Western Ranchman Outfitters catalog point-of-purchase retailer western apparel base Cheyenne Wyo. It Western Ranchman sale end Jan 31 1987 2.2 mln dlrs. The purchase undisclosed amount cast. Reuter 

Pauley Petroleum Inc appoint Mark Newgard president chief operating officer. Newgard 42 president privately-held Edgington Oil Co. He succeed William Pagen Pauley's chairman serve president company said. Reuter 

Shr 1.59 dlrs v 54 ct Net 43.3 mln v 13.9 mln Revs 566.7 mln v 487.8 mln Avg shrs 27.2 mln v 25.9 mln NOTE: 1986 figure restate adoption financial accounting standard board statement 87 "employer's accounting pensions." Net 1986 1987 include 900000 dlrs investment tax credit 1987 3.1 mln dlrs 1986. Reuter 

Airship Industries Ltd receive six mln stg contract Japanese advertising agency name 12-month lease 600 Class airship equip nightsign 12-month renewal option. The company contract start October One contribute significantly profits. Reuter 

Digilog Inc receive 669000 dlrs order BellSouth Corp network monitoring management equipment deliver month. Reuter 

Tracor Inc receive research contract worth mln dlrs Lockheed Corp development explode foil initiate ordnance device Exoatmospheric Reentry Interceptor Susbystem ERIS Functional Technology Validation Interceptor Vehicle. Reuter 

Bell Atlantic Corp's CompuShop subsidiary name authorize reseller Xerox Corp's XRX> Xerox Ventura Publisher desktop publishing software International Business Machines Corp's IBM> XT AT personal computer compatibles. Reuter 

Shr 18 ct Net 1948000 Revs 3397000 Note: Company operating February 20 1987. Reuter 

World Bank President Barber Conable oppose forgive develop countries' debt proposal adopt lead cutoff lending indebted countries. "I (debt) forgiveness simply create environment money development lot consign poverty instability indefinitely" told ABC Television Sunday. A bill introduce Congress require commercial bank forgive portion debt owe cash-starved develop countries. "I we've way encourage continuous improvement policy wise money short try turn everybody off" Conable said. Conable told ABC's "Business World" support Treasury Secretary James Baker's debt plan "andidote debt." Baker reduce develop countries' debt burden boost growth rate reform domestic policy increase commercial bank lending. Reuter 

The Chicago Board Trade CBT achieve record volume trading 10-year U.S. Treasury note futures-options April 10. Volume reach 38402 contract previous record 16349 contract April 9. Reuter 

Iran achieve objective heavy fight Iraq launch offensive near southern Iraqi city Basra Tuesday. Baghdad Saturday force rout Iranians foothold initially gained. But Iranian field commander Sunday Iranians entrench west Jasim River Fish canal 10 km east Basra. The unnamed commander quote Iranian news agency IRNA foreign reporter visit Iranian stronghold region. REUTER 

Argentine Treasury Secretary Mario Brodersohn country near accord creditor bank refinance 30 billion dlrs foreign debt. Brodersohn interview Washington Argentine television Saturday major obstacle agreement creditor bank overcome. "Only detail remain resolved" said. Economy Minister Juan Sourrouille Thursday speech IMF accuse creditor bank stand accord demand condition incompatible Argentina's IMF standby program. Brodersohn "has progress. I'd work fine print agreement." Negotiations Argentina bank stuck difference question capitalisation debt on-lending programs. Argentina resist renewal on-lending program sought agreement whereby creditor bank invest fresh dollar dollar debt capitalised. Reuter 

The ruling Liberal Democratic Party's (LDP) setback Sunday's nationwide local election force government controversial proposal five pct sale tax undermine commitment stimulate economy private economist said. The LDP's failure win seat crucial local constituency weaken government's ability push tax plan compromise tax proposal budget fiscal 1987/88 end March 31 unlikely pass soon said. Without budget government hard-pressed effective package stimulate economy pledge Group Seven meeting Paris late February Washington week said. Opposition protest sale tax stall parliamentary debate budget week force government enact stop-gap 1987/88 budget month. "The LDP's election setback enormous impact already falter economy" Johsen Takahashi chief economist Mitsubishi Research Institute. Takahashi behind LDP's poor show discontent government's high-handed push tax reform lack effective policy cope economic woe cause yen's appreciation. "This explains LDP fail regain governorship hotly contest constituency Fukuoka Hokkaido shipbuilding steel industry suffer heavily yen's extend rise" said. Takahashi government delay introduction sale tax beyond original start date January 1988 implement tax cut now. Reuter 

Shr 1.36 dlrs v 1.13 dlrs Net 78.3 mln v 51.6 mln Avg shrs 53698000 v 43449000 Loans 35.89 billion v 24.66 billion Deposits 31.71 billion v 19.64 billion Assets 43.98 billion v 28.60 billion Reuter 

Shr 1.78 dlrs v 1.12 dlrs Shr dilute 1.72 dlrs v 1.08 dlrs Net 20029000 v 13059000 Avg shrs 10598481 v 10430649 Loans 843.4 mln v 727.5 mln Deposits 8.30 billion v 7.82 billion Assets 9.89 billion v 9.27 billion NOTE: Per-share result reflect payment prefer dividend Reuter 

Uniclub Inc agree form equally-owned joint venture call Uniclub Marketing Inc Goodway Marketing Inc. The company Uniclub Marketing narrowcast cable television include Goodway's Video Shopping Mall television shopping sell Uniclub membership add participate merchant sell Uniclob license franchises. The company expect cardholder merchant fee income Uniclub solidly profitable year-end. Uniclub market consumer charge card give 15 pct reduction monthly billing retail purchases. Reuter 

World Airways laid additional 103 employee contract maintenance operation Oakland. Over past five week company previously laid 274 maintenance employees. The layoff result decline current project maintenance company provide principally air carriers. World Airways cannot rule additional layoff explores range alternative contract maintenance operation. Reuter 

Champion Products Inc two-for-one stock split declare February 26 payable April 24 shareholder record April One. Reuter 

U.S. Secretary State George Shultz hold hour talk Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze pursuit superpower arm control agreement nearly decade. Shultz accompany panoply senior adviser technical expert directly closed-door meeting Shevardnadze Soviet delegation arrive Moscow Helsinki aboard U.S. Air Force jet. State Department spokesman Charles Redman told reporter travel secretary crucial talk U.S. Arms control adviser instruct discus substance American proposal press. It report previously proposal -- deal President Ronald Reagan's "Star Wars" space shield enemy missile -- represent harden U.S. Position. Nevertheless U.S. Officials optimistic possibility progress arm control talk schedule Wednesday. Reagan believe agreement leaf office 1989 week breakthrough accord eliminate intermediate-range missile (INF) Europe distinct possibility. Reuter 

Periods end Feb 28 Shr 22 ct v 30 ct Net 549000 v 747000 Sales 8.4 mln v nine mln Avg shrs 2550784 v 2468964 Nine mths Shr 69 ct v 63 ct Net 1749000 v 1554000 Sales 23.6 mln v 21.3 mln Avg shrs 2543711 v 2453520 Reuter 

The American Stock Exchange> start trading common stock Lawrence Insurance Group Inc today. Reuter 

Guy F. Atkinson Co Guy F. Atkinson Construction Co won multi-million-dlr contract construct station Metro Rail Project Los Angeles. Construction propose station wil begin month completion schedule February 1990. Reuter 

Shr 18 ct v six ct Net 1.7 mln v 610000 Revs 68.7 mln v 63.5 mln Reuter 

RJR Nabisco Inc's RJ Reynolds Tobacco USA unit reach definitive agreement sell Winchester Little Cigar Business Tobacco Exporters International USA Ltd Atlanta U.S. subsidiary Rothman's International PLC. Terms disclosed. Last week RJ Reynolds announce sale smoking tobacco brands. These brand Winchester represent pct Rj Reynolds Tobacco USA's total sale 4.7 billion dlrs 1986. Reynolds sale expect complete April 24. The company plan concentrate resource manufacture sale cigarettes. Reynolds Winchester introduce 1971 dominant brand little cigar market. Reuter 

Crazy Eddie Inc executive vice president Sam Antar turn 66 soon resign board replace William H. Saltzman vice president counsel Sun/DIC Acquisition Corp. The company Antar remains executive vice president. Corrects delete reference Antar chief financial officer member Office President. Reuter 

GPA Airbus 320 Ltd> affiliate Irish aircraft lease company GPA Group Ltd> Guinness Peat GNSP.L> subsidiary place 320 mln dlr Franco-U.S. Group CFM International> supply engine 25 Airbus A320 order. A spokeswoman final choice CFM56-5 engine V2500 developed five-nation International Aero Engine consortium. CFM joint company U.S. General Electric Co GE> France's SNECMA>. She GPA decide engine 25 far A320 aircraft option. GPA Airbus 320 chairman Peter Swift statement "We receive innovative attractive proposal manufacturers. We confident choice prove attractive airline lease A320 fleet deliver 1990 onwards.." GPA Airbus 320 joint venture company own half GPA Group Canadian International Airlines> hold 25 pct stake Airbus Industrie AINP.PA> 17.5 stake Banque Paribas hold 7.5 pct share. The company base Shannon Ireland manage GPA Group. Reuter 

Nearly 50 manufacturer trade group Reagan Administration exclusion tariff impose Japanese export Friday. Several police agency told special screen panel want Japanese-made fingerprint exclude vital crime-fighting. Another 25 firm testify tomorrow. President Reagan announce tariff March 27 retaliate Japan's failure honor agreement stop dump semiconductor market outside United States below cost market U.S. goods. U.S. semiconductor maker complain injured Japan's unfair trade practices. The tariff 100 pct - five pct - apply 300 mln dlrs worth Japanese export include tool television set computer part audio equipment addition fingerprint equipment. Reagan issue list dozen product subject tariff businessmen lobbyist exclusion day testimony Commerce Department. He "action take manner effort semiconductor industry inflict extensive economic damage highly successful information technology industry." A spokesman Amdahl Corp AMH> computer maker hit hard tariff Fujitsu Ltd equipment Fujitsu supplier key electronic components. Makita U.S.A. Inc maker hand-held electric tool tariff impose good close U.S. manufacturing operation Buford Ga. layoff entire U.S. workforce 600 people. The U.S. Trade Representative's Office conduct hearing product assess high tariff Thursday Friday. It base judgment impact tariff company hit buying public. Some tariff double price imports. Law officer California Illinois Alaska elsewhere rely NEC Corp Japan's advanced fingerprint exempt tariffs. Fred Wynbrandt represent California attorney general's office tariff double California local cost fingerprint operations. Many testify back idea retaliatory tariff good hit business. Vico Henriques president Computer Business Equipment Manufacturers Association call exemption component U.S. firm bought Japan good Japan U.S. license joint venture. 

Leading central bank governor held routine monthly meeting Bank International Settlements (BIS) monetary source said. There indication subject discussed. No statement planned. Reuter 

Digital Equipment Corp redeem May 14 75 mln dlrs outstanding 9-3/8 pct sinking fund debenture 2000. It buy debenture 1052.86 dlrs 1000 dlr principal amount include Digital said. The firm redeem debenture fund generate operations. Its capital structure strengthen expense reduce result company noted. Reuter 

3rd qtr Feb 28 Shr profit 14 ct v loss ct Net profit 311994 v loss 66858 Revs 2229273 v 645753 Nine mths Shr profit 51 ct v profit ct Net profit 1126673 v profit 42718 Revs 7277340 v 1378372 Reuter 

Some United States' large aerospace firm compete world's powerful nation chance cash come commercialization space. The new space race contract launch privately own satellite orbit - expect worth billion five billion dlrs annually years. The grow opportunity money space highlight month U.S. National Oceanic Atmospheric Administration seek lucrative commercial bid lauch future weather satellite end long-standing dependence National Aeronautics Space Administration. Companies country establish satellite launch operation jump eventually provide space-based service particularly propose international man space station launch plan 1990s. The 12 billion dlr space station propose President Reagan 1984 require 16 cargo delivery deliver private firms. The partner space station currently slat Canada Japan 13-nation European Space Agency latter develop commercial space programs. Until Challenger explosion January 1986 NASA virtual lock world's commercial space cargo. But re-evaluation shuttle President Reagan declare August future U.S. shuttle flight longer carry commercial payloads. The administration's decision left Arianespace French-led European consortium option available satellite owner concern quickly sell plan flight 1989. The company raise price 30000 dlrs launch 50000 dlrs large price tag dampen demand. Arianespace sighned 18 contract compare 11 1985. Those tariff cause non-capitalist country try piece action. China Soviet Union Japan announce satellite launch program U.S. firm include McDonnell Douglas Corp General Dynamics Corp Martin Marietta promise spend mlns dollar develop satellite launch capabilities. There tremendous pent-up demand satellite launch analyst said. Without Challenger satellite launch 15 few 1985 low 1980 sent up. Ariane expect launch six eight satellite 75 pct world's satellite launch period. McDonnell Douglas score big coup U.S. firm January won 734 mln dlr U.S. Air Force pact 20 unmanned rocket launch military satellites. The contract expect underwrite company's effort build rocket private satellite launches. Martin Marietta U.S. company sign client Federal Express Co. Marietta plan launch ExpressStar communication satellite 1989. Marietta build version Titan rocket Air Force private company satellite launch buisiness. Arianespace director Charles Bigot U.S. company probably European firm's big competitor satellite launching. He expect space program commercially viable late 1990s. Japan expand space launch 38 government-owned satellite 16 years. But February launch satellite circle earth poles. Japan yet design build rockets. The satellite launch February place orbit McDonnell Douglas-designed Delta rocket assemble Japanese license. Tsugo Tadakawa director Washington office Japan's National Space Development Agency (NASDA) Japan plan launch seven H-1 rocket American Japanese hybrid replaces Delta 1991. Its large sucessor H-II ready 1992 said. NASDA's annual budget 800 mln dlrs Tadakawa 10 pct size NASA's yearly spending. Still NASDA free private competition full support government aerospace chosen Ministry Trade Information country's industry decade. Surprisingly People's Republic China relative newcomer aerospace successful competitor Ariane. The country's Great Wall Industry Corp besides European consortium win private satellite contract. It launch Westar communication satellite New-York base Terasat 1988. Reuter 

Gander Mountain Inc acquire privately held Western Ranchman Outfitters Cheyenne Wyo. retailer catalog seller western apparel. Terms disclosed. Western Ranchman sale 2.2 mln dlrs end Jan 31 1987 company said. Gander Mountain sell brand name hunt fishing outdoor gear catalogs. Reuter 

U.S. official held little hope European Community EC withdraw controversial meat inspection requirement due effect April 30 U.S. meat producer claim cut exports. But official expect EC allow U.S. plant continue shipping meat provide submit plant improvement U.S. Agriculture Department. The EC's so-called Third Country Meat Directive require foreign meat processing plant comply fully EC inspection standard begin April 30. The U.S. meat industry prepared petition request Reagan administration retaliate EC rule. At issue U.S. meat export EC value 132 mln dlrs 1985. The EC rule require U.S. plant change inspection method range veterinary staff wood. Last December EC determine U.S. cattle hog sheep slaughter facility approve far review. USDA certify plant correct deficiencies. All remain plant history potential shipping EC -- total nearly 400 -- require significant change plant construction procedure far EC review. Robert Hibbert counsel American Meat Institute meat industry expect submit formal trade retaliation petition April 30. An interagency committee review industry's draft petition. An official U.S. Trade Representative's Office U.S. official continued press EC withdraw rule "the chance time." However "expectation" U.S. government meat industry circle EC continue allow shipment calendar U.S. plant submit USDA plan bring operation conformity EC regulation USTR official said. Reuter 

Major U.S. bank lift prime lending rate day due recent increase borrowing cost speculation Federal Reserve nudge rate dollar economist said. In prime rate boost mid-1984 bank April lift rate quarter 7-3/4 pct cite reduce gap prime cost money. That spread narrow again. "A prime rate increase happen soon tonight" Robert Brusca Nikko Securities Co International Inc. Brusca quarter-point prime rate rise eight pct justified spread banks' cost fund prime rate narrow quarter percentage point. He spread average 1.4 percentage point October fell below trigger April prime rate rise banks. "We easily prime rate increase soon week" David Jones Aubrey G. Lanston Co. "We've fairly chance prime rate rise near future" Allan Leslie Discount Corp. "Based spread prime rate funding cost ordinarily prime rate increase now" Harold Nathan economist Wells Fargo Bank. However bank reluctant lift prime dampen already fairly weak loan demand sure Fed maintain recent upward pressure money market rates. Nathan believe Fed market pressure lift short-term rate recent day ail dollar. He "if widespread belief money market rate stay prime rate rise occur time." Fed official express concern steep dollar drop rekindle U.S. inflation. As dollar fell 40-year low yen Friday currency trader Fed central bank support dollar. In addition buying dollar outright stabilize U.S. currency Fed push U.S. rate high relative overseas rates. Based particularly Fed's reserve management action Friday Nathan Wells Fargo "it clear Fed fully resist upward rate pressure market. It supply few reserve needed." Bank funding cost short long-term rate rise sharply Friday heighten speculation Fed gently firm monetary policy. That Fed supply few reserve market economist expected. On Friday Fed add reserve indirectly amount via billion dlrs customer repurchase agreement Federal fund rate bank lend 6-5/16 pct. With fund trading high 6-1/2 pct Fed arrange slightly large 1.5 billion dlr round customer repurchase agreements. "The Fed's action Friday show offering token resistance upward fund rate pressures" Jones Lanston. "The Fed focus policy attention mainly defend dollar" Jones said. He believe merely shade policy restraint "but major impact dollar Fed tighten policy overtly point." Jones expect Fed foster high market rate become restrictive supply reserve six week raise discount rate 5-1/2 pct. Jones U.S. discount rate increase six pct accompany West German Japanese rate cut far aid dollar. Given likely Fed policy firm yield 30-year Treasury bond (about 8.30 pct now) prime rate 8-1/2 pct end-June nine pct year's end. "The jury whether Fed tighten policy defend dollar" Leslie Discount Corp. He tax-date pressure push Fed fund lately. Leslie Fed action reserve data pressure abate show whether firm policy. Reuter 

BankAmerica Corp introduce electronic information transaction service business California. The bank hold company service call Business Connection allows customer personal computer transefer money account check account balance Bank America check saving credit card account call check account statements. The service allows business electronic mail stop payment check access commercial credit line advancement repayment pay bills. Reuter 

White House official progress talk Japan dispute Japanese microchip sales. President Reagan's National Security Adviser Frank Carlucci told reporter "it look difficult situation point." The Reagan administration due slap 100 pct tariff range Japanese product Friday retaliation Japan's allege failure honor agreement stop dump semiconductor market outside U.S. failure market U.S. goods. White House chief staff Howard Baker talk Japanese fail provide reason prevent publication proclamation Friday put duty effect. "I assume proclamation Friday" Baker said. Carlucci evidence Japanese microchip dump below production cost third country fairly conclusive. He U.S.-Japanese talk conclude Friday Japanese official present statistic show Japan market American products. "Our statistic confirm indeed tend direction" Carlucci said. Baker Carlucci appear White House reporter Reagan enjoy vacation mountaintop ranch near Santa Barbara. Reuter 

Health Rehabilitation Properties Trust declare initial dividend 55 ct share quarter end March 31 1987. The dividend payable May 20 shareholder record April 20 1987 said. The dividend include five ct attributable period Dec 23 31 1986 50 ct attributable quarter 1987 end March 31 1987. Reuter 

Shr 46 ct v 58 ct Net 29.0 mln v 37.9 mln Revs 251.2 mln v 254.2 mln Avg shrs 57.9 mln v 56.0 mln 12 mths Shr 1.36 dlrs v 2.37 dlrs Net 93.7 mln v 152.3 mln Revs 981.9 mln v 1.03 billion Avg shrs 57.2 mln v 55.3 mln NOTE: 1987 12 mth net include 43.7 mln dlr charge due December 1986 provision coal mining operation refund. Reuter 

L.M. Ericsson Sweden agree principle buy 49 pct Intelsa Spanish unit already Telefonica> Spain's telecommunication administration. Terms agreement disclosed. Ericsson Intelsa control 40 pct Spanish telephone switch market 2400 employee annual sale 800 mln crown 117 mln dlrs. "The purchase affect close work relationship Telefonica Intelsa" Ericsson said. Reuter 

ITS Inc> complete development interactive video system Mass Mutual Insurance Co> mln dlr development agreement. ITS system integrate interactive marketing training program design insurance industry. Reuter 

Insituform Group Ltd exercise price publicly-held warrant increase 38 ct 2.76 dlrs share April 25 increase 38 ct succeed April 25 April 25 1990 expiration. Reuter 

PicTel Corp change name PictureTel Corp effective immediately. It Pacific Telesis Grouyp PAC> threaten legal action cease name PicTel allege conflict Telesis' trademark PACTEL. The company Telesis reimburse expense name change approve shareholder annual meeting week. Reuter 

CompuTrac Inc expect quarter earnings 50 60 pct ago. In year's quarter end April 30 CompuTrac earn 379000 dlrs revenue 2.4 mln dlrs. The company sale commitment 50 pct above ago sale revenue recognize shipment 30 40 pct sale commitment ship period. It outlook remains unchanged. Reuter 

Datapoint Corp name John Novak newly-created position senior vice president operation John Peter chief financial officer. Peter replaces Stewart Paperin held treasurer's post company said. Datapoint name Stephen Baum treasurer vice president financial planning. Also name vice president position George Beason customer sale development replace Charles McCoy. Gordon Cardigan communication Charles Temple human resource corporate administration fill vacancy company said. Novak formerly vice president manager manufacturing support operation company said. Peter vice president corporate controller added. Reuter 

Hitech Engineering Co won litigation brought Coldwell Banker Commercial Services Group unit Sears Roebuck Co S>. In lawsuit try U.S. District Court Eastern District Virginia Coldwell claimed Hitech improperly cancel lease additional office space sought damage 350000 dlrs. The company plaintiff appeal appeal file date. Hitech's legal counsel confident verdict overturn added. Reuter 

Nova Alberta Corp chief executive Robert Blair express hope Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP> remains Canadian ownership add company plan bid debt-troubled Dome. "We've plan bid" Blair told reporter speech stress Nova 57 pct-owned Husky Oil Ltd HYO> interested Dome's extensive Western Canadian energy holdings. "But interested sometimes make bid" Blair said. TransCanada PipeLines Ltd TRP> yesterday bid 4.30 billion dlrs Dome Dome discontinue talk TransCanada consider proposal company talk buyer rumor offshore. Asked reporter Dome remain Canadian hand Blair reply "Yes. I building Canadian position industry I Dome end hand Canadian management." He bidder were. Blair move Dome's financial "will remove problem attitude hung Western Canadian industry." He add energy industry face "a couple tough tough additional years." Asked Nova's 1987 prospect Blair predict Nova's net profit rise 150 mln dlrs year's net profit 100.2 mln dlrs due improve product price continued cost-cutting. Reuter 

Associated Metals Minerals Corp> Swiss subsidiary Metall und Rohstoff AG> sue Donaldson Lufkin Jenrette Inc> New York investment bank 65 mln dlrs. The amount reflect unsatisfied portion judgment issue February London court ACLI Metals (London) Ltd unit DLJ company said. A London Commercial court found DLJ manage director ACLI employee fraudulently misappropriate Metal und Rohstoff collateral 1983 cover deficit aluminum trading account said. The court award 76 mln dlrs plus cost Metall und Rohstoff receive 10 mln dlrs ACLI. The lawsuit alleges DLJ management misappropriate collateral charge breach trust abuse legal process. In addition Metall und Rohstoff file petition London seek compulsory involuntary bankruptcy ACLI London. It expect liquidator name shortly Associated said. DLJ own Equitable Life Assurance Society U.S.> Reuter 

Piedmont Aviation Inc March cargo ton mile includiung U.S. mail air express service 27.2 pct 4763432 3744535. For date cargo ton mile 26.7 pct 13.3 mln 10.5 mln before. Reuter 

Exxon Co U.S.A. expand marketing mid-grade unleaded gasoline U.S. East Coast. The Exxon Corp subsidiary changeover 89-octane unleaded fuel begin late month major market Virginia Maryland Florida District Columbia. The product introduce New York New Jersey Delaware Connecticut Rhode Island Massachusetts New Hampshire Philadelphia late year. Reuter 

FiberCom Inc> sign contract Computer Connection A/S> Mjoendalen Norway install data communication network base fiber optics. Under term 3.5 mln dlr agreement company supply Computer Connection 6000 transceivers WhisperNet local network employ Ethernet standard. FiberCom network connect 125 Norway's large banks. It network large fiber-optic base data network world. Reuter 

First Montauk Securities Corp reach preliminary merger agreement MCC-Presidential Inc. The company MCC shareholder 25 pct stake combine company receive cash distribution 35 ct share. Reuter 

Shr 82 ct v 72 ct Net 44.6 mln v 38.9 mln Avg shrs 54.3 mln v 52.8 mln Reuter 

Shr 1.35 dlrs v 1.53 dlrs Net 42137000 v 47792000 Loans 10.26 billion v 9.97 billion Deposits 7.65 billion v 7.63 billion Assets 11.84 billion v 12.00 billion Note: Current qtr figure include 3.3 mln dlr charge result penalty prepayment FHLB borrowings. Reuter 

Standard Poor's Corp keep Borg-Warner Corp's 400 mln dlrs debt creditwatch negative implications. Under review company's A-plus senior debt A-1 commercial paper. S P cite offer Merrill Lynch Co-backed investment group's offer acquire Borg-Warner 3.76 billion dlrs. The purchase increase Borg-Warner's financial risk impair earnings cash flow protection result debt leverage rise level S P said. Reuter 

Oper shr 96 ct v 79 ct Oper net 43.7 mln v 36.4 mln Sales 1.48 billion v 1.15 billion NOTE: 1987 sale include operation Sperry Aerospace. 1986 operating net excludes charge discontinue operation 10.2 mln dlrs 22 ct share. Reuter 

The Environmental Protection Agency's five 10 mln dlr suit Browning-Ferris Industries Inc BFI> unit CECOS International Inc cause stock drop analyst said. The stock fall 2-1/4 56-1/8 news suit release morning. "It's potentially suit investor feel regulators" Kenneth Ch'u-K'ai Leung Smith Barney analyst said. "What investor actually say sell BFI share cloud industry threat EPA tough waste management companies" Willard Brown senior analyst First Albany Corp. "Investors say themselves waste management company exposure regulatory suits" Brown said. Brown suit settle 10 mln dlrs impact Browning Ferris earnings. Leung Browning-Ferris adequate cash reserve cover fine. "It impact earnings whatsoever" said. Reuter 

Homestake Mining Co consider acquire gold ore reserve addition company's exploration effort chief executive Harry Conger told Reuters interview. "We look option acquire reserve exploration" Conger add "the move consider acquisition represent change company's acquisition policy." Conger Homestake's current cash position 120 mln dlrs available acquire reserves. In addition Homestake line credit total 150 mln dlrs drawn finance acquisition said. Conger anticipates 1987 exploration budget 1986 spending 27.3 mln dlrs. Conger exploration precious metal slightly high year's spending 17.7 mln dlrs oil gas exploration spending slightly year's 9.6 pct. Conger see Homestake's 1987 gold production 1986 gold production 669594 ounces. However 1987 quarter production McLaughlin reserve 10 pct low year's 45400 ounce due start-up production problems. He believe gold price hold above 400 U.S. dlr ounce level rest 1987. IN 1986 company earnings base average market price gold 368 dlrs ounce. Conger pct change gold price represent 12 ct share impact earnings decline specific forecast 1987's quarter due release 10 day full 1987 results. Reuter 

Shr loss 95 ct v loss nine ct Net loss 6882497 v loss 513153 Revs 11.3 mln v 10.0 mln Avg shrs 7251000 v 6017000 NOTE: 1986 net include 1600000 dlrs increase provision uncollectible receivables affiliate low recoverable value inventory writeoffs capitalize cost discontinue project 1700000 dlr provision resolution shareholder class action suit gain 1300000 dlrs repurchase manufacturing equipment. Reuter 

Empire Co Ltd acquire share Sobeys Stores Ltd already arrangement approve director companies. Holders Sobeys class A non-voting share class B common share elect receive either 1.6 non-voting class A Empire share non-voting class A Empire share one-half eight pct redeemable retractable prefer share. The prefer share par value 25 dlrs retractable holder's option May 1 1994. Reuter 

Shr six ct v ct Net 152360 v 94141 Revs 4073911 v 4116333 NOTE: International Research Development Corp full name company. Reuter 

Brooklyn Union Gas Co's Brooklyn Union Exploration Co Inc unit enter 200 mln dlr three-year gas oil exploration development venture Smith Offshore Exploration Co. The agreement call drilling 10 12 offshore well primarily Gulf Mexico Texas Louisiana coast 30 40 onshore Texas Louisiana Gulf Coast wells. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc upgrade 1.28 billion dlrs debt New Jersey Bell Telephone Co unit Bell Atlantic Corp. The agency evaluate New Jersey Bell's ability sustain improve financial performance include coverage capital structure profitability. Moody's ass likelihood continued constructive regulatory treatment. New Jersey Bell currently carry Aa-1 debentures. Its Prime-1 commercial paper rating review. Moody's cite strong New Jersey economy. Reuter 

FMC Corp's 225 mln dlr insider trading Wall Street arbitrageur Ivan Boesky dismiss federal court court clerk said. Federal Judge Ann C. Williams oral ruling FMC harm trading FMC stock Boesky trader prior FMC's two-billion dlr recapitalization year. FMC claimed insider trading Boesky force increase value recapitalization 80 dlrs share 70 dlrs share. FMC charge Boesky receive confidential information FMC's plan recapitalization Dennis Levine former merger specialist Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. An FMC spokeswoman response inquiry FMC appeal ruling U.S. District Court Northern District Illinois formal write decision received. The write ruling expect April 15. The spokeswoman FMC appeal allege contract violation involve dispute. That involve contract FMC Goldman Sachs Co appeal Illinois court said. Goldman Sachs FMC's investment banker plan restructuring. A FMC spokeswoman contract standard contract Goldman Sachs advise FMC restructuring. "We certainly take look appealing" ruling Illinois court FMC spokeswoman response inquiry. The suit claimed Boesky bought 95300 FMC share February 18 February 21 1986 sell share profit 975000 dlrs February 21 FMC consider recapitalization. Also suit Boesky bought far 1922000 FMC share March 12 April acknowledge purchase 7.5 pct stake company 13-D filing Securities Exchange Commission April seven. "We allege action kept stock price artificially pressure FMC increase term recapitalization" FMC spokeswoman said. The increase 80 dlrs 70 dlrs share announce April 26. Reuter 

Goodyear Tire Rubber Co expect sell Celeron Corp oil gas subsidiary billion dlrs months. After company's annual meeting Rober Mercer Goodyear's chairman chief executive officer Goodyear expect report profit dlr share continue operation quarter. In year-ago period Goodyear report loss 59 cent share continue operations. Mercer seven company interested buying Celeron form consortium buy unit. Reuter 

Shr six ct v ct Net 152360 v 94141 Revs 4073911 v 4116333 Note: Full name International Research Development Corp. Reuter 

Honeywell Inc gain 20.1 pct 1987 quarter operating earnings result cost cut effort year. Honeywell report 1987 quarter operating earnings rise 43.7 mln dlrs 96 ct share 36.4 mln dlrs 79 ct period ago. Better operating result company's sector offset high cost quarter due financing December acquisition Sperry Aerospace share Federal Systems subsidiary pre-tax profit Honeywell Bull Inc Honeywell said. "Our quarter result show clear benefit restructuring" chairman Edson Spencer said. "All business produce result significant improvement external market environment" said. Total order quarter substantially sharp increase aerospace defense order addition Sperry Aerospace said. Domestic industrial automation control order modestly high period 1986 said. Orders Honeywell's building automation control flat U.S. international market said. International order increase great strength Europe Honeywell said. The company year-end 1987 intend complete repurchase 3.3 mln share remain five mln share buyback 1986. Reuter 

The Commodity Credit Corporation CCC authorize 3.0 mln dlrs credit guarantee sale U.S. rice Algeria fiscal 1987 Export Credit Guarantee Program GSM-102 U.S. Agriculture Department said. The additional guarantee increase cumulative fiscal 1987 sale U.S. agricultural product Algeria 469.0 mln dlrs. To eligible credit guarantee coverage sale line register export September 30 1987 department aid. Reuter 

Shr loss 34 ct Net loss 17.1 mln v profit 10.1 mln Revs 106.2 mln v 101.2 mln Six mths Shr loss 28 ct Net loss 14.4 mln v profit 11.6 mln Revs 237.2 mln v 179.5 mln Note: Company ago share comparable due allocation expense Turner Entertainment Group subsequent periods. 1987 result reflect TBS merger agreement operation company independent agent. 1986 data include extraordinary tax loss carryforward gain 1185000 dlrs qtr six mths. Reuter 

Spencer Cos Inc sue Chase Manhattan Corp unit force Spencer subsidiary seek protection creditor Chapter 11 U.S. Bankruptcy Code. The lawsuit file U.S. District Court District Massachusetts seek 100 mln dlrs actual damage 300 mln dlrs additional damage recovery attorney's fees. In nine-count complaint Spencer contends Chase Manhattan Bank purport negotiate additional financing inflate Spencer's account dishonor check seize 600000 dlrs account notification. The company Chase demand immediate repayment 3.2 mln dlrs unsecured loan. The suit name Chase National Corporate Services Inc defendant. The damage sought include loss 40 mln dlrs liquidation Spencer's Happy Legs Inc subsidiary footwear retailer said. Spencer recover 500000 dlrs fund seize Chase obtain financing lead Boston bank. Boston-based Spencer file Chapter 11 Nov 19 1986. Reuter 

Homestake Mining Co consider acquire gold ore reserve addition company's exploration effort chief executive Harry Conger told Reuters interview. Conger "the move consider acquisition represent change company's acquistions policy." Conger Homestake's current cash position 120 mln dlrs available acquire reserves. In addition Homestake line credit total 150 mln dlrs drawn finance acquisition said. Conger anticipates 1987 exploration budget 1986 spending 27.3 mln dlrs. Conger exploration precious metal slightly high year's spending 17.7 mln dlrs oil gas exploration spending slightly year's 9.6 pct. Conger see Homestake's 1987 gold production 1986 gold production 669594 ounces. However 1987 quarter production McLaughlin reserve 10 pct low year's 45400 ounce due start-up production problems. He believe gold price hold above 400 U.S. dlr ounce level rest 1987. Reuter 

Bell Atlantic Corp's Bell Pennsylvania unit federal regulator grant interim permission sell regulate telecommunication network service equipment provide unregulated Bell Atlantic unit. In January Federal Communications Commission rule Bell telephone company sell telephone service tandem equipment provide unregulated equipment units. But FCC stipulate Bell company comply accounting rule separate cost regulate telephone service unregulated businesses. Bell Pennsylvnia FCC give interim relief jointly market service equipment accounting plan approve commission. Reuter 

OPEC's credibility face fresh scrutiny come week amid sign significant rise supply oil international oil market Kuwait daily al-Qabas said. In article headline "Gulf oil source Middle East production 1.4 mln bpd" warn OPEC's official price fresh pressure international oil company seek cheaper supplies. It whether OPEC OPEC producer behind report rise Mideast output. Nor specify source official contacts. "The source credibility OPEC fresh scrutiny (Monday) activity European American markets" daily said. The source quote say OPEC March demonstrate commitment quota agreement raise output week. It give details. "Dealers oil market wait Opec able control production whether day cheat produce quota begin anew" said. The source warn "maybe (price a) barrel oil fall below 18 17.80 dlrs week control supplies" said. "The source believe return oil below 18 dlrs barrel door international oil company pressure OPEC contract price similar struggle March" apparently refer resistance buyer lift Qatar unless give price discounts. "More official warn OPEC solidarity scrutiny April start May" note demand usually fell onset summer. Reuter 

Shr 90 ct v 30 ct Net 22.9 mln v 7567000 Sales 323.0 mln v 272.1 mln Note: share figure reflect April 25 1986 five-to-three stock split. Full figure available. Reuter 

E.F. Hutton name Steven Peras formerly vice president charge spot trading Irving Bank's V> Irving Trust Co senior vice president worldwide foreign exchange trading. Peras 30 direct Hutton's foreign corporate individual foreign exchange account development market-making currency firm worldwide basis Hutton said. Hutton foreign exchange trading operation London New York. Reuter 

American Century Corp restate earnings fiscal end June 30 1986 provide additional five mln dlrs loan loss allowance cause restate year-end net loss 14937000 dlrs instead 9937000 dlrs. The company change talk Securities Exchange Commission company's judgement consider five mln dlrs collectible. In note 1986 financial statement American Century consider five mln dlrs collectible make loan loss provision required. The company spite SEC decision feel allowance loan loss June 30 1986 adequate consider relevant information determine collectibility five mln dlr receivable. But continued disagreement SEC staff interest. Reuter 

Canada plan billion dlr issue Tuesday date deliver May 1 finance department said. The bond issue follows. - 8-1/2 pct bond due March 1 1992 - 8-3/4 pct bond due June 1 1996 - 9 pct bond due March 1 2011. The nine pct bond issue maximum 325 mln dlrs. The Bank Canada buy minimum 100 mln dlrs issue include five mln dlrs 2011 maturity. Reuter 

(Canadian Imperial Bank Commerce) consider classify 1.2 Canadian billion dlrs loan Brazil non-accrual decide whether June bank chairman R. Donald Fullerton told reporter speech here. Fullerton loan list non-accrual financial result quarter end April 30. (Bank Montreal) loan billion Canadian dlrs Brazil large amount Canadian bank previously consider declare loan non-accrual quarter results. Under Canadian guidlines loan classify non-accrual indication bank lose principal loan believe difficult fully settle account reasonable period. Several U.S. bank already announce plan loan Brazil non-accrual lists. Fullerton Canadian Imperial plan enter brokerage federal government introduces law bank expand actitivities. "We'll look anything Canadian market time--from big (brokerage company) smallest" Fullerton told reporters. Fullerton considers buying seat stock exchange "a sensible move". Fullerton decline comment TransCanada Pipelines Ltd (TRP)'s bid Dome Petroleum Ltd (DMP). Canadian Imperial 900 mln Canadian dlrs outstanding loan Dome make oil company's large Canadian creditors. The bank joint director Dome's management board Fullerton said. Fullerton information bid evaluate effect Dome debt restructuring talks. Fullerton call prepared speech full reciprocity free-trade agreement U.S. involve financial services. "There strong indication financial service bargain current free trade negotiation Canada United States requirement full reciprocity" Fullerton said. He U.S. bank equal privilege Canadian bank able operate throughout country Canadian bank U.S. subject approval regulation state. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Services Inc affirm rating 5.3 billion dlrs debt Georgia Power Co unit The Southern Co. Affirmed Baa-1 mortgage bond secure pollution control revenue bond cumulative prefer stock Baa-2 unsecured pollution control revenue bonds. Moody's review company's debt rating pending rate decision Georgia Public Service Commission due October. If rate unconstructive Moody's review negative implication agency noted. Reuter 

Shr loss 28 ct v profit ct Net loss 18.9 mln v profit 2.1 mln Assets 16.7 billion v 19.8 billion Deposits 14.1 billion v 16.2 billion Loans 12.2 billion v 14.4 billion Note: Net include security gain 20.4 mln v 13.1 mln. Net charge-offs total 41.9 mln v 42.2 mln provision loan loss 56.6 mln v 52.2 mln. Non-performing asset total 1.24 billion v 799 mln. Reuter 

Computer Telephone Corp Stephen Ide founder president resign personal reason remain consultant company. It James Mahon executive vice president elect president effective immediately. Reuter 

The American Stock Exchange 10 governor elect 25-member board governor annual membership meeting today. The exchange eight include five sector ten elect board. Elected three-year term sector Ernst Whinney Chairman Ray J. Groves Hasbro Inc Chairman Stephen D. Hassenfeld Bowery Savings Bank Chairman Richard Ravitch Phelps-Stokes Fund President Franklin H. Williams. Elected two-year term sector James R. Jones former congressman anda partner Dickstein Shapiro Morin. The Amex Greenberg Securities Co President Mark D. Greenberg Jacee Securities Inc President Joel L. Lovett industry representative elect term board Johnson Lane Space Smith Co Inc President David T. Johnson elect term industry representative. It industry representative return board term -- Rotan Mosle Inc President R. John Stanton Jr. Smith Barney Harris Upham Co Inc President sGeorge A. Vonder Linden. Reuter 

Clevite Industries Inc J.P. Industries Inc JPI.O> refuse pay 9.5 mln dlrs connection J.P. Industries' acquisition company's former Engine Parts Division. The amount result dispute post-closing adjustment division's purchase price. Clevite sell division J.P. Industries February 1987 subject final audit closing. Clevite J.P. Industries held portion purchase price sale. It preliminary audit show J.P. Industries owe Clevite 14 mln dlrs 4.5 mln dlrs paid. It J.P. Industries dispute balance. Clevite pursue mean collect amount owed. On April Eight Clevite receive 13.50 dlr share offer value 96 mln dlrs outstanding share J.P. Industries. A Clevite management-led seek leveraged buyout company 11.50 dlrs share. Reuter 

Shr 1.74 dlrs v 1.89 dlrs Net 35.3 mln v 38.2 mln Assets 24.5 billion v 21.8 billion Deposits 16.9 billion v 16.1 billion Loans 18.9 billion v 16.0 billion NOTE: Qtr include pre-tax provision 9.7 mln dlrs result 5.7 mln dlrs after-tax loss reserve due medium- long-term Brazilian loans. Net investment gain qtr 2.2 mln dlrs versus gain 15.5 mln year's quarter. Provision loan loss quarter 35.3 mln dlrs v 44.1 mln dlrs prior quarter. Reuter 

NL Industries Inc name J. Landis Martin president chief executive officer succeed Harold Simmons continue chairman. The company Martin 41 name chairman chief executive NL Chemicals Inc unit. Reuter 

Fourth National Corp investor lead management acquire 73 pct stake company Interfirst Corp IFC> Dallas bank hold firm. A Fourth National spokesman deal cash disclose amount. Fourth National bank hold company 500 mln dlrs asset statement continue operate subsidiary retain employees. Reuter 

Del E. Webb Corp Del E. Webb Properties Corp unit sell one-half 224-acre Towne Meadows mixed-use development near Mesa Gilbert Ariz. Klukwan Inc Alaskan native cooperative. Terms sale disclosed. Webb one-half venture. Reuter 

Shr 1.04 dlrs v 83 ct Net 51.7 mln v 39.4 mln Reuter 

Qtr end Feb 28 Shr 35 ct v 38 ct Net 1682047 v 1817820 Revs 36.1 mln v 29.9 mln Six mths Shr 73 ct v 75 ct Net 3518515 v 3606689 Revs 74.1 mln v 62.7 mln Reuter 

Shr 83 ct v 94 ct Net 41.2 mln v 45.5 mln Revs 428.4 mln v 429.6 Avg shrs 49.8 mln v 48.1 mln 12 month Shr 3.59 dlrs v 3.53 dlrs Net 176.9 mln v 164.4 mln Revs 1.87 billion v 1.70 billion Avg shrs 49.3 mln v 46.6 NOTE: 1986 quarter profit restate cent share result previously report pool interest merger Mid-Continent Life Insurance Co. Reuter 

Tribune Co agree buy Gene Autry Autry Foundation property locate Hollywood California. Terms disclosed. The property include broadcast studio facility 10.1 acre land locate Sunset Boulevard Van Ness Avenue Hollywood. Also include agreement additional parcel land Sunset Boulevard total 2.3 acre said. Reuter 

The U.S. International Trade Commission ITC vote authorize Commerce Department impose anti-dumping duty import Brazilian frozen concentrate orange juice. The ITC vote 3-2 favor anti-dumping petition final ruling matter. Today's ITC ruling consistent Commerce Department's final ruling March 9 activates anti-dumping duty 1.96 pct import Brazilian frozen concentrate orange juice Stephen Vastagh ITC investigator said. The ITC found Brazilian orange juice import injured U.S. producers. The Commerce Department already rule import unfairly price lower 1.96 pct anti-dumping margin preliminary decision fall 8.5 pct Vastagh said. The U.S. government require bond post import Brazilian frozen concentrate orange juice Commerce's preliminary ruling October 23 said. Commerce rule major Brazilian producer -- Cutrale -- exclude anti-dumping duty. Brazilian import account 40 pct total U.S. supply Vastagh said. Between December 1985 November 1986 United States import equivalent 546 mln gallon Brazilian orange juice worth 622 mln dlrs said. Currently United States require 35-cent gallon tariff orange juice import Vastagh said. An ITC spokesman agency forward final report anti-dumping Commerce April 22. Commerce process anti-dumping transmit U.S Customs liquidate bond entry date Commerce's preliminary ruling begin assess duty Vastagh said. He 12 Brazilian orange juice exporter include major shipper affected decision. Reuter 

Talks United States Japan allege Japanese dump computer microchip fail U.S. imposition retaliatory tariff senior White House official said. President Reagan's chief staff Howard Baker told reporter development cause president plan issue proclamation Friday slap 100 cent tariff range Japanese electronic products. "I assume proclamation Friday" Baker said. Reagan's National Security Adviser Frank Carlucci add "It look difficult situation point." Carlucci evidence Japanese "dumping" microchip "fairly conclusive." The allege dump -- sell abroad below cost manufacture -- undercut technologically U.S. microchip industry. Carlucci Japanese official present statistic design show Japan opening market American producer microchip "our statistic confirm this." "Indeed tend direction"Carlucci said. President Reagan announce March 27 plan raise tariff 300 mln dlrs Japanese export United States. He accuse Japan fail enforce major provision September 1986 agreement prevent microchip dump provide American industry fair trade opportunities. He prepared lift sanction Japan corrective action issues. The dispute sour U.S.-Jpanese relation Japanese Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone prepares visit Washington month talk Reagan. Last Friday Reagan answer question follow speech Los Angeles World Affairs Council Nakasone endanger political stand willingess try eliminate trade barrier U.S. goods. He look forward talk Nakasone "he helpful." Today Reagan vacation ranch near here. Reuter 

Bio-Nutronics Inc unable "very near future" substantially increase revenue otherwise raise additional fund require cease operations. Reuter 

Shr 37 ct v 27 ct Net 1194000 v 870000 Reuter 

Lawyers Morton Thiokol Inc federal judge unseal paper file court connection lawsuit former employee. U.S. District Judge Harold Greene held hearing morning company's request immediate action accord clerk. The company's motion oppose lawyer U.S. Department Justice. The lawsuit file former employee engineer Roger Boisjoly allege criminal responsibility Thiokol death seven Challenger astronaut January 1986. Justice Department source told Reuters earlier month Federal Bureau Investigation launch criminal investigation Thiokol booster rocket blame loss Challenger space shuttle. The source probe stem suit Boisjoly medical disability. Boisjoly seek damage company allegedly defame professional reputation transfer job testify presidential commission Challenger explosion. Reuter 

Shr 1.21 dlrs v 1.80 dlrs Net 16.9 mln v 24.6 mln Revs 230.9 mln v 289.6 mln 12 mths Shr 1.97 dlrs v 2.37 dlrs Net 27.6 mln v 32.4 mln Revs 648.6 mln v 875.7 mln NOTE: company report earnings qtrly include previous 12 mths figures. Reuter 

Texaco Inc re-established key oil supply line follow yesterday's court filing protection Chapter 11 U.S. bankrupcty code Elton Yates Texaco's coordinator worldwide operations. "Several company willing start trading" Yates told Reuters interview. The company week state domestic international oil supplier demand cash oil shipment case cut supply altogether. Banks cut credit line court filings. Manufacturers Hanover Corp MHC> bank told Texaco cut billion dlr credit line Texaco court filing. Chase Manhattan Corp CMB> J.P. Morgan Co's JPM> Morgan Guaranty Trust Co deposit cover transaction said. The severe condition supplier creditor arose unfavorable ruling Monday U.S. Supreme Court Texaco's ongoing dispute Pennzoil Co PZL> acquisition Getty Oil Co 1984. The High Court Texas Courts consider Texaco's plea cut 10.3 billion dlr bond appeal case. "Most supplier stayed could" Elton said. But follow Monday's Supreme Court ruling Texaco's supplier demand cash halt supplies. "It wasn't Wednesday avalanche" said. "Supplies cut run anywhere near capacity." He half Texaco's oil supply jeapordy cut produce severe shortage mid-May. Now situation appear severe Elton said. It Sonatrach Algerian oil company cancel future delivery crude oil natural gas Occidental Petroleum Co OXY> demand cash crude Atlantic Richfield Co ARC> special safeguards. The company British Petroleum Co PLC BP> week refuse accept fuel oil. But Yates "a U.K. company supplying. They cancel week." He decline identify company. Petroleos de Venezuela S.A.> Venezuelan oil company supply portion Texaco's oil halt shipment week ago Yates said. But add Texaco expect meet Venezuelans attempt reestablish key supply line. Talks expect Algerians added. Bankruptcy specialist likely Texaco's chapter 11 filing allow company secure credit line oil supply key company's business. "It usual Texaco" Martin Klein bankruptcy attorney New York law firm Dreyer Traub. "Creditors nervous bunch people" said. "But dust settle reevaluate situation likely extend credit chapter 11 company." But official Texaco immediately available whether discussion held bank whether credit line reestablished. Reuter 

Texas Air Corp's Continental Airlines add flight May destination already serf Denver raise total daily departure 264 261 Stapleton International Airport. The company begin May 4 add fourth daily nonstop Des Moines Iowa third nonstop Spokane Wash. Meanwhile May 21 add fourth daily nonstop New York/Laguardia International Airport. Reuter 

National City Bancorp director annual meeting declare 10 pct stock dividend payable May 22 record April 24. Reuter 

Gaming Technology Inc Stan Fulton resign president company. Chairman Alfred Wilms assume additional position president. Fulton remain director company special project Gaming Technology spokeswoman said. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 500 mln dlrs Eurodebt TransCanada Pipelines Ltd. The agency cite TransCanada's 4.3 billion Can dlr offer asset Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP>. The offer entail cash payment 3.87 billion Can dlrs Dome's creditor exchange 20 pct common stock TransCanada subsidiary Dome's common preferred. Moody's examine financing propose transaction result capital structure. TransCanada A-3 Euro mortgage bond Baa-1 Eurodebt. Reuter 

Shr 25 ct v 23 ct Net 488000 v 443000 Assets 289.3 mln v 213.9 mln Deposits 254 mln v 188.5 mln Loans 156.4 mln v 123.4 mln NOTE: Per share amount adjust stock dividends. Reuter 

Shr primary 87 ct v 83 ct Shr dilute 85 ct v 74 ct Net 35.9 mln v 30.6 mln Avg shrs 41.0 mln v 34.2 mln Assets 13.95 billion v 12.34 billion Deposits 10.21 billion v 9.24 billion Loans 9.22 billion v 7.89 billion Return asset 1.07 pct v 1.05 pct Note: Net include security gain seven ct shr v cts. Net include loan loss provision 20.2 mln v 12.6 mln. Net charge-offs total 15.6 mln brining loan loss reserve qtr 120.5 mln. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp's pension expense expect increase 50 pct due pension accounting standard annual report said. It implementation Statement Financial Accounting Standards Number 87 issue Financial Accounting Standards Board December 1985 expect increase Chrysler's pension expense 50 pct compare pension expense calulated prevsious standards. Last report company's pension expense 236.3 mln dlrs 219.8 mln dlrs 1985. A Chrysler spokeswoman exact amount increase cause accounting change report company report quarter earnings late month. The report Chrysler continue announce December 1984 buying 56.25 mln share -- adjust reflect three-for-two stock split then. The company acquire 42.3 mln share 1986 report add target completion program. Reuter 

Bank New England Corp report pro forma quarter earnings reflect combine operation pending merger Conifer Group rise 60 mln dlrs 89 ct share 49 mln dlrs 75 ct share 1986. The merger expect close April 22. Earlier Bank New England report quarter net income take merger account rise 1.04 dlrs 83 ct share. NOTE:First quarter 1986 include restatement recent acquisitions. After restatement net income 39.8 mln dlrs. The 1987 pro forma quarter result include nonrecurring merger expense 4.7 mln dlrs. Excluding expense growth operating expense combine company reduce 14 pct 12 pct quarter. Loans lease increase 34 pct 19.5 billion dlrs deposit grow 14 pct 19.6 billion dlrs. The provision credit loss 14.4 mln dlrs quarter compare 19.7 mln dlrs year. Net charge-offs 10.9 mln dlrs 12.8 mln dlrs 1986. Reuter 

Qtr end March 31 Net 268760 v 235274 Revs 721882 v 575806 Six mths Net 472642 v 464042 Revs 1372453 v 1059462 Note: share data comparable net figure depreciation. Reuter 

Finance Minister Michael Wilson comment tax implication TransCanada PipeLines Ltd's 4.3 billion dlr offer Dome Petroleum Ltd. "The specific offer TransCanada course don't detail element proposal" Wilson told House Commons daily question period. Opposition party question Wilson loss tax revenue takeover complete tax credit held Dome. Reuter 

International Telecharge Inc introduce international inbound long-distance service Europe call "Quick Call USA." The three-minute call available seven European countries. The call place dial local country access answer International Telecharge operator sent phone U.S. said. The caller option call collect billing major credit card flat rate 10.65 dlrs expect call U.K. bill rate 8.53 dlrs company said. Reuter 

Dauphin Deposit Corp sign definitive agreement acquire Colonial Bancorp Inc>. The agreement call Colonial merge Dauphin Deposit Corp Colonial's subsidiary New Holland Farmers National Bank merge Dauphin Deposit Bank Trust Co lead bank Dauphin Deposit Corp company said. Shareholders Colonial receive 3.6 4.4 share Dauphin common stock share Colonial depend Dauphin's current market value said. As Dec 31 1986 Colonia Bancorp asset 150 mln dlrs Dauphin said. Reuter 

OPEC's credibility face fresh scrutiny come week amid sign significant rise supply oil international oil market Kuwait daily al-Qabas said. In article headline "Gulf oil source Middle East production 1.4 mln bpd" "Markets witness surplus amid whisper return cheat days" warn OPEC's official price fresh pressure international oil company seek cheaper supplies. It whether OPEC Opec producer behind report rise Mideast output. Nor specify source official contacts. "The source credibility OPEC fresh scrutiny Monday activity European American markets" said. The source quote say Opec March demonstrate commitment quota agreement raise output week. It give details. "Dealers oil market wait Opec able control production whether day cheat produce quota begin anew" reported. "The source warn maybe (price a) barrel oil fall below 18 17.80 dlrs week control supplies. "The source believe return oil below 18 dlrs barrel door international oil company pressure Opec contract price similar struggle March" apparently refer resistance buyer lift Qatar unless give price discounts. "More official warn Opec solidarity scrutiny April start May" note demand usually fell onset summer. Reuter 

Treasury balance Federal Reserve fell April 10 3.373 billion dlrs 3.523 billion dlrs previous Treasury late budget statement. Balances tax loan note account fell 11.645 billion dlrs 11.869 billion dlrs respective days. The Treasury's operating cash balance total 15.018 billion dlrs compare 15.392 billion dlrs April 9. Reuter 

The Energy Department approve final form agreement resolve remain issue Shell Oil Co oil pricing allocation control end 1981. Under agreement The Royal Dutch/Shell Group unit agree pay 20 mln dlrs settle refiner pricing issue 160 mln dlrs settle crude oil pricing issue DOE said. DOE make pact final modify reflect Shell's compliance Tertiary Incentive Program provision version publish Dec 31. reuter 

Cellular Communications Inc unit purchase 6.99 pct Cincinnati non-wireline cellular system. As result transaction company own 100 pct Cincinnati. Reuter 

Qtly div 40 ct v 40 ct prior Pay May 15 Record May one. Reuter 

Qtr end March 31 Shr 88 ct Net 973000 v 713000 Six mths Shr 1.35 dlrs Net 1497000 v 1464000 Note: Bank Dec 29 1986. Reuter 

Shr 39 ct v 32 ct Net 2524000 v 204600 Sales 28.5 mln v 23.5 mln Nine Mths Shr 1.01 dlrs v 1.09 dlrs Net 6323000 v 6990000 Sales 80.6 mln v 68.8 mln Note: Current qtr nine mth net include 447000 dlr gain asset sales. Prior nine mth net include 3.4 mln dlr asset sale gain. Reuter 

GAF Corp explore option response Merrill Lynch Capital Partners' 4.23 billion dlr offer Borg-Warner Corp information supply Merrill Lynch. A GAF spokesman company information enable GAF fully evaluate alternatives. The spokesman confirm GAF raise bid 48 dlrs cash 46 dlrs share Friday. Merrill offering 48.50 dlrs share cash 89 pct Borg-Warner package cash security balance. The transaction Merrill Lynch Borg-Warner private form leveraged buyout. Merrill Lynch intend sell Borg-Warner asset force financing deal source familiar transaction. Borg-Warner management participant transaction manager retain positions. The investor involve Merrill include pension fund insurance company institutional investor source said. Analysts believe GAF own 19.9 pct Borg-Warner raise offer. That speculation drove Borg-warner stock 1-3/8 49-5/8 heavy trading. GAF close 49-5/8 3/4. Reuter 

New Jersey Bell wholly own Bell Atlantic Corp Federal Communications Commission allow market network service equipment provide Bell Atlanticom Systems unregulated company wholly own Bell Atlantic. New Jersey Bell FCC ruling give interim relief current accounting restriction company's plan comply accounting rule approve FCC. New Jersey Bell FCC order January telephone company offer equipment comply accounting rule separate cost regulate service unregulated activities. New Jersey Bell joint marketing Bell Atlanticom Systems apply initially New Jersey Bell's large customers. Reuter 

A senior Abu Dhabi oil official remark publish emirate large producer United Arab Emirates (UAE) succeed marketing crude oil breaching OPEC accords. Khalaf al-Oteiba Marketing Director Abu Dhabi National Oil Co (ADNOC) told company's Petroleum Community magazine ADNOC keen keep customer relations. "The company maintain dialogue care customer accordance market conditions...And necessary step guarantee marketing production" said. "The oil marketing policy ADNOC base adherence OPEC decision December 1986 control production establish pricing attempt stabilize market" added. OPEC agree December limit production 15.8 mln bpd return fix price average 18 dlrs barrel. Oteiba stabilization oil market future depend discipline OPEC showed. Oteiba oil price drop ADNOC's difficult "a practical flexible pricing policy implement relate change market environment." He crude oil sale jumped average 609000 bpd 73 pct exported. Refined product sale total eight mln metric tonne 67 pct exported. In 1985 ADNOC market total 476000 bpd crude oil 7.2 mln tonne refine products. Reuter 

The Pratt Whitney Government Products Division United Technologies Corp UTX> award 502.1 mln dlr increase Air Force contract alternate fighter engine support equipment Defense Department said. It contract fund related F100-FW-220 engine combine purchase U.S. Air Force Korea Singapore Thailand Egypt Netherlands Foreign Military Sales program. Work contract expect complete December 1988 department said. Reuter 

Lockheed Corp's Lockheed Missiles Space Co award 275 mln dlr modification Navy contract development production Trident II missile Defense Department said. It contract expect complete March 1990. Reuter 

Core-Mark International Inc vigorously address problem correct near term. The package good distributor statement follow "a apparently confuse statement concern company rise uncertainty company's current operative condition future." Core-Mark previously former chief executive D.E. Gillespie resign due problem decline health add negotiation sale majority stake unnamed investor group grow possibility. Core-Mark's interim chief executive Anthony Regensburg sudden earnings deterioration late fourth quarter "took everyone surprise director management urgently address problems. "Speculation company's future helpful provoke heighten anxiety divert management's attention address them" Regensburg statement. Reuter 

Shr 61 ct v 55 ct Net 695252 v 633329 Loans 125.2 mln v 89.9 mln Deposits 209.2 mln v 172.9 mln Assets 245.5 mln v 207.5 mln Reuter 

Kraft Inc complete acquisition Holleb Co foodservice distributor base Bensenville Ill. Terms withheld. It Holleb's 1986 sale 85 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Shr 1.12 dlrs v 1.27 dlrs Net 15000000 v 11900000 Avg shrs 9642403 v 8322245 Loans 4.57 billion v 3.29 billion Deposits 6.80 billion v 4.75 billion Assets 7.75 billion v 5.37 billion Reuter 

Shr loss 10 ct v loss 19 ct Net loss 1348000 v loss 2410000 Revs 11.2 mln v 22.3 mln Acg shrs 13.8 mln v 12.9 mln Reuter 

Newmont Mining Corp held 5250376 Du Pont Co share 2.2 pct outstanding 1986 5970141 share 2.5 pct outstanding held earlier Newmont's annual report said. --Corrects March 30 item show holding decreased. Reuter 

Shr 35 ct v 29 ct Net 3732000 v 3131000 Assets 1.09 billion v 861.2 mln Deposits 817.7 mlnvs 705.7 mln Loans 704.1 mln v 553.4 mln Note: 1986 result restate reflect acquisition United Banks Corp. Reuter 

General Motors Corp award 97 mln dlr Air Force contract 176 turboprop engine separate design Defense Department said. It contract combine purchase U.S. Navy U.S. Air Force Reserves Japan Norway Foreign Military Sales expect complete December 1987. Reuter 

Shr 41 ct v 31 ct Net 4568656 v 3461674 Assets 1.7 billion v 1.4 billion Deposits 1.46 billion v 1.19 billion Note: 1986 result restate reflect 100 pct stock dividend. Reuter 

Domestic sale farm wheel tractor March decline 9.2 pct 7654 unit 8434 year-ago period Farm Industrial Equipment Institute said. Year date sale decline 16.9 pct 18003 21665 1986 period. It two-wheel drive 40 horsepower segment 4747 vehicle sell March compare 5473 ago. In 40 100 horsepower 2238 vehicle sell 1995 previous March. Reuter 

Shr 28 ct v 29 ct Net 10978000 v 11916000 Revs 153.5 mln v 163.4 mln NOTE: Full name Central Illinois Public Service Co Per-share result reflect payment prefer dividend Reuter 

Versar Inc receive contract U.S. Air Force maximum value 9.5 mln dlrs carry include radioactive toxic contamination studies. Versar contract Air Force Occupational Health Laboratory Aerospace Medical Division Brooks Air Force Base Texas air force installation worldwide. Reuter 

Brascan Ltd plan redeem May 15 outstanding 1981 series A prefer share 26 dlrs share plus accrue unpaid dividends. Reuter 

Thera-Care Inc agree acquire Cushing Associates Glendale Calif. exchange 1480000 Thera-Care shares. Reuter 

Interco Inc shareholder Lane Co approve merger company special meetings. As previously announce Lane's shareholder receive 1.5 share Interco common stock share Lane stock held. Interco merger becomes effective April 14. Reuter 

HMO America Inc sign letter intent Mount Sinai Medical Center affiliate provide common prefer stock acquire not-for-profit company control Mount Sinai Chicago not-for-profit hospital elect participate acquisition. The form transaction yet determine said. According term HMO's shareholder receive combination cash debt security issue buyer exchange outstanding share common prefer stock said. The amount cash share yet determine added. Arrangements financing yet assurance financing receive HMO said. Closing propose transaction complete expect November 2 1987 said. Reuter 

Shr five ct v five ct prior qtr Pay May 15 Record April 22 Reuter 

Shr 15 ct v 15 ct prior qtr Pay May 18 Record April 27 Reuter 

Shares Dome Petroleum Ltd post big gain month U.S. Canada stock market foresaw takeover tug-of-war begin debt-heavy company. Dome rise 1/4 1-1/8 American Stock Exchange gain 31 cent 1.44 Canadian dlrs Toronto Stock Exchange active stock. It rise 1.50 dlrs Toronto day. In recent month Dome normally move cent day. TransCanada PipeLines yesterday announce 4.3 billion dlr Canadian (3.22 billion U.S.) bid Dome's asset Dome base Calgary Alberta talk company refuse identify. Market analyst firm believe foreign oil company note TransCanada yesterday stress bid "a Canadian solution financial difficulty Dome Petroleum." "The talk Conoco control DuPont DD> Atlantic Richfield Co ARC> sell Canadian 1975 get in" Wilf Gobert Peters Co Ltd. David Bryson Moss Lawson Co note British Petroleum PLC BP> mention buyer despite BP's 70 U.S. dlr share bid week ago 45 percent Standard Oil Co SRD> already own. Calgary-based independent analyst James Hamilton recent report Amoco Corp AN> talk Dome. Representatives Atlantic Richfield British Petroleum Conoco Amoco immediately available comment. Gobert characterize market action Dome "awfully optimistic" TransCanada's offer current Dome shareholder stock subsidiary value 1.10 dlrs Canadian common share. Under offer current Dome common prefer shareholder 20 pct subsidiary operate Dome's former assets. TransCanada 80 pct. However Bryson market look potential share publicly-traded subsidiary. "The TransCanada offer quite bit upside potential Dome" said. Gobert believe TransCanada offer "at upper I somebody pay Dome." The TransCanada proposal pay Dome's creditor 3.87 billion Canadian dlrs (2.90 billion U.S. dlrs) billion Canadian dlrs (750 mln U.S. dlrs) available secure creditor Dome subsidiary earns profit above level. TransCanada detail profit level. Dome currently seek restructure six billion Canadian dlrs (4.5 billion U.S. dlrs) debt ago oil price company want expand. "There speculation Dome's asset capable support debt billion dlrs basis TransCanada offer upper that" Gobert said. Dome's debt trouble obscure major player Canadian oil gas field. It hold reserve 176 mln barrel crude oil 3.9 billion cubic foot natural gas. The company own 14.2 mln acre oil gas exploration land province Alberta heart Canada's oil industry. Dome own total 36.1 mln acre land across Canada. The company tax credit 2.5 billion dlrs Canadian (1.9 billion dlrs U.S.). It report 1986 loss 2.2 billion dlrs (1.65 billion dlrs U.S.) believe large Canadian company. Reuter 

The U.S. Treasury weekly auction three-month bill produce average rate 5.98 pct 6.08 pct rate six-month bills. These rate compare average 5.53 pct three- 5.63 pct six-month bill sell week. The bond-equivalent yield three-month bill 6.17 pct. Accepted bid range 5.92 5.99 pct 60 pct bid stopout rate taken. For six month yield 6.38 pct bid range 5.98 pct 6.10 pct 48 pct bid accepted. The Treasury receive 25.99 billion dlrs bid three-month bill include 1.2 billion dlrs non-competitive bid public. It accepted 6.6 billion dlrs bid include 2.1 billion dlrs Federal Reserve 180 mln dlrs foreign international monetary authorities. Some 24.7 billion dlrs bid six-month bill receive include 832 mln dlrs non-competitives. The Treasury accepted 6.6 billion dlrs include 1.8 billion dlrs Fed 1.2 billion dlrs foreign international authorities. The average price three-month bill 98.488 price range 98.504 98.486. The average price six-months bill 96.926 price range 96.977 96.916. The average yield three-month bill high 5.99 pct June 30 1986. The average yield six-month bill high 6.13 pct June 23 1986. Reuter 

Andover Group Virginia partnership mail proxy solicit vote slate nominee HBO Co's board directors. Last week HBO Co sent letter urge shareholder proxies. Andover HBO consistently refuse provide internal financial information considers essential formulate acquisition offer. If nominee elect Andover proposal buy HBO term condition determine time. The annual meeting schedule April 30. Reuter 

United Technologies Corp join company form partnership propose defense U.S. Army. United Technologies join force FMC Corp FMC> British Aerospace> form United Aerospace Defense Systems>. Together propose "Tracked Rapier" defense meet Army requirement defend American division Europe low fly helicopter tactical aircraft. Reuter 

A shareholder lead Far Hills N.J. investor Natalie Koether raise stake Computer Memories Inc 573300 share 5.1 pct total outstanding 542000 share 4.8 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission include Sun Equities Corp investment firm bought net 31300 Computer Memories common share March 31 price range 3-5/16 dlrs share "capital appreciation." The earlier abandon plan seek control company lower stake five pct. Reuter 

Industrial Equity (Pacific) Ltd told Securities Exchange Commission acquire 72600 share McGill Manufacturing Co Inc 5.1 pct total outstanding common stock. Industrial Equity principally own Brierley Investments Ltd publicly held New Zealand firm bought stake 2.3 mln dlrs investment purposes. It add stake sell plan seek control company. Reuter 

Ramada Inc raise 100 mln dlrs offering subordinate note due 1999 yield 11.703 pct sole manager Salomon Brothers Inc. The note 11-5/8 pct coupon price 99.50 Salomon said. Non-callable non-refundable five issue rat B-2 Moody's Investors Service Inc B-minus Standard Poor's Corp. Reuter 

Shr 49 ct v 50 ct Net 3922533 v 3979580 Note: Full name Montgomery Street Income Securities Inc. Reuter 

Northair Mines Ltd oppose Nor-Quest Resources Inc's earlier report propose takeover bid "with mean disposal" say "this attempt property grab insult intelligence shareholders." It Nor-Quest's offer swap Nor-Quest share plus dlr Northair share seriously dilute Northair's equity Willa mine British Columbia. "Our company sound financial position production financing readily arrange required. We're look partner certainly wouldn't guys" Northair said. Reuter 

Vista Chemical Co plan file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission cover sale 4.5 mln share common stock public. The share sell institutional investor partially finance company formation 1984 trustee saving investment plan behalf employee participants. None share sell company said. Reuter 

Harmon Industries sign contract worth mln dlrs National Railroad Passenger Corp (Amtrak). Harmon Industries contract include design engineering manufacturing delivery integration signal equipment Amtrak's 55-mile Philadelphia Atlantic City N.J. line. Reuter 

CFM International joint venture SNECMA> France General Electric Co receive CFM56-5 engine worth 320 mln dlrs GPA Airbus 320 Group Ltd Shannon Ireland. The company engine 25 twin-engine Airbus Industrie A320 aircraft. Reuter 

Medizone International Inc> expect Food Drug Administration soon approve company's application begin limited test potential therapy AIDS use combination ozone oxygen. The company receives FDA approval 20 patient AIDS-related complex start treatment Mount Sinai Medical Center New York. Dr Joseph Latino director research Medizone therapy liken process us combination oxygen ozone inject patient's own blood outside body reinfused body. "We guardedly optimistic treatment work" Latino process treat viral illneses include AIDS Europe vary degree success. He ozone kill virus kill virus waste treatments. He treatment compare inhale ozone toxic. Latino company prepared fund trial cost 250000 dlrs. Reuter 

Textron Inc E. Paul Casey resign vice-chairman director pursue interests. Casey assume duty Textron October 1986 follow acquisition Ex-Cell-O Corp Textron. Casey formerly chairman president chief executive Ex-Cell-O. Reuter 

The Securities Exchange Commission disciplinary review previously convict fraud violation U.S. security laws. The SEC Robert Albert D'Elia convict follow allegation trade information misappropriate financial printer 1980 1981. The D'Elias officer shareholder Rad Securities Inc Philadelphia broker-dealer. A hearing schedule date SEC said. Reuter 

Texas Air Corp's Eastern Airlines complete previously announce plan sell travel agency automation SystemOne Direct Access Inc computer communication support unit EAL Automation Systems Inc SystemOne Corp wholly-owned subsidiary Texas Air Corp. Reuter 

National Gypsum Co unit Aancor Holdings Inc offering 300 mln dlrs priority senior subordinate note due 1997 11-3/8 pct coupon par pricing. Non-redeemable five issue rat B-2 Moody's Investors Service Inc B Standard Poor's Corp. A sinking fund start 1994 retire 75 pct note maturity. Proceeds terminate company's current revolve credit facility. Goldman Sachs Co Merrill Lynch Capital Markets underwrote deal. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 110 mln dlrs debt Michigan General Corp. Reduced company's 10-3/4 pct senior subordinate debenture 1998 Caa B-3. Moody's cite Michigan's ongoing loss impaired liquidity weaken financial flexibility lessen likelihood operating performance improve. Michigan's principal lumber housebuilding product sale operates cyclical highly competitve environment debt restructuring probably improve earnings Moody's point out. Reuter 

Shr 68 ct v 68 ct Net 53.9 mln v 53.2 mln Assets 26.5 billion v 22.2 billion Loans 15.7 billion v v 13.3 billion Deposits 13.8 billion v v 11.6 billion Reuter 

Air Canada state-owned airline plan begin flight Egypt follow bilateral air trade agreement sign Egyptian Canadian governments. "Egypt healthy passenger cargo air market Air Canada powerful competitor" executive vice-president Roger Linder said. The airline link service European stops. It plan far expansion destination Middle East Asia trans-Pacific route Canada Far East. Reuter 

Fidelity International Ltd Bermuda-based investment advisory firm affiliate investment firm American Values III N.V. acquire 208000 share Blasius Industries Inc. In filing Securities Exchange Commission bought stake amount 5.3 pct total outstanding common stock acquire equity company investment purposes. The raise stake sell plan seek control company. Reuter 

Energy Minister Marcel Masse announce series conference held across Canada review country's policy option energy sector. "It plan comprehensive review Canadian energy issue examination energy situation attempt identify evaluate option future" Masse speech luncheon Toronto available here. The meeting chair Tom Kierans President McLeod Young Weir Ltd begin June Calgary Alberta conclude December Montreal. The energy minister elaborate federal legislation result process. A final report issue conference session Masse position respond report time. In speech Masse prefer government's energy policy retain market base add government intervention sometimes necessary. "I believe accept importance allow market function great freedom flexibility" said. "However intervention kind market perfect exist imperfect world" Masses said. Reuter 

Conoco unit DuPont Co interested buying Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP> Canadian oil company discussion unidentified companies. "To knowledge part" Conoco spokesman Sondra Fowler said. Houston-based Conoco mention market speculation identity companies. Yesterday Dome receive 4.3 billion Canadian dlr offer asset TransCanada PipeLines Ltd TMP>. Reuter 

First Family Group Inc sale March increase 27 pct ago month 4.4 mln dlrs 3.5 mln dlrs. The company report third quarter sale increase 35 pct 14.5 mln dlrs 10.6 mln dlrs. First Family Group report sale nine month fiscal 1987. It sale 54.5 mln dlrs compare 52.7 mln dlrs ago. Reuter 

Bechtel sign aa contract Lewis County Public Utility District start preliminary design 100-mln-dlr Cowlitz Falls Hydroelectric Project Washington. The 70-megawatt project generate 250 mln kilowatt hour annually serve 21000 resident Lewis. Bechtel anew generation concept call hydrocombine save 15 pct cost project. Reuter 

Shr seven ct v 24 ct Net 1114000 v 3676000 Revs 43.6 mln v 41.2 mln Nine mths Shr 25 ct v 64 ct Net 3952000 v 9614000 Revs 118.6 mln v 119.9 mln Reuter 

Slater Industries Inc plan 15 mln dlr modernization Slater Steels Corp Fort Wayne specialty bar division Indiana. It modernization involve replacement exist bar mill high-speed quick-change continuous mill. The facility low labor mill cost enhance product quality range Slater said. Completion date mill undisclosed. Reuter 

Adams-Russell Co Inc agree acquire cable television system serve 7000 customer New York State Sammons Communications Inc undisclosed terms. Adams-Russell system operate Wellsville Amity Andover Scio Willing Belmont Milo Jerusalem Benton Penn Yan N.Y. Reuter 

Shr 27 ct v shr 18 ct Net 477000 v 305000 Reuter 

Forber Platel Inc> file demand arbitration Medi-Rx America Inc seek damage five mln dlrs. The company demand alleges breach contract tortious interference contractual relationship fraud. The company sign contract Medi-Rx sell mail prescription service prescribed medical product Medi-Rx. The company Medi-Rx violate term contract fail pay commission provide agreement. Reuter 

Gulf Canada Corp acquire 25 pct work Gulf Suez oil concession undisclosed terms. The company agreement operator Conoco Hurghada Inc Hispanoil cover 168374-acre East Hurghada offshore concession. It 15.6 mln U.S. dlr four-well plan 1987. After acquisition subject Egyptian government approval work interest Hurghada block Conoco Hurghada 45 pct Hispanoil 30 pct Gulf Canada balance. Reuter 

Convergent Technologies Inc expect report quarter loss twice size 4.8-mln-dlr loss report fourth quarter 1986. Convergent report quarter 1986 profit 2100000 dlrs five ct share. The company result decline quarter traditional OEM system group. The anticipate loss reflect low expect operating margin start-up cost product manufacturing high plan expenses. Reuter 

G. Heileman Brewing Co Inc agree acquire trademark Philadelphia-based C. Schmidt produce line malt beverage product include Schmidt Rheingold Duquesne Ortlieb. In 1986 Schmidt sell 1.6 mln barrels. Under term propose agreement Heileman enter trademark transfer agreement provide royalty paid Schmidt specify period beverage product produce C. Schmidt labels. Reuter 

Texaco Inc told security analyst meeting settlement offer Pennzoil Co PZL> offer accord analyst attend meeting. "The message likely settle follow bankruptcy filing" Richard Pzena Sanford C. Bernstein Co attend meeting. Texaco yesterday file Chapter 11 bankrupcty protect 10.3 billion dlr judgement award Pennzoil Texaco's illegal takeover Getty Oil Co. Texaco spokesman comment analyst meeting. The company's bankruptcy filing freed Texaco post bond judgment pending appeal Texas Courts. Pennzoil oppose Chapter 11 filing. "They ready willing talk settlement" analyst attend Texaco meeting decline named. "But settlement now" added. The analyst whom recommend Texaco stock cheap company takeover bid. Texaco decline 3-1/8 close 28-1/2 today. Pzena company official meeting agree takeover offer "no comment" reply. He company takeover talk held. "It lot Royal Dutch/Shell RD> Exxon Corp XON> it" Pzena said. "But wouldn't hostile offer." "This open acquisition" Alan Edgar Prudential Bache Capital Funding Dallas. "There's lot volume (in stock) tell someone's mess around" added. Texaco actively trade issue New York Stock Exchange 13 mln share change hands. "I wouldn't rule anything now" John Olson analyst Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. Pennzoil's stock NYSE's active list fell 15-1/4 point close 77. Many analyst bankruptcy filing unfavorable Pennzoil. Reuter 

INTERCO Inc shareholder shareholder Lane Co LANE.O> approve merger companies. In merger Lane's stockholder receive 1.5 share INTERCO common stock outstanding share Lane common stock INTERCO said. Reuter 

Shr 30 ct v 25 ct Net 10.5 mln v 8697589 Revs 71.9 mln v 64.9 mln Reuter 

PacifiCorp May 15 redeem 2.4 mln share prefer stock. The company fully redeem 2.29-dlr par serial prefer 2.48-dlr par serial prefer partially redeem 9.15 pct serial preferred. The 993383 share 2.29-dlr redeem 26.72 dlrs share plus accumulate dividend 0.0565 dlrs. The 976352 share 2.48-dlr prefer redeem 26.24 dlrs share plus dividend 0.0612 dlrs. Pacificorp redeem 87.5 pct 500000 share 9.15 pct prefer 105.78 dlrs plus 0.2257 dlrs dividend. Reuter 

Shr 32 ct v 38 ct Qtrly div 35 ct v 35 ct prior Net 731055 v 865117 NOTE: dividend payable May 20 shareholder record April 24. Reuter 

Dotronix Inc agree principle buy Video Monitors Inc privately-held company. In payment acquisition Dotronix issue 312500 unregistered share common stock note worth 1.8 mln dlrs payable 70000 dlrs cash. Dotronix Video Monitors' sale fiscal end April 30 1986 7.6 mln dlrs. Dotronix income 659663 dlrs sale 7.1 mln dlrs six month end Dec. 31 1986 previously reported. Reuter 

Period end Feb 28 Shr loss 34 ct v loss 58 ct Net loss 1252000 v 2145000 Revs 4539000 v 3504000 SIX MTHS Shr loss 66 ct v loss 86 ct Net loss 2428000 v loss 3163000 Revs 9033000 v 8192000 Reuter 

Advanced Institutional Management Software Inc renegotiate bank credit facility demand note 10-year term note 25-year payment schedule. Reuter 

Genetic Laboratories Inc wholly own subsidiary encorporate reconstructive plastic surgery products. Genetic Laboratories reason move "facilitate sale merger" "with company specialize plastic surgery." Reuter 

Dresser Industries Inc U.S. Court Appeals rule appeal 1985 judgment favor Hughes Tool Co HT> concern patent infringement. The allege Dresser infringe Hughes patent regard drill bit seal device company said. However Dresser Appellate Court aside royalty rate 25 pct select bit arbitarary return district court level ascertain rate. Reuter 

U.S. oil trader Texaco Inc's filing protection Chapter 11 bankruptcy code add uncertainty already skittish oil market opinion divide impact market. "The filing hold wet barrel trading today" trader. "Everyone talk assess company's situation relation Texaco" added. Some trader company deal Texaco concerned whether receive payment supply bankruptcy filing. However worried. "The paid trading community connect Texaco shipping industry" New York trader said. "If Texaco doesn't crude supply can't run refinery asset worth anything" added. Texaco file protection Chapter 11 U.S. bankruptcy code yesterday fail reach settlement Pennzoil 11 billion dlrs court award illegally interferring Pennzoil's propose purchase Getty Oil Co. However worried. "The paid trading community connect Texaco shipping industry" New York trader said. "If Texaco doesn't crude supply can't run refinery asset worth anything" added. Texaco file protection Chapter 11 U.S. bankruptcy code yesterday fail reach settlement Pennzoil 11 billion dlrs court award illegally interferring Pennzoil's propose purchase Getty Oil Co. "There reluctance trade Texaco change" trader add trader tend prudence dealing company. Traders assess whether require cash prepayment letter credit continue trade usual Texaco line basis said. Another trader described today's activity usual add trader feel secure lien Texaco's asset bankruptcy. Traders apparent effect Texaco filing crude future trading exchange low Texaco's position limit require high margin Texaco's trades. New York Mercantile Exchange President Rosemary McFadden decline comment Texaco's future trading say proprietary information. McFadden matter procedure exchange low allowable position limit increase margin requirement company financial trouble. Reuter 

ERC International file quarter offering 25 mln dlrs principal amount convertible subordinate debenture due 2012. It file registration statement Securities Exchange Commission. Proceeds repay exist debt balance acquisition additional work capital company said. Reuter 

Shr 1.18 dlrs v 1.15 dlrs Net 19.7 mln v 19.3 mln Assets 10.05 billion v 9.62 billion Deposits 8.56 billion v 8.04 billion Net loan 6.95 billion v 6.71 billion Reuter 

Qtly dividend 73 ct v 73 ct Pay June 10 Record May 15 Reuter 

Merrill Lynch Co Inc MER> subsidiary seek Borg-Warner Corp realize 30 mln dlr fee effort whether deal value 4.7 billion dlrs succeeds. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Merrill Lynch Capital Partners Inc receive 30 mln dlr fee survive company act dealer manager merger Borg-Warner deal completed. But receive break-up fee 30 mln dlrs deal fails reason include party hold 40 pct stock tender 50 pct. The 30 mln dlr fee high tender offer agreement either compensation dealer manager service break-up deal. Merrill Lynch Capital Markets back investor organize launch 48.50 dlr share tender offer Borg-Warner 90 pct stock. The company's board approve plan intend thwart unsolicited offer GAF Corp. Borg-Warner agree redeem outstanding Series A prefer share pay option 48.50 dlr share exercise price merger effective said. Merrill Lynch representative discuss leveraged buyout Borg-Warner December. At Merrill Lynch told company consider 43 dlr share tender offer cash security Borg-Warner board approve said. On Feb 24 told company decide buyout. But talk revive GAF launch 46 dlr share proposal March 31 Merrill Lynch said. Unlike earlier proposal Merrill Lynch Borg-Warner management deal condition payment fees. In addition fee Merrill Lynch 17 mln dlrs Borg-Warner cover expense tender offer. Merrill Lynch continue operating Borg-Warner subsidiary current officer keep positions. But flexibility purpose Merrill Lynch consider redistribute Borg-Warner's asset subsdiaries entity create carry merger. All Merrill Lynch estimate 130 mln dlrs fee expense connect deal. Another 250 mln dlrs need repay debt Borg-Warner Merrill Lynch said. To finance deal Merrill Lynch expect borrow 3.5 billion dlrs bank sell 100 mln dlrs common stock company sell 100 mln dlrs non-voting prefer stock company Merrill Lynch Co sell 650 mln dlrs subordinate note Merrill Lynch Co sell 204 mln dlrs subordinate discount debentures. GAF raise offer 48 dlrs share cash. Reuter 

United Food Commercial Workers International Union local currently bargaining Supermarkets General Corp prepared demand additional job security recent takeover attempt Dart Group Corp. The union represent 10000 Pathmark workers. Reuter 

Paradyne Corp sign contract Van Waters Rogers Inc subsidiary UNIVAR Corp supply data communication network. The contract value 1.5 mln dlrs include Paradyne modem multiplexer ANALYSIS network management NetCare service Paradyne said. Reuter 

President Reagan's chief staff decision U.S.-Soviet summit emerge Secretary State George Shultz' Moscow talk Soviet Foreign Minister Eduard Shevardnadze. Chief Staff Howard Baker note Reagan's invitation Kremlin chief Mikhail Gorbachev visit United States summit Geneva November 1985 table. "I surprised subject discuss secretary Soviet Foreign Minister" Baker told reporters. "I surprised sort decision result conversations." Reuter 

Pennzoil Co frustrate Texaco Inc's TX> decision seek bankruptcy protection 10.3 billion dlr court judgment prepare launch assault include investigate asset Texaco transfer corporate parent subsidiary legal expert said. Joe Jamail Houston lawyer Pennzoil company file challenge Texaco's bankruptcy petition sometime week accuse oil giant bad faith ignore fiduciary responsibility shareholders. The action ignite round debate company stem Texaco's 1984 acquisition Getty Oil Co 10.2 billion dlrs company Pennzoil believe agreement buy. "We're do lot like" Jamail refer bankruptcy court proceed New York. Some legal expert suggest mud-slinging battle bankruptcy court company provoke Congressional whether bankruptcy code lenient permit profitable firm freeze debts. Texaco asset total 34.9 billion dlrs sought protection Sunday Chapter 11 federal bankruptcy code risk have Texas appeal court company post security bond entire amount Pennzoil judgment. Gerald Treece dean South Texas College Law observer litigation past Pennzoil unlikely prove Texaco qualify bankruptcy court simply giant oil company positive cash flow asset exceed liabilities. But Pennzoil successful raise issue whether Texaco improperly transfer asset corporate parent subsidiary unaffected bankruptcy filing Treece said. "Pennzoil's lawyer dog barking heel Texaco wherever go" Treece "I surprised level intensity Pennzoil search hidden Texaco assets." Jamail Pennzoil object Texaco's transfer oil refinery chemical plant Port Arthur Texas corporate parent subsidiary Dec. 9 1985 court judge enter record jury award Texaco. Jamail suggest refinery chemical plant value 1.1 billion dlrs deliberately place reach Texas jury judgment. But Richard Lieb attorney Kronish Lieb Weiner Hellman New York Texaco elect additional subsidiary bankruptcy necessary. In petition file Sunday Texaco Inc corporate parent financial subsidiary include bankruptcy case. The business account pct Texaco's total revenues. Mickey Sheinfeld Houston lawyer represent Continental Airlines historic bankruptcy aside labor union agreement track record bitter Texaco-Pennzoil struggle indicates company spend fight bankruptcy court. "The court interested issue good-faith bankruptcy filings. This prove landmark develop issue" Sheinfeld said. Texaco follow example Manville Corp A.H. Robins Co firm fell bankruptcy expressly avoid pay legal judgments. Bankruptcy law relaxed 1978 company longer need prove insolvent seek protection creditors. Texaco lawyer bristle suggestion company enter bankruptcy spite Pennzoil. Gibson Gayle Texaco lawyer company seek protection creditor Texaco embark internal restructuring plan December 1984 require transfer various asset subsidiaries. But Treece profile Texaco bankruptcy company uncomfortable spotlight. "What seem fair legally correct entirely things" Treece said. "This signal Congress tighten bankruptcy laws. You either chicken duck either bankrupt you're not." Reuter 

The late British opinion poll give Margaret Thatcher's Conservative party huge 17 lead opposition -- high rating yet prime minister seek record third consecutive term. The poll today's Sun popular tabloid show Conservatives win solid majority 125 seat Parliament election. Thatcher call election June 1988 widely expect call year. The survey give Conservatives 44 pct vote left-wing Labour centrist Liberal-Social Democratic Alliance 27 pct each. Reuter 

Texaco Inc Pennzoil Co apart settlement 10.3 billion dlrs dispute side willing settle executive company said. Pennzoil chairman J. Hugh Liedtke MacNeil/Lehrer News Hour Pennzoil offer settle dispute line suggest Wall Street analyst - range five billion dlrs - Texaco Inc president James Kinnear heard five billion dlrs figure. Kinnear television news Pennzoil talk five billion dlrs previously. Both executive taped separate interview accuse irresponsible action ongoing legal battle involves Texaco's 1984 takeover Getty Oil Co. Yesterday Texaco file protection Chapter 11 U.S. Bankruptcy code state unable continue legal fight. Liedtke Pennzoil prepared litigate matter take bring final conclusion. Lietke 18 month conclude case. Asked chance settlement window Liedtke reply "I've case. I believe settled. But settle Texaco position either settle basis hold breath till die." But Kinnear "we offer reasonable settlement." Kinnear confirm remark analyst meeting earlier Texaco settle matter offer before. "The offer yesterday won't repeat tomorrow" Kinnear said. Kinnear charge Pennzoil "using extortionary pressure deny ability conduct business." He pressure force company Chapter 11 filing. But add hop dispute settled. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp's Chrysler Motors Corp Chrysler Training Corp non-profit organization sell name asset Motech Auto Mechanic Body Shop Schools O/E Corp Troy Mich. The sale price disclosed. Under Internal Revenue Service code proceeds sale Motech donate tax-exempt nonprofit organization. Chrysler reveal name receive proceeds. Reuter 

Shr 63 ct v 47 ct Net 16.8 mln v 12.4 mln Sales 248.6 mln v 233.3 mln Reuter 

Dense-Pac Microsystems Inc name James Turner chief executive officer. He replaces Anthony Macedo act interim basis remains director. Turner president Titan Severe Environment Systems Co. Reuter 

Diceon Electronics Inc enter agreement principal buy closely-held Symtron Corp stock exchange transaction. Under pact Diceon exchange 300000 share stock Symtron's shares. The acquisition subject board approval definitive agreement expect conclude May. Diceon Symtron management continue run wholly-owned subsidiary. Symtron 1986 sale 20 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Advanced Genetic Sciences Inc receive final authorization field test genetically alter bacteria Frostban developed protect fruit nut crop frost damage. The company permit California Department Food Agriculture final clearance need end one-half laboratory greenhouse test various government approvals. A concerned environmental safety test try repeatedly block government approval testing. "Its's gratify government relies scientific expertise reach decision reject rhetoric delayed risk-free field trial long" Advanced Genetic Sciences President Chief Executive Officer Joseph Bouckaert. The company expect begin test strawberry plant cover one-fifth acre spring. The test site near Brentwood California. Reuter 

Ecuador resume limited crude output week fill storage tank step pump oil Colombian pipeline May Ecuadorean Petroleum Corp (CEPE) said. CEPE manager Carlos Romoleroux told reporter Ecuador begin pump unspecified amount crude northeastern jungle oilfield week preparation send oil pipeline link-up neighbour Colombia. Oil production Ecuador halt March five earthquake damage country's main pipeline Lago Agrio heart Ecuadorean jungle oilfield pacific port Balao. It July repair pipeline return output normal levels. The country pump 245000 bpd 250000 bpd tremor. To resume limited output meantime Ecuador construct 26 mile pipeline linkup capable carry 55000 bpd Lago Agrio Puerto Colon start Colombia's pipeline Pacific port Tumaco. The original target date resume limited crude output May eight schedule date inauguration Lago Agrio Puerto Colon pipeline energy ministry spokesman said. Reuter 

New Zealand's consumer price index CPI measure rate inflation rise 2.3 pct quarter end March 31 8.9 pct rise December 1986 quarter 2.3 pct rise March 1986 quarter Statistics Department said. For 12 month end March 1987 CPI rise 18.3 pct 18.2 pct 12 month end December 1986 13.0 pct 12 month end March 1986 statement. Nearly half increase late quarterly index contribute housing department said. The December quarter significantly affected introduction 10 pct value add good service tax GST October 1986 added. However GST charge measure December 1986 quarter influence late March quarterly figure said. This unavoidable lag price information particularly housing car insurance household content added. Reuter 

The late British opinion poll give Margaret Thatcher's Conservatives 17-point lead opposition -- high rating yet Prime Minister seek record third consecutive term. The poll today's Sun tabloid show Conservatives win majority 125 seat Parliament elections. Thatcher call election June 1988 expect year. The survey conduct April 10 12 1000 adult eligible vote give Conservatives 44 pct left-wing Labour centrist Liberal-Social Democratic Alliance 27 pct each. 

The operation Colombia Texas Petroleum Co subsidiary Texaco Inc affected legal dispute Pennzoil Co manager John Buttle communique. The company yesterday file protection Chapter 11 Bankruptcy code. He Texaco Inc operate outside United States operation Texas Petroleum unaffected. Texas Petroleum Co post seven mln dlr profit 1986 Colombia exploit association state-run oil company Ecopetrol crude natural gas wells. Reuter 

The Bank Japan intervene Tokyo buy dollar market open dealer said. The dollar open 142.05 yen 142.15/25 New York 142.50 close yesterday. The bank step market amid sell pressure interbank dealer dealer said. REUTER 

Japanese Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told press conference expect U.S. Trade deficit eventually start reflect economic fundamental influence exchange rates. The minister refer U.S. Trade data release Washington today. Miyazawa told major industrial nation Washington week exchange rate necessarily good. He earlier Washington current exchange rate level imply February Paris currency accord. REUTER 

No formal talk schedule yet company involve controversial proposal merge group seek enter Japan's international telecommunication sector official said. "Nothing firm yet" official International Digital Communications Planning Inc> (IDC) group study compete Kokusai Denshin Denwa Co Ltd> monopolises sector. Britain's Cable Wireless Plc CAWL.L> hold 20 pct share IDC oppose plan merge rival International Telecom Japan Inc>. Under plan back Post Telecommunications Ministry Cable Wireless U.S.-based Pacific Telesis International Inc> core company merge firm share equal six major Japanese core company seat board directors. Britain angry feel move restrict Cable Wireless' role sector view issue test case. The IDC official decline specify hold talks. A spokesman C. Itoh Co Ltd CITT.T> hold 20 pct IDC meeting held week. REUTER 

Members Chicago Mercantile Exchange (CME) reject membership petition ban dual trading Standard Poor's 500 stock index future option future exchange said. Members vote 1272 525 proposal prohibit fill customer order trading account know dual trading S P contracts. Instead outright ban dual trading CME board adopt rule include limitation dual trading stock index product sent Commodity Futures Trading Commission approval. The rule limit top step S P 500 future option pit active contract trade broker fill customer order only. They transact account. The CME week hire compliance officer increase staff market surveillance department enhance security regulation exchange. The rule change require broker S P future option manually record near minute personal trade stock index products. Finally board vote impose strict limit trading broker group applicable entire exchange redefine broker group completely cover form associations. A percentage limitation personal trading broker member percentage limitation fill order broker set. John Sandner CME board chairman statement original petition adversely affected liquidity discriminate broker deprive customer choose broker dual trader. REUTER 

About 2000 sugar cane planter march Port-au-Prince protest closure Haiti's large sugar mill big employer. The Haitian American Sugar Company close Friday huge surplus unsold sugar. The firm Haiti flood smuggle refine unrefined sugar Dominican Republic refine U.S. Sugar Miami. The closure idle 3500 factory worker left 30000 cane planter outlet cane. The protester blame Finance Minister Lesly Delatour closure say policy hurt Haitian businesses. REUTER 

China major aluminium importer phase big aluminium plant October 1 China Daily said. The phase plant locate Qinghai province annual capacity 100000 tonne ingot half capacity finish plant. It turn 4000 tonne 1987 paper give details. Construction 510 mln yuan plant April 1984. Customs figure show China import 266241 tonne aluminium alloy 1986 487862 1985. REUTER 

Taiwan import 210000 tonne South African maize January 1 April 13 joint committee local maize importer said. Under three-year agreement sign South Africa export 600000 tonne maize Taiwan. A committee spokesman told Reuters rest year's quota ship rest 1987. REUTER 

A 50 pct cut import tariff soybean boost 1987 U.S. Soybean export Taiwan spokesman joint committee soybean importer told Reuters. He cut 3.5 seven pct approve cabinet yesterday effect week. The cut encourage local importer increase 1987 soybean import 1.9 mln tonne 1.74 mln said. The previous target 1987 1.81 tonnes. Taiwan import 90 pct soybean U.S. And rest South America. The spokesman increase import U.S. Is line government effort reduce Taiwan's trade surplus Washington rise 3.61 billion U.S. Dlrs quarter 1987 2.78 billion ago. "The tariff cut helpful American supplier (who want) boost export Taiwan" Steve Chen country director American Soybean Association told Reuters. REUTER 

China short sorghum 1987 sixth successive production cost low profit discourage farmer grow China Daily Business Weekly said. It sorghum output calendar 1986 5.34 mln tonne five pct 1985 level price free market rise January 0.42 yuan kg 14 pct January 1986. It sorghum acreage 1987 six pct low 1986. Sorghum account 40 pct raw material need China's brewery add give details. REUTER 

Japan's broadly define money supply average M-2 plus certificate deposit (CD) rise preliminary 9.0 pct March earlier compare 8.8 pct rise February Bank Japan said. The seasonally adjust March average M-2 plus CDs rise 0.8 pct February rise identical 0.8 pct month earlier said. Unadjusted M-2 plus CDs stood average 343600 billion yen March compare 336015 billion February. REUTER 

Traders financial centre Asia generally welcome U.S. Night session future trading start Chicago April 30. Traders Japan Sydney Hong Kong expect move bring benefit trader banker Singapore pose serious threat Singapore International Monetary Exchange (SIMEX). The Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) Washington give unanimous approval Chicago Board Trade's (CBT) proposal Tuesday. The CBT plan offer future U.S. Treasury note bond option future 1800 2100 hr Chicago (2300 0200 gmt) Mondays Thursdays. The session mark start trading close day. The propose hour design coincide busiest morning trading hour Japan. But Andrea Corcoran chief CFTC's division trading market Tuesday expect even session attract primarily U.S. Firms look additional overnight protection. Traders Tokyo session expect expand U.S. Treasury bond trading volume enlarge daily fluctuation range Tokyo. They Japanese financial institution interested use overseas future market wait finance ministry approval so. Approval expect month. The foreign branch financial institution already trade future practice little them. But trader timing launch poor ten period Tokyo holidays. The Tokyo trader holiday little trading expect May 5. Tokyo bond manager participation limited lack experienced future trader Tokyo. The Sydney Futures Exchange (SFE) hop four-hour trading overlap CBT hour boost activity Sydney's eurodollar U.S. Treasury bond contract spokesman Stephen Calder said. The eurodollar contract link London International Financial Futures Exchange (LIFFE). Calder turnover contract disappointingly low introduce October. He CBT move broaden arbitrage opportunity SFE traders. "With late even lead Chicago there's chance deal afternoon" said. But Singapore news CBT move welcomed. A senior executive Japanese security firm operating Singapore told Reuters: "Expanding global link future market mean SIMEX add Chicago London Sydney list rivals." "LIFFE cut far SIMEX contract U.S treasury bond contract off-set CBOT" Singapore-based Japanese trader said. Such contract expect said. Other SIMEX trader local Sydney treasury bond contract boost Sydney exchange establish three-way link Chicago London. LIFFE sign memorandum understand CBOT link. "If link-up materializes trader likely by-pass SIMEX" trader. Hong Kong commodity trader welcome CFTC's decision add local investor interested financial futures. "I move increase market share here" Joseph Tan manager Bache Securities (HK) Ltd>. He Bache local unit U.S. Commodity house participate Chicago's rregular hour trading extend business. Local Hong Kong house welcome move spokesman Shun Loong Co investor interested stock index currency future available. Futures contract local Hang Seng index increasingly popular introduce market May 1986. (See ECRA Spotlight Index) REUTER 

Guangdong International Trust Investment Corp prepare issue 300 mln HK dlrs bond Hong Kong China Daily Business Weekly said. It issue bond issue Hong Kong local organisation give details. REUTER 

South Korea decide major change trade investment finance policy aim reduce growth balance payment surplus avoid trade United States Deputy Prime Minister Kim Mahn-je said. Kim told reporter excessively fast rise export South Korea reliant export increase nflation produce trade friction. The policy shift mean abandon Seoul's goal rapidly reduce foreign debt work series ministerial meetings. Kim Economic Planning Minister current account surplus previously expect exceed eight billion dlrs held five billion dlrs increase import accelerate market liberalisation rationalise exports. He Seoul try limit current account surplus five billion dlrs trade volume continue grow. "This gradually reduce ratio surplus GNP (gross product) current five pct level pct 1991" added. Koo Bon-yong aide Kim South Korea's foreign debt expect fall below 40 billion dlrs 1987 initial forecast 41.8 billion 44.5 billion dlrs end-1986. "But (with policy changes) debt expect remain above 40 billion dlrs low originally project 41.8 billion dlrs" said. The policy change announce day schedule arrival U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige talk Trade Minister Rha Woong-bae. South Korea U.S. Pressure reduce bilateral trade surplus rise 7.4 billion dlrs 4.3 billion dlrs 1985. Kim policy change prompt swing South Korea's current account surplus 2.06 billion dlrs quarter 1987 deficit 438 mln dlrs 1986 period. First quarter 1987 export rise 36 pct 9.4 billion dlrs. The government foreign currency loan worth 2.5 billion dlrs firm willing import capital good raw material equipment preferably U.S. He said. "The foreign currency-based loan carry 1.5 point above LIBOR (London Interbank Offered Rate) considerable incentive increase imports" Koo said. Koo loan repayable foreign currency. "It mean interest-free loan Korean currency continue rise value" said. He South Korean won revalue dollar gradually add "We believe rapid one-shot change value won." The won fix 839.70 dollar risen six pct dollar begin 1986. REUTER 

Japan's vehicle export fell 3.8 pct 6.59 mln end March 31 1987 vehicle output fell 1.2 pct 12.27 mln industry source said. Toyota Motor Corp TOYO.T> export fell 5.5 pct 1.87 mln 1986/87 comprise 1.20 mln car 0.8 pct earlier 649587 truck 11.7 pct 14797 bus 48.2 pct. Nissan Motor Co Ltd NSAN.T> 1986/87 export fell 8.1 pct 1.29 mln. They comprise 1.03 mln car 0.3 pct earlier 258278 truck 29.5 pct 4857 bus 37.1 pct. Toyota's export U.S. Rose 4.2 pct earlier 1.01 mln Europe rise 17.7 pct 428977. Of European total shipment West Germany rise 46.9 pct 96589 U.K. Fell 13.9 pct 34131. Toyota's 1986/87 export Middle East fell 56.8 pct 71631 Southeast Asia fell 58.2 pct 62145. Nissan export U.S. Fell 5.5 pct 659118. Exports Europe rise 17.3 pct 413462 West Germany rise 43.3 pct 97284 U.K. Fell 8.9 pct 100831. Exports Middle East fell 59.6 pct 40679those Southeast Asia fell 55.8 pct 33398. REUTER 

State-owned Bank China bought five pct share BAII Holding SA financial institution register Luxembourg China Daily Business Weekly said. It institution 50 pct own Arab interest wholly own commercial banking branch Hong Kong give details. REUTER 

Saudi Arabia hope increase volume oil export Japan expand bilateral trade Saudi Arabian Interior Minister Naif bin Abdul-Aziz said. He told Tokyo reception country hope raise crude product export Japan earlier level elaborate. To promote trade Saudi Arabia invite Japanese industry said. Japanese firm long-term contract import total 150000 barrel Saudi crude. REUTER 

U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng Japan farm market far Washington cut trade deficit ease protectionist pressure Agriculture Ministry official told reporters. Hideo Maki Director General ministry's Economic Affairs Bureau quote Lyng tell Agriculture Minister Mutsuki Kato removal import restriction Japan United States. The meeting Kato open 12-day visit Japan Lyng dicuss farm trade. However Maki quote Kato reply Japan already world's large grain importer. Kato add Japan large customer U.S. Grain depend domestic output 53 pct food requirement 1985. Lyng U.S. Put priority talk 12 farm product name U.S. Complaints Japan General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) beef citrus product rice. Kato Japan maintain current level self-sufficiency try produce surplus rice potential production high domestic demand. The farm market suffers surplus rise production export country added. Lyng U.S. Has try reduce farm product output expensive program Maki said. Maki U.S. And Japan hold detailed discussion trade item round GATT trade talk meeting April 20 U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter join. REUTER 

South Korea's Securities Supervisory Board order security house report tomorrow list client hold share worth 100 mln won Board official said. They aim prevent investor manipulate Seoul exchange illegal margin profits. "It believe shareholder responsible overheat market earlier year" official told Reuters. No far detail given. REUTER 

At 60000 tonne corn worth 240 mln peso smuggle Philippines past month Manila Bulletin newspaper quote official National Food Authority (NFA). The official name corn shortage corruption custom Coast Guard personnel jeopardise government's ban corn import aim save foreign currency. The newspaper quote NFA Marketing Director Jig Tan say monthly corn consumption stood 331000 tonne stock inventory 191732 tonnes. Tan continue drought affect 49150 hectare corn lead loss 43725 tonne corn worth 174.9 mln peso contribute shortage. The newspaper quote Linda Geraldez NFA statistician say despite drought shortage total inventory January/June crop season expect 201000 tonnes. REUTER 

The Washington Post U.S. Commerce Department yesterday issue report show U.S. Merchandise trade deficit 13.65 billion dollar February reduction 1.4 billion dlrs 15.06 billion figure department report day earlier. The newspaper said: "News unexpectedly 15 billion deficit help batter dollar's value foreign exchange market boost U.S. Interest rates. "However report largely unnoticed financial market downward revision deficit monthly occurrence." The Washington Post said: "By law department publish top commerce official agree mislead trade figure wait 48 hour put accurate ones." No immediately available Commerce Department comment Washington Post report. REUTER 

South Korea's index lead indicator rise 1.9 pct 172.9 (base 1980) February 0.8 pct rise January stand 17.2 pct high Feburary 1986 provisional Economic Planning Board figure show. The index base 10 indicator include export value letter credit receive warehouse stock M-1 M-3 money supply figure composite stock exchange index. REUTER 

Dai Nippon Printing Co Ltd DPRI.T> issue convertible yen bond domestic markets. It issue 25 billion yen 15-year bond placement Yamaichi Securities Co Ltd lead manager. It issue 15 billion yen 10-year bond 10 billion yen six-year bond placement Nomura Securities Co Ltd lead manager. Coupon conversion price par-priced bond Dai Nippon's board meeting. Payment due June 1. The 15-year bond mature May 31 2002 10-year May 30 1997 six-year May 31 1993. Dai Nippon's share price rise 20 1800 yen Tokyo Stock Exchange today. REUTER 

The Finance Ministry likely allow Japanese financial institution overseas financial future market month bond market source said. A senior ministry official decline exact timing expect removal ban trading overseas financial future soon possible. The domestic call participation overseas market hedge foreign security hold risk reinforce launch trading session Chicago Board Trade April 30. The session cover morning trading hour Tokyo. Resident financial institution currently allow participate foreign financial future market overseas branch may. The newly eligible institution expect security house bank insurance company investment trust market source said. But ministry likely prohibit broking institution individual source said. In addition corporate investor expect bar initially relative lack experience. REUTER 

Japan's ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) call adequate flexible management nation's monetary police plan expand domestic demand senior LDP official told Reuters. Junichiro Koizumi LDP committee work plan phrase take imply immediate cut Japan's 2.5 pct discount rate. "The LDP generally believe far discount rate cut moment" said. But Koizumi LDP rule rate cut necessary future. Bank Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita told press conference Wednesday central bank intention ease credit conditions. REUTER 

French corporate bankruptcy rise seasonally-adjusted 2857 month 2631 February 2572 March 1986 National Statistics Institute (INSEE) said. The rise progressive bankruptcy total 2367 January 2195 December 1986. The cumulative total quarter 7855 bankruptcy pct 7560 quarter 1986. REUTER 

The Finance Ministry India's wholesale-price link inflation rate drop marginally 5.3 pct fiscal 1986/87 end March 5.8 pct 1985/86 7.1 pct 1984/85. The average wholesale-price related inflation stood 5.2 pct March 5.1 pct ago Ministry statement. It wholesale price cement textile jute fell 1986/87 compare previous milk cereal (mainly wheat rice) fruit vegetable edible oil tobacco fertiliser costlier 1986/87. REUTER 

International bank radically change attitude towards debt lending debtor nation explore method ensure inflow Philippine Central Bank Governor Jose Fernandez said. "Commercial bank tend difficult term money now" told reporter news conference. "Within enormous change take attitude banks." He bank longer flush fund post-1973 oil boom reluctant lend money. "They don't money ... They deposit base eroding" Fernandez said. Groups major bank decide international arena liking. "They wind 7/8 (over Eurodollar rates) want 7/8 really? It's nothing. They frill don't frills." The Philippines Wednesday announce want renegotiate debt restructuring accord reach March 27 12-bank advisory committee say want term grant Argentina earlier week. Argentina grant 19-year repayment 13/16 point Eurodollar rate historically low spread Mexico won October Philippines insist deal similar Mexico's restructure 10.3 billion dlrs 28.2 billion dlr foreign debt 7/8. Fernandez type new-money agreement hundred bank force involuntary lending advisory committee negotiate agreement debtor country become increasingly difficult. He involuntary lending prove useful Mexican debt crisis 1982. "But tendency bank specially regionals one either sell portfolio simply policy money" Fernandez said. He disturb development so-called quota approach adopt group banks. "Groups bank nationality chosen look group bank country willing British bank wind give 99 pct need U.S. Banks 92 pct British bank pull out" said. "There bank decide lending more. They deal security investment banking turnover carry business" Fernandez said. "We thread constellation bank whom objectives." He survive Philippines try stimulate type inflow "whether direct investment whether investment institution chosen lend invest whether debt equity conversions." REUTER 

Japan's Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) drawn detailed plan call tax cut increase government purchase foreign good committee work plan Junichiro Koizumi said. The plan urge government double 1985's official development assistance 7.6 billion dlrs five instead seven government promise senior LDP official press conference. LDP executive council chairman Shintaro Abe explain plan U.S. Officials visit U.S. On April 19. Abe's visit prepare Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's talk President Ronald Reagan month. Koizumi LDP plan specify size tax cut amount domestic demand stimulated. However top LDP executive figure Abe able offer specific U.S. Officials. The propose increase procurement foreign good government probably include purchase super computer LDP official said. specific trade problem nation encourage flow fund develop country official said. The LDP expect measure prop economy lessen trade problem U.S. They added. The basic idea LDP's plan present welcome monetary authority major industrial nation Washington week said. The LDP plan form basis package stimulate Japanese domestic demand unveiled government late May. REUTER 

China's trade deficit quarter fell 1.05 billion dlrs 3.04 billion 1986 period custom figure show. Zhang Zhongji spokesman State Statistical Bureau quote figure show export rise 27 pct 7.28 billion dlrs import fell 5.1 pct 8.33 billion. He import gift foreign aid item material joint venture exclude deficit 350 mln dlrs surplus invisibles 700 mln. As result foreign exchange reserve increase somewhat level end-1986 give figure. Official figure show reserve 10.514 billion dlrs end-1986 11.9 billion end-1985. Zhang reason rise export improve incentive export firm allow retain foreign exchange good sell. He quarter export Hong Kong Macao rise 35.5 pct 2.48 billion dlrs import rise 55.3 pct 1.46 billion. Exports Japan fell 2.3 pct 1.28 billion import 24.4 pct 2.14 billion. Exports U.S. Rose 23 pct 640 mln dlrs import fell 26.7 pct 840 mln. Exports EEC rise 35.1 pct 770 mln dlrs import fell 3.8 pct 1.5 billion said. REUTER 

Teck Soon Co Ltd major Thai rubber exporter form joint venture state-owned Chinese International Economic Technology Development Corp produce 50000 tonne sheet rubber annually export Chinese auto industry Teck Soon manager Chit Surivitchpan said. Chit joint venture company register capital mln dlrs. China import 69952 tonne Thai sheet rubber 60296 tonne 1985. REUTER 

Basic reform Japan's protect farm sector key shift economy export domestic-led growth vital step trim trade surplus security analyst said. The farm sector protect import tariff quota propped subsidy price support shelter tax ample change said. "In economic term reform plus" Christopher Chew brokerage firm James Capel Co. The ultimate cost exist food price twice Europe time U.S. The analyst said. Spending food account quarter average household's budget roughly 10 pct gross product (GNP) accord study Chew. Reducing price increase household spending five pct study said. The money spent product direct impact boost domestic growth added. "There's lot slack" U.S. Government official Tokyo said. "All money spent else." Direct central government subsidy farm sector amount five billion dlrs year. Independent estimate total subsidy source 37 billion analyst money wasted. Changing tax law encourage city resident farm weekend land sale residential development boost domestic spending economist said. "Housing construction key strategic variable expansion domestic demand" write Chihiro Nakajima professor Kyoto Gakuen University. Japanese group call stag farm reform shift burden trade friction economic restructuring manufacturing sector onto farm sector. Employers group change. "If really expand domestic demand raise wage recklessly reduce commodity prices" Bumpei Otsuki President Japan Federation Employers' Associations told recent press conference. External pressure rise U.S. And Europe seek removal tariff quota reduce trade deficit Japan. But vested Japanese interest oppose change remain entrench dim prospect quick reform analyst said. Although full-time farm population fall sign LDP pay attention urban constituency ruling party remains heavily dependent farm vote rural areas. One rural vote worth city vote due pattern constituency borders. The LDP already political trouble tax reform plan raise sticky issue soon analyst said. Consumer group politically weak tend accept traditional view high price fee pay food security said. Powerful agricultural cooperative fiercely oppose import liberalisation flexible reform aim step productivity said. Reform come response specific pressure all-embracing Chew. REUTER 

Sri Lanka International Monetary Fund (IMF) reach agreement broad outline economic reform tough negotiation likely IMF approves 240 mln dlrs loan senior finance ministry official told Reuters. He government IMF week agree package reduce balance payment deficit improve management enterprise reform tariff develop non-traditional export privatise firms. An IMF-World Bank team visit Colombo month start negotiation detail three-year economic reform programme. "There broad agreement content policy package structural reform" official said. "But area reform tough neotiations place" added. Sri Lanka seek total 240 mln dlrs structural adjustment loan support balance payment compensatory financing facility offset loss commodity exports. Sri Lanka need IMF World Bank approval facility clear negotiation request aid loan donor countries. These include expect pledge 550 mln dlrs 12 industrialise country 240 mln dlrs loan World Bank Asian Development Bank. Finance Minister Ronnie De Mel interview publish Daily News likelihood Sri Lanka obtain aid despite intense lobbying pro-Tamil human right group abroad. He friendly country prepared assist Sri Lanka concessional aid Colombo surmount problem detailed negotiation due May June August loan finalised. "In matter there's slip cup lip government learn cost" De Mel said. REUTER 

The Bank Japan forecast Japan's broadly-defined M-2 money supply average plus certificate deposit (CDs) rise nine pct current April-June quarter 8.5 pct earlier. Unadjusted M-2 plus CDs rise preliminary 8.8 pct January/March 1987 compare nine pct rise earlier said. The bank forecast rise due increase float deposit due recent low rate shift private bank Bank Japan 400-1000 billion yen recently privatise Japanese Railways. REUTER 

Japan's plan stimulate economy inject 5000 billion yen economy appreciate U.S. Ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) executive council chairman Shintaro Abe told reporters. "I expect considerable U.S. Appreciation measure I personally prepared cooperation government LDP solve individual issue pending United States" said. Abe former Foreign Minister start week visit Washington Sunday. Abe meet President Reagan Vice President George Bush Secretary State George Shultz Defence Secretary Caspar Weinberger Treasury Secretary James Baker White House Chief Staff Howard Baker Congressmen possible. Washington likely announce series tariff sanction Japanese electrical product accuse Tokyo fail meet term 1986 bilateral pact computer chip trade. "I ask U.S. Leaders rescind sanctions" Abe. Japanese official Tokyo appeal General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) compensation retaliate U.S. Sanctions materialise. But Abe "We repeat retaliatory measures. What I United States retaliation protectionism alone cannot solve trade disputes." REUTER 

The Dutch transport trading storage firm PHS Van Ommeren NV OMMN.AS> plan 75 mln guilder bond issue warrant attached. The bond maturity 10 repayment five period equal yearly instalments. Each bond 1000 guilder nominal five "A" warrant 20 "B" warrant attached. Each warrant entitles holder acquire non-cancellable share certificate. The exercise period "A" warrant "B" warrant five years. Coupon price bond issue exercise price warrant announce April 27 close Amsterdam Stock Exchange. REUTER 

The European Community (EC) ready measure ensure Japanese export expect effectively exclude U.S. Market divert EC spokesman said. President Reagan expect announce imposition 100 pct tariff 300 mln dlrs worth Japanese good range computer television set tool photographic film. The spokesman EC executive Commission representative member Friday agree series measure prevent Tokyo deflect export EC. The spokesman decline detail measure say technical Commission decide precise content depend exact detail measure announce Reagan. The EC fear Tokyo step export range product include calculate machine measure instrument television tape machine tool result U.S. Measures. But spokesman ample countermeasure Easter holiday. He note probable outline Reagan's announcement date know time. The Japanese manufacturer good likely affected announcement step export United States recent week beat April 17 deadline noted. They therefore unlikely stock available export EC immediately said. REUTER 

Consumer price country Organisation Economic Cooperation Development (OECD) rise 0.3 pct February inflation rise 2.4 pct year-on-year OECD communique. The OECD attribute rise consumer price effect February 1986 drop energy price work index. The February increase Janauary's 0.4 pct increase slightly above average month 1986. Inflation 24 western industrialise nation January revise 1.9 pct year-on-year. Retail energy price rise 0.3 pct January's 1.1 pct increase. Energy price consumer nine pct low earlier said. Consumer price exclude food energy rise 0.3 pct February line previous month acceleration noticeable U.S. And Britain. Among lead seven industrial country consumer price inflation high Italy 4.2 pct follow Canada 4.0 pct Britain 3.9 pct France 3.4 pct U.S. At 2.1 pct West Germany Japan negative rate 0.5 pct 1.4 pct respectively. REUTER 

U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng open talk Japanese government official aware demand opening Japanese rice beef citrus market likely rejected. But interview Reuters flight Tokyo yesterday Lyng goal trip throw international spotlight Japan's agricultural import protection hope pressure build Tokyo markets. "(The Japanese) happy come anything" Lyng said. U.S. Officials expect Japanese concession Lyng's two-week visit here. Any farm trade concession unveiled month said. "If anything consequence offer (Prime Minister Yasuhiro) Nakasone him" visit Washington month U.S. Official said. Lyng plan ask Japan rice import partially lift longstanding ban foreign purchases. A private U.S. Rice trader visit Tokyo week request Japan buy 200000 tonne rice industrial us make sake. Japan reject overture say Tokyo maintains policy self-sufficiency rice. Lyng press Japan eliminate import quota beef April 1988 believe Japanese consumer buy beef currently allowed. He cite example California company transport live U.S. Cattle Japan air slaughter circumvent beef quota. The cost transport high value animal said. U.S. Officials Japan Livestock Industry Promotion Corporation regulates beef import force borrow fiscal 1987 quota earlier 1986 quota exhaust Japanese beef price rising. Japan cannot market beef imports. Along beef U.S. Will press Japan eliminate import quota fresh orange orange juice April 1988. Some U.S. Officials believe Japan eventually willing scrap quota fresh orange liberalize trade necessarily damage Japanese mandarin orange industry. The quota juice harder eliminate import replace domestic produce juice U.S. And Japanese official said. Lyng resurrect past U.S. Proposal Japan buy surplus U.S. Foodgrains donation develop country U.S. Officials skeptical action taken. Lyng urge Japan domestic farm policy include rice negotiate table GATT talk Geneva. He Japan eliminate import quota minor food product U.S. Reprisals. REUTER 

Traders financial center Asia generally welcome U.S. Night session future trading start Chicago April 30. Traders Japan Sydney Hong Kong expect move bring benefit trader banker Singapore pose serious threat Singapore International Monetary Exchange (SIMEX). The Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) Washington give unanimous approval Chicago Board Trade's (CBT) proposal Tuesday. The CBT plan offer future U.S. Treasury note bond option future 1800 2100 hr Chicago (2300 0200 gmt) Mondays Thursdays. The session mark start trading close day. The propose hour design coincide busiest morning trading hour Japan. But Andrea Corcoran chief CFTC's division trading market Tuesday expect even session attract primarily U.S. Firms look additional overnight protection. Traders Tokyo session expect expand U.S. Treasury bond trading volume enlarge daily fluctuation range Tokyo. They Japanese financial institution interested use overseas future market wait finance ministry approval so. Approval expect month. The foreign branch financial institution already trade future practice little them. But trader timing launch poor ten period Tokyo holidays. The Tokyo trader holiday little trading expect May 5. Tokyo bond manager participation limited lack experienced future trader Tokyo. The Sydney Futures Exchange (SFE) hop four-hour trading overlap CBT hour boost activity Sydney's eurodollar U.S. Treasury bond contract spokesman Stephen Calder said. The eurodollar contract link London International Financial Futures Exchange (LIFFE). Calder turnover contract disappointingly low introduce October. He CBT move broaden arbitrage opportunity SFE traders. "With late even lead Chicago there's chance deal afternoon" said. But Singapore news CBT move welcomed. A senior executive Japanese security firm operating Singapore told Reuters: "Expanding global link future market mean SIMEX add Chicago London Sydney list rivals." "LIFFE cut far SIMEX contract U.S treasury bond contract off-set CBOT" Singapore-based Japanese trader said. Such contract expect said. Other SIMEX trader local Sydney treasury bond contract boost Sydney exchange establish three-way link Chicago London. LIFFE sign memorandum understand CBOT link. "If link-up materializes trader likely by-pass SIMEX" trader. Hong Kong commodity trader welcome CFTC's decision add local investor interested financial futures. "I move increase market share here" Joseph Tan manager Bache Securities (HK) Ltd>. He Bache local unit U.S. Commodity house participate Chicago's rregular hour trading extend business. Local Hong Kong house welcome move spokesman Shun Loong Co investor interested stock index currency future available. Futures contract local Hang Seng index increasingly popular introduce market May 1986. (See ECRA Spotlight Index) REUTER 

Air Mauritius lease Boeing 747 SP jumbo jet delivery Boeing 767-200 long-range airliner 1988 airline's manager Tirvengadum told Reuters. The second-hand Boeing 747 acquire renewable one-year lease schedule flight Munich earlier month told Reuters. Tirvengadum twin-engined Boeing 767-200's cost total 130 mln dlrs deliver March April year. Tirvengadum aircraft enable Air Mauritius expand service Europe Australia Far East phase Boeing 707's. The airline begin weekly non-stop service Geneva June hope obtain land right Australia added. Tirvengadum South African Airways currently fly Australia via Mauritius force route November result Australian sanctions. REUTER 

Japan's Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) drawn detailed plan call tax cut increase government purchase foreign good committee work plan Junichiro Koizumi said. The plan urge government double 1985's official development assistance 7.6 billion dlrs five instead seven government promise senior LDP official press conference. LDP executive council chairman Shintaro Abe explain plan U.S. Officials visit U.S. On April 19. Abe's visit prepare Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's talk President Ronald Reagan month. Koizumi LDP plan specify size tax cut amount domestic demand stimulated. However top LDP executive figure Abe able offer specific U.S. Officials. The propose increase procurement foreign good government probably include purchase super computer LDP official said. According plan Japan strive solve specific trade problem nation encourage flow fund develop country official said. The LDP expect measure prop economy lessen trade problem U.S. They added. The basic idea LDP's plan present welcome monetary authority major industrial nation Washington week said. The LDP plan form basis package stimulate Japanese domestic demand unveiled government late May. REUTER 

U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige leaf Saturday 10-day trip Far East spur U.S. Trade improve relation China South Korea Philippines U.S. Officials say. Baldrige stop Hong Kong meet British official local U.S. And Hong Kong businessmen. The U.S. Last major deficit Asian trading partner -- South Korea 7.1 billion dlrs Hong Kong 6.4 billion China 2.1 billion. The deficit Philippines 800 mln dlrs. Baldrige meet South Korean President Chun Doo-hwan Trade Minister Rha Woong Bae Monday discus opening South Korean market U.S. Goods. Baldrige Peking April 21 24. He meet Zheng Tuobin minister foreign economic relation trade attend meeting U.S.-China Joint Commission Commerce Trade address management training organisation. However U.S. Officials chief purpose Baldrige's visit discus relaxed U.S. Rules transfer modern technology Chinese industries. In Hong Kong Baldrige hold meeting April 27 Governor David Wilson Trade Industry Secretary Eric Ho address American Chamber Commerce. U.S. Officials Baldrige meet Philippines President Corazon Aquino April 28 show continued U.S. Support government discus step improve atmosphere American investment. He meet Finance Secretary Jaime Ongpin Trade Industry Secretary Jose Concepcion. REUTER 

Soldiers kill seriously wound bar landless peasant 120 acre land seize Canadian missionary northern Haiti source Cap Haitien church radio said. The soldier act yesterday order Haitian attorney tear gas fire warn shot air prior shooting source said. There official confirmation report. Seven refuse leave land arrest shooting try said. The source peasant illiterate heard Article 36 Haiti's constitution ratify popular referendum March 29 allows land seizures. In constitution forbids land seizure except court-sanctioned agrarian reform process. The Canadian missionary Sacred Heart Brothers bought land government dictator Jean Claude Duvalier plant sugar cane source said. "...the peasant starve death" source told Reuters "and Canadians work fertile property." Reuter 

U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng Japan farm market far Washington cut trade deficit ease protectionist pressure Agriculture Ministry official told reporters. Hideo Maki Director General ministry's Economic Affairs Bureau quote Lyng tell Agriculture Minister Mutsuki Kato removal import restriction Japan United States. The meeting Kato open 12-day visit Japan Lyng dicuss farm trade. However Maki quote Kato reply Japan already world's large grain importer. Kato add Japan large customer U.S. Grain depend domestic output 53 pct food requirement 1985. Lyng U.S. Put priority talk 12 farm product name U.S. Complaints Japan General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) beef citrus product rice. Kato Japan maintain current level self-sufficiency try produce surplus rice potential production high domestic demand. The farm market suffers surplus rise production export country added. Lyng U.S. Has try reduce farm product output expensive program Maki said. Maki U.S. And Japan hold detailed discussion trade item round GATT trade talk meeting April 20 U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter join. REUTER 

Dollar General Corp sale March fell 4.6 pct 43.4 mln dlrs 45.5 mln dlrs earlier same-store sale 6.9 pct. The company March 1986 sale help Easter shopping heavier schedule promotions. Easter fall April 19 company unseasonably cold snowy weather hamper March result year. It quarter sale seven pct 114.4 mln dlrs 107.0 mln dlrs earlier. Reuter 

Federated Guaranty corp board declare two-for-one stock split raise quarterly dividend 6-1/2 ct share post-split six ct payable June One record May 15. The company shareholder annual meeting approve increase authorize common share 19 mln 10 mln name change Alfa Corp. It name change effect week NASDAQ ticker symbol change ALFA.O>. Reuter 

Littlefield Adams Co attempt financing arrangement lender Congress Financial unless receives extension loan year-end expect qualify audit opinion 1986 financial statements. The company revolve loan fell due February Congress grant one-month extensions. It Securities Exchange Commission American Stock Exchange extension filing 1986 annual report try funding. The company Collegiate Pacific subsidiary close Gardena Calif. plant lease facility equipment non-competing seller print wearables. It license newly-formed Collegiate Pacific West distribute Collegiate Pacific brand merchandise 14 western western Canada Japan. It lease licensing agreement provide 200000 dlrs revenue year. Reuter 

President Reagan announce decision tough tariff Japanese export retaliate call Japan's failure unfair practice semiconductor trade. The 100 pct tariff impose 300 mln dlrs Japanese good recommend curb special panel expert head U.S. Trade Representative's Office. Reagan announce March 27 impose tariff good take list range computors television set tool photographic film. The panel week winnowed list 20 product sent recommendation yesterday Santa Barbara Reagan vacationing. In March annoucement Reagan "I be commit full enforcement trade agreement design provide American industry free fair trade opportunities." He add tariff lift Japan honor pact sign dump semiconductor market open market U.S. products. U.S. official Japan March announcement alter Reagan's plan invoke sanctions. White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater yesterday: "we trade feel action require meaningful action." Reagan's move follow steadily rise U.S. trade deicits year's hit record $169.8 billion. About one-third deficit trade Japan. Congress weigh trade bill force president retaliate case unfair trade practices. He oppose legislation say prevent negotiate solution trade dispute exist law adqeuate unfair trade practices. Trade expert tough action Japanese penalize Japanese show Congress trade legislation. The Japanese complain honor semiconductor pact result show up. U.S. official monitoring Japanese semiconductor shipment East Asian country Western Europe show letup dump Japanese market remain shut American exports. Japan Reagan impose tariff file complaint General Agreement Tariff Trade (GATT). It hop GATT U.S. retaliation violate regulation global trading approve compensation Japanese retaliation. U.S. official Japan retaliate lose trade United States. Reuter 

Shr 92 ct v 1.16 dlrs Qtly div 10 ct v 10 ct prior Net 5700000 v 5400000 Avg shrs 6100000 v 3700000 NOTE: Dividend pay May 15 record May One. Reuter 

Union Planters Corp receive regulatory approval previously-announced acquisition Borc Financial Corp First Citizens Bank Hohenwald approval acquisition Merchants State Holding Co expect 10 days. All complete quarter 1987 said. Reuter 

March 31 Shr 65 ct v 51 ct Net 1016738 v 526057 Avg shrs 1561774 v 1035162 1st half Shr 1.31 dlrs v 1.09 dlrs Net 2050911 v 1130462 Avg shrs 1561643 v 1035162 Reuter 

Shr loss 29 ct v loss ct Net loss 5168000 v loss 410000 Revs 46.5 mln v 29.4 mln Avg shrs 17.6 mln v 17.1 mln NOTE: Net include tax credit 3938000 dlrs v 394000 dlrs. Reuter 

Shr ct v ct Net 42000 v 26000 Sales 15.6 mln v 15.2 mln NOTE: 1987 net include gain 63000 dlrs change pension accounting. Reuter 

Shr 53 ct v 48 ct Net 873000 v 773000 Sales 19.5 mln v 20.0 mln Reuter 

Shr 18 ct v 15 ct Net 387000 v 240000 Sales 9346000 v 8579000 Avg shrs 2200000 v 1600000 1st half Shr 36 ct v 26 ct Net 734000 v 410000 Sales 18.4 mln v 17.2 mln Avg shrs 2051648 v 1600000 Reuter 

1st qtr Shr 16 ct v 10 ct Net 808850 v 297266 Revs 13.9 mln v 7588280 Avg shrs 4926566 v 3123411 Reuter 

Shr 84 ct v 75 ct Net 475000 v 425000 Total income 7248000 v 7286000 1st half Shr 1.61 dlrs v 1.50 dlrs Net 911000 v 847000 Total income 14.6 mln v 14.2 mln Reuter 

Oper shr loss five ct v loss nil Ope net loss 1211000 v loss 2000 Revs 6626000 v 11.0 mln Avg shrs 23.2 mln v 23.5 mln Year Oper shr profit 12 ct v loss ct Oper net profit 2632000 v loss 240000 Revs 34.8 mln v 52.0 mln Avg shrs 22.9 mln v 23.4 mln NOTE: Net excludes extraordinary tax charge 1919000 dlrs v 49000 dlrs quarter credit 1431000 dlrs v 2335000 dlrs year. Reuter 

ChemLAwn Corp due tender offer Ecolab Inc ECL> ChemLawn share 36.50 dlrs postpone annual meeting schedule April 23. No date set. The tender offer schedule expire April 20 unless extended. Reuter 

Shr profit ct v loss ct Net profit 251000 v loss 222000 NOTE: Pretax net profit 295000 dlrs v loss 256000 dlrs. Charge earnings loan loss 1743000 dlrs v 2743000 dlrs net chargeoffs 1636000 dlrs v 3865000 dlrs. Reuter 

2nd qtr Feb 28 Shr loss ct v loss eight ct Net loss 33482 v loss 163130 Revs 143961 v 287131 1st half Shr loss 14 ct v loss eight ct Net loss 276238 v loss 149407 Revs 273737 v 679860 Reuter 

Shr loss ct v profit 10 ct Net loss 76000 v profit 357000 Sales 8987000 v 15.3 mln 1st half Shr loss 12 ct v loss seven ct Net loss 440000 v loss 246000 Sales 13.2 mln v 20.6 mln Reuter 

Shr 20 ct v 16 ct Net 1507000 v 1147000 Sales 13.8 mln v 9608000 Backlog 52.1 mln v 37.8 mln Reuter 

Shr 95 ct v 83 ct Shr dilute 89 ct v 80 ct Net 2297842 v 1782764 Avg shrs 2408332 v 2160000 Avg shrs dilute 2573908 v 2326667 Reuter 

Residence Inn Corp agree buy Holiday Corp equaly-owned joint venture 51.4 mln dlrs closing expect weeks. The all-suite Residence Inn geated extend stay currently 93 franchise company-owned hotel nationwide 55 construction development. Reuter 

Oper shr 12 ct v five ct Oper net 1715000 v 730000 Sales 12.1 mln v 7719000 Avg shrs 13.9 mln v 13.7 mln Nine mths Oper shr 32 ct v 18 ct Oper net 4379000 v 2266000 Sales 32.8 mln v 23.3 mln Avg shrs 13.8 mln v 12.4 mln NOTE: prior net excludes extraordinary credit 340000 dlrs quarter 1190000 dlrs nine mths. Reuter 

Shr 44 ct v 11 ct Net 1328000 v 344000 Sales 23.0 mln v 12.3 mln NOTE: Share adjust three-for-two stock split February 1987. Reuter 

Shr 16 ct v 16 ct Net 566000 v 563000 Sales 14.2 mln v 9831000 Reuter 

Oper shr 16 ct v 11 ct Oper net 660000 v 447000 Revs 9936000 v 9005000 NOTE: 1986 net excludes 381000 dlr tax credit. Reuter 

Shr 20 ct v 16 ct Net 973000 v 775000 Revs 12.8 mln v 9678000 Reuter 

Shr loss 24 ct v loss 20 ct Net loss 1718000 v loss 1483000 Sales 7266000 v 6490000 Year Shr loss 1.83 dlrs v loss 53 ct Net loss 13.2 mln v loss 3833000 Sales 19.1 mln v 29.5 mln NOTE: 1986 net include pretax realize loss secureity transaction 4124000 dlrs. Net include tax credit 751000 dlrs v 606000 dlrs quarter 1163000 dlrs v 2289000 dlrs year. 1986 net period include gain 1887000 dlrs pension plan termination. Reuter 

Shr 17 ct v 13 ct Net 673000 v 514000 Revs 18.4 mln v 17.2 mln NOTE: Share adjust five-for-four stock split January 1987. Reuter 

Oper shr 14 ct v 10 ct Oper net 711000 v 517000 Sales 11.2 mln v 11.1 mln NOTE: 1986 net excludes 84000 dlr gain discontinue machinery division. Reuter 

Martin PRocessing Inc expect significant sale growth rest particularly peak period third quarters. The company report quarter sale 11.2 mln dlrs 11.1 mln dlrs before. For 1986 sale 46.6 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Growth Stock Outlook Trust Inc asset value March 31 141.4 mln dlrs 9.83 dlrs share 117.3 mln dlrs 9.38 dlrs share earlier. Reuter 

Bush Industries Inc expect high earnings sale 1987 partly due efficiency manufacturing improve margins. The company report quarter earnings 1328000 dlrs 344000 dlrs sale 23.0 mln dlrs 12.3 mln dlrs. For earn 2506000 dlrs sale 65.4 mln dlrs. Reuter 

Shr 13 ct v ct Net 617000 v 112000 Sales 31.3 mln v 11.4 mln Avg shrs 4877057 v 3310585 NOTE: 1987 net include 87000 dlr tax credit. Reuter 

J. Bildner Sons Inc expect improve earnings sale current fiscal year. The company report earnings end January 25 617000 dlrsl 112000 dlrs sale 31.3 mln dlrs 11.4 mln dlrs. Bildner plan offer 25 mln dlrs Eurodollar convertible subordinate debenture due 2002 underwriter lead PaineWebber Group Inc PWJ> Kidder Peabody Co Inc proceeds finance expansion reduce debt. Reuter 

A strike machinist Eastern Airlines likely Eastern pilot probably honor picket line president airline pilots' union said. Capt. Henry A. Duffy president Air Line Pilots Association told aviation executive meeting Atlanta Duffy pilots' union contract 1988 Eastern Airlines. However contract Eastern International Association Machinists Aerospace Workers due expire Duffy said. If machinist strike seem likely Eastern pilot probably refuse cross picket line added. Noting pilots' union clashed time Eastern's parent Texas Air Corp TEX.A> Duffy "We difficult relationship Texas Air wherever exist industry." Eastern's pilot picket airline recently sick leave policy Duffy repeat criticism policy speech today. "The policy pressure try fly we're sick federal air regulation pressure fly beyond federal air limits" Duffy said. "For reason don't happy future there." Reuter 

Employees Morton Thiokol Inc MTI.N> go FBI allegation fraud firm manufacture booster rocket blame 1986 Challenger explosion ABC News reported. According report Morton Thiokol employee FBI Salt Lake City Utah allegation January 15. An FBI criminal investigation Morton Thiokol late January FBI official refuse confirm whether probe related Challenger disaster. FBI spokesman Ray McElhaney refuse discus report say FBI official comment current investigations. The space shuttle Challenger explode takeoff Jan 28 1986 temperature Florida launch site 20 degree below specify O-rings hold solid-rocket booster together. The ring fail seven shuttle astronaut die explosion. Morton Thiokol base Chicago built Challenger's booster Utah facility. The allegation employee follow similar charge former Morton-Thiokol engineer Roger Boisjoly file lawsuit allege criminal fraud former employer. Reuter 

Sixteen Wall Street stockbroker charge deal cocaine brokerage federal official deeply involve drug traffic trading violations. A total 19 arrest federal investigation eight affiliate Brooks Weinger Robbins Leeds Inc. Manhattan U.S. Attorney Rudolph Giuliani investigation marked start wider probe widespread drug abuse New York financial district. "This implication quite serious. This begin investigation" news conference announce indictments. The arrest marked late phase series scandal rock Wall Street involve illegal insider trading. The federal probe coincides police investigation 114 include messenger security guard New York Telephone company executive arrest allege drug deal drug abuse police today. A request Giuliani's office warrant search Brooks Weinger office alleges numerous instance stock manipulation security law violations. Reuter 

Wainoco Oil Corp board vote redeem shareholder value rioghts 10 ct payable June One holder record April 27. The right attach one-for-one basis Wainoco common shares. As previously announce company redeem right sufficient authorize unreserved common share proceed plan unit offering common stock warrants. It shareholder purchase right distribute June 1986 unaffected. Reuter 

Jefferson Bank plan offer shareholder purchase additional common share 80 pct closing bid price share date offering start subject minimum 9.25 dlrs share. The company offering connection plan investment Jefferson 4500000 dlrs principal shareholder State Bancshares Inc. Both investment right offering subject State's arrangement financing participation right offering. Reuter 

Genex Corp file propose 8500000 dlr right offering plan summer. It shareholder buy 1.1 convertible prefer share 60 ct share common share held May Eight. It lender extend mln dlr secure credit line Genex March buy unsubscribed share base agreement Genex's large shareholder lender able buy 34 pct offering. The company offering ask shareholder approval increase authorize common share 50 mln 21 mln authorization class 20 mln prefer shares. It ask approval change incorporation Delaware advantage flexible corporation law provision regard director liability. Genex prefer elect majority board convertible common stock. If right offer sell share convert common share outstanding double. The company incorporate Maryland. Genex proceeds right offering repay credit line work capital. Reuter 

Amoco Corp apparently successful bidder debt-laden Dome Petroleum Ltd accord publish report. The Toronto Globe Mail quote source close negotiation Dome broke talk TransCanada PipeLines Ltd week announce 4.3 billion Canadian dlr offer Dome's assets. No financial detail Amoco offer available Dome spokesman neither confirm nor deny Amoco emerge winner newspaper said. However Dome spokesman indicate sale Dome finalize announce weekend Globe Mail said. Representatives Amoco immediately available comment. Last Sunday TransCanada announce offer Dome talk company refuse identify them. Since market speculation center Amoco Exxon Corp's XON> 70 pct-owned Imperial Oil Ltd subsidiary Canada. British Petroleum PLC BP> Royal Dutch/Shell Group RD> mention suitor Dome. In past day Dome management pressure federal government select offer TransCanada Canadian company bidding. Prime Minister Brian Mulroney's government appear avoid Dome sale foreign company government give Dome hundred million dollar tax break encourage oil gas exploration Arctic analyst official said. A purchase TransCanada likely run afoul Canadian antitrust law TransCanada ask tax concession federal government try hold deficit below 30 billion Canadian dlrs analyst said. A takeover Amoco Imperial foreign oil company dominant position Canada's oil industry. Imperial Oil already Canada's large energy company 1986 revenue 7.1 billion Canadian dlrs. Chicago-based Amoco 1986 revenue 20.23 billion U.S. dlrs. Its Amoco Canada Petroleum subsidiary 100 pct own Amoco Corp. Reuter 

Qtly div 21 ct v 21 ct prior Pay June 10 Record May Eight Reuter 

Qtly div 10-1/2 ct v 10-1/2 ct prior Pay July One Record June 10 Reuter 

Qtly div 25 ct v 25 ct prior Pay May 20 Record May Eight Reuter 

Qtly div ct v ct prior Pay May 22 Record May Eight Reuter 

Qtly div 64 ct v 64 ct prior Pay May 15 Record April 30 Reuter 

Qtly div 70 ct v 70 ct prior Pay June Eight Record May Eight Reuter 

Chrysler Corp ask shareholder increase share authorize common stock 500 mln current 300 mln. The company proxy statement mail 135000 stockholder May 21 annual meeting Savannah Ga. add share need complete propose buyout American Motors Corp AMO>. Chrysler additional share future acquisition financing transaction stock dividend split employee benefit plans. The company proxy statement annual meeting 1986 board approve grant 77.0 mln dlrs cash award 1914 executive 16.2 mln dlrs supplemental executive retirement plan incentive compensation program. It paid 66.9 mlndlrs bonus 93000 hourly salaried employee recently paid 46.7 mln dlrs profit-sharing payment full-time employee base 1986 performance. Chrysler far offering special 500 dlr check patron 1987 New York Auto Show purchase Chrysler LeBaron Coupes Plymouth Sundances Dodge Shadows Dodge Daytonas. The check redeemable participate dealer New York metropoliutan area May Two addition low percentage rate financing cash incentive company offering. Reuter 

Texas Air Corp's Eastern Airlines subsidiary cut 259 job mechanic related employee Miami Boston effective May One. The company staff cut result propose sale five Boeing Co BA> 727-100's Lockheed Corp LK> L-1011's previously announce transfer six Airbus Industrie> A300's Continental Airlines Texas Air subsidiary. Reuter 

Chrysler Corp board cash bonus award 77 mln dlrs 1914 executive 1986 base 1985 earnings include 975000 dlr bonus brought chairman Lee Iacocca's cash compensation 1.7 mln dlrs. The U.S. automaker disclose shareholder proxy statement Iacocca exercise stock option net nearly 9.6 mln dlrs receive 337500 share Chrysler stock November current market price worth 18 mln dlrs. Reuter 

French industrial production rise seasonally adjust pct February unrevised 1.98 pct fall January National Statistics Institute (INSEE) said. The figure excludes construction work February index base 1980 102 99 January. INSEE change base 1980 1970 month. Reuter 

Danners Inc agree principle Indian LP partnership associate Sherman Clay Group purchase 100000 share redeemable voting junior prefer stock liquidation preference 20 dlrs share cumulative dividend 1.60 dlrs share annually mln dlrs. It partnership receive detachable warrant buy 1600000 common share 1.25 dlrs payable cash junior prefer stock liquidation preference value. Danners completion infusion allow partnership name majority board. In addition Danners grant partnership option buy 200000 common share 1.25 dlrs exercisable fail meet condition connect transaction principal shareholder accept merger offer party. It Danners own 171538 share grant option Indian buy share similar term conditions. The company Danner option provide infusion complete partnership option start six month end April 1992 buy share bid sale price whichever lower. Danners agreement subject recapitalization bank outstanding loan satisfactory company prospect favorable opinon investment banker closing April 30 extension May 11. The company lose 529000 dlrs prior year. Danners terminate LIFO inventory accounting result restatement net worth February 1 1986 prior fiscal 15.5 mln dlrs 9901000 dlrs. But loss end result net worth deficiency 4400000 dlrs eight dlrs share. The company incur unusual fourth quarter loss due previously-announced closing disposition 17 35 3D discount department store inventory clearance conversion pricing promotion system. The company fail perform deal liable expense incur partnership. If perform infusion transaction collapse reason liable 50000 dlrs expenses. It Danner agree option ability sell share partnership closing date dlrs each. Danners far expect report loss end January 31 19 mln dlrs substantially bad expected. The company incur loss fourth quarter disposition nonoperating assets. It expect report result soon. Danners problem credit relationship together loss result transaction Indian intend alleviate problems. Reuter 

Grumman Corp shareholder annual meeting approve amendment indemnification direcors officer employee liability. Reuter 

First Federal Savings Loan Association Brooksville adjourn annual meeting May 11 due unexpected death director J.R. Underwood create substitute nominee board. Reuter 

Profitt's Inc file initial offering mln common share expect price eight 10 dlrs underwriter lead Morgan Keegan Inc MOR>. It proceeds retire debt. Profitts Operates five specialty department store Tennessee. Reuter 

Shr loss nil v profit six ct Net loss 89000 v profit 1136000 Revs 105.0 mln v 97.3 mln 1st half Shr loss ct v profit 21 ct Net loss 396000 v profit 3790000 Revs 212.1 mln v 194.8 mln Avg shrs 18.1 mln v 18.3 mln NOTE: Current quarter net include 77000 dlr tax credit. Current half net include reversal 2622000 dlrs investment tax credits. Reuter 

MiniScribe Corp file Securities Exchange Commission registration statement cover 65 mln dlr issue convertible subordinate debenture due 2012. Initially portion proceeds reduce fund drawn MiniScribe's revolve bank credit facility. Proceeds work capital purpose primarily finance inventory account receivable acquire capital equipment expand manufacturing capacity MiniScribe said. It name Morgan Stanley Hambrechit Quist manage underwriters. Reuter 

Shr loss five ct NEt loss 90066 Sales 328127 NOTE: Company opeations April 1986. Reuter 

The French Finance ministry flotation offer opening come Tuesday 39 pct capital Banque Industrielle et Mobiliere Privee> (BIMP) 140 franc share. The offer close Friday. The ministry statement 51 pct bank's capital sell solid core investor include insurance company Michelin subsidiary SPIKA 145 pct offer price. Ten pct share reserve employee five pct discount increase 20 pct keep share years. Employees free share bought share held year. Small investor receive free share 10 bought upper limit five free share investor condition share held 18 months. The state-owned capital BIMP comprises 2.51 mln shares. The bank sell sweep programme privatise 65 state-owned group five years. In separate statement ministry week's privatisation offer 1.07 mln share Banque du Batiment et de Travaux Publics> (BTP) 65 time oversubscribed. REUTER 

White House Budget chief James Miller concerned Federal Reserve "overreact" decline value U.S. dollar raise rate move cause recession year. "Our great danger overreaction" Miller told newspaper reporter yesterday. "I'm concerned Fed's overreaction. I'm concerned I recent data show substantial fall money supply." Edwin Dale Miller's spokesman remark publish New York Times accurate. Miller concerned Fed overreact signal rise inflation tighten credit -- move "political consequences." The White House budget chief appear refer effect economic slowdown presidential congressional election year. "My fear recession deep soup question it" said. Miller economic slowdown lead low tax revenue widen budget deficit. Miller's remark reflect concern U.S. central bank feel compel tighten credit mean bolster dollar. Both Treasury Secretary James Baker Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul Volcker recently warn far decline value U.S. dollar jeopardize global growth prospects. U.S. official urge Japan West Germany stimulate economic growth country -- move boost U.S. export relieve trade protectionist pressure United States. Reuter 

The Bank France late monthly report French economy expect pickup industrial production register March gather steam months. Without give figure report month's rise partly link effort catch production lose earlier industrial action due mainly firm domestic demand. "New progress expect main sector except capital good production remain level" report added. The upbeat report come wake grim March trade balance figure show deficit industrial trade June 1982. While automobile industry remain unchanged previously boost level consumer good production grow expect accelerate except domestic appliances. Semi-finished good show clear increase sectors. Construction civil engineering boost rise work improve retail trade sale sector continued slow. REUTER 

Italy's wholesale price index rise 0.2 pct month-on-month February 1987 increase 1.1 pct January statistic institute ISTAT said. The index base 1980 equal 100 register 173.1 February compare 172.8 January. The February figure represent decline 0.2 pct compare February 1986 year-on-year decline January 1987 1.7 pct. Reuter 

Sharon Steel Corp file voluntary petition relief Chapter 11 federal bankruptcy laws. The company lose money experience financial difficulty action response Quantum Fund's notice intend accelerate maturity Sharon's 13-1/2 pct subordinate debenture due 2000 1200 EDT today. Sharon Quantum request trustee debenture file involuntary petition Chapter 7 bankruptcy code it. Sharon Steel result bankruptcy filing exchange offer terminated. Sharon make exchange offer 13.5 pct debenture due 2000 14.25 pct debenture due 1999 subject condition met. Acceptance offer extend time below require level completion. Reuter 

U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter President Reagan ahead impose curb Japanese export planned. Asked television interview chance Reagan cancel schedule 100 pct tariff Japanese electronic export "slim none." Reagan announce March 27 impose tariff retaliate Japan's failure honor 1986 agreement dump computer semiconductor market cost market U.S. products. Yeutter NBC "Today" United States terminate agreement drop tariff Japan fulfil agreement. He Japanese negotiator week told U.S. official honor pact Yeutter monitor compliance. Asked "We pattern compliance minimum I weeks." Yeutter consumer impact tariff 300 mln dlrs worth Japanese good item select readily available country manufacturers. He Japan retaliate. "It seem interest either country escalate conflict. The Japanese understand full well" Yeutter said. He add Japan challenge tariff General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) "that's paper exercise I don't really expect adverse impact U.S. trade." Yeutter semiconductor issue resolve Washington visit month Japanese Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone. He hop visit trade major issue productive "I don't practical resolve particular dispute visit." reuter 

TCF Banking Savings F.A. file Federal Savings Loan Association issue 100 mln dlrs subordinate capital notes. Proceeds increase bank's regulatory capital corporate purpose TCF said. Reuter 

Shr ct v 14 ct Qtly div 11-1/2 ct v 11-1/2 ct prior Net 411000 v 5299000 Revs 88.5 mln v 108.4 mln NOTE: Dividend pay May 18 record May One. Reuter 

Sony Corp> Japan plan launch 15-mln-dlr project soon produce video music cassette tape mainly export Chira Phanupong Thailand's Board Investment said. Chira told reporter Sony likely receive investment tax incentive agency charge promote foreign investment. The BoI chief medium Japanese firm view Thailand country South East Asia shift high-cost production facility wake strong yen. BoI official Japanese investment project seek promotional privilege Thai government increase substantially past stronge yen force Japanese company look cheaper production base abroad. Sharp Corp> recently obtain BoI tax incentive invest project produce microwave oven refrigerator Thai market export. Chira Japanese electronic firm negotiate agency Thai tax incentive project manufacture audio equipment electrical appliance here. He decline name Japanese company propose project provide employment 50000 Thais five years. REUTER 

General Motors Corp believe competitive auto manufacturer five cease building car U.S. publish report said. The Detroit Free Press quote GM industrial relation vice-president Alfred Warren say "we've five either act together business." "People cannot believe stop building automobile United States" add "I'm sure electronics way." Warren GM's chief negotiator summer labor bargaining contract cover 380000 U.S. hourly worker great loss job GM's share U.S. car market continue decline. And add United Automobile Workers union resolve concern job security GM "jobs General Motors...not somewhere else." Warren GM "foolish" recession agree bring laid-off UAW parts-making operation "today brought worker back." Reuter 

Alliance Well Service Inc five principal lending bank agree yet propose settlement Alliance debt company announce April 15. The company point negotiate agreement well. Under agreement 29.3 mln dlrs bank debt plus related eliminate bank recieve common stock company challenge banks' foreclosure 119 drilling rigs. Reuter 

Southwest Bancorp yesterday receioved 53571 share 2.50 dlr cumulative convertible prefer stock response offer exchange 11 common share 108710 share preferred. The company offer expire extend May One. Reuter 

Goldome FSB file New York Superintendent Banks convert stock saving bank federal mutual saving bank plan public. The company plan subscription offiering depositor direct community offering major New York Florida market elsewhere significant subsidiary operations. Any share remain sell offering underwriter lead Merrill Lynch Co Inc MER>. Goldome 14.6 billion dlrs assets. Reuter 

Argentina's controversial financing package complete quickly thanks wide range innovative option deal Jorge Gonzalez undersecretary external debt economics ministry. The deal offer bank lucrative fee sign "exit bond" provision allow bank sell five mln dlrs exist loans. Gonzalez disclose bank choice lending mln dlrs form bearer bond. "We expect complete package quickly" telephone interview. By provide share 1.55 billion dlrs money raise Argentina via easily tradable bearer bond instead participation syndicate loan small bank avoid time-consuming legal paperwork. The bond currently dubbed "alternative participation instruments" carry term syndicate loan - 12-year term five years' grace rate margin 7/8 pct Eurodollar rate Gonzalez said. The idea "exit bond" creditor bank exchange five mln dlrs exist debt tradeable bond bear below-market rates. In return accept low yield amount debt convert subtract bank's exposure purpose calculate contribution future loans. Gonzalez difficult bank "exit bonds" instrument offer before. On paper Argentina's lending syndicate shrink dramatically 100 country's 350 creditor exposure five mln dlrs. Details "exit bonds" finalize Gonzalez added. Argentina press hard streamline lending process bitter memory package agree Citibank-led steer committee December 1984 sign August 1985. Gonzalez praise committee cooperation late negotiation result deal announce bank Wednesday Argentina road meeting economic goals. "We believe package Argentine continue track elect follow - stable growth equilibrium external accounts" said. Asked role Reagan Administration played final stage talk Gonzalez lent "practical support." He elaborate banker U.S. press agreement Economics Minister Juan Sourrouille threaten week's spring meeting Washington International Monetary Fund break talk unless bank stop block deal. The specter Argentina emulate Brazil suspend payment haunt policymakers banker alike fear emergence debtors' cartel. "That feel committee" banker said. As result banker agree Argentina rate margin Mexico 13/16 pct reschedule 30 billion dlrs debt raise ire Philippines Venezuela paid 7/8 pct recent reschedule packages. Asked angry reaction Manila government promptly Wednesday demand spread 13/16 pct Gonzalez matter Philippines banks. Reuter 

Shr 1.31 dlrs v 1.03 dlrs Net 123 mln v 95 mln Revs 831 mln v 764 mln Avg shrs 94 mln v 91 mln 12 mths Shr 4.38 dlrs v 3.68 dlrs Net 409 mln v 331 mln Revs 3.14 billion v 2.77 billion Avg shrs 93 mln v 90 mln Reuter 

H.B. Fuller Co shareholder annual meeting approve increase authorize common share 40 mln 15 mln requirement accumulation voting security subject prior shareholder approval. In addition shareholder approve elimination personal liability director legal proceeding allege breach fiduciary duty. Reuter 

Diamond Shamrock Corp April 30 record date spinoff refining marketing operation Diamond R M Inc share mail May 10. Shareholders receive Diamond R M share Diamond Shamrock share held. Reuter 

Ford Motor Co develop aluminum space frame Probe V concept car use extrude stretch-formed aluminum lead technique building production car future. It frame reduce vehicle weight cost maintain structural integrity crashworthiness. The frame few part conventional steel frame Ford said. The company lighter weight allow small powertrains suspension far reduce weight improve fuel economy. Ford addition extrusion dy cost 1000 12000 dlrs compare hundred thousand dollar steel stamp dy use extrude aluminum weld car reduce 40 2000. Reuter 

James River Corp rebuild Number Three paper machine Wauna pulp paper mill near Clatskanie Ore. cost 31.8 mln dlrs significantly improve newsprint quality expand uncoated groundwood specialty paper product line. It completion expect late 1988. Reuter 

The Bank Italy market operator take 1111 billion lira indexed government discount certificate (CTs) offer 2500 billion lire. The Bank 600 billion lira 789 billion unassigned. The seven-year certificate carry first-year coupon payable April 21 1988 4.86 pct identical preceeding issue CTs March. They offer base price 72 lira 74 previously effective annual yield coupon 10.15 pct 9.66 March. Yields link rate 12-month Treasury bills. 

The Commerce Department insurance freight cost import good 1.45 billion dlrs include February trade deficit 15.1 billion dlrs report Tuesday. The department require law wait 48 hour initial trade report issue report "customs value" basis eliminates freight insurance charge cost imports. Private-sector economist emphasize Commerce Department revise deficit 1.45 billion dlrs simply present figure basis. A report Washington Post cause stir foreign exchange give impression dealer underlie trade deficit February revise downward. The Commerce department law change permit report set figure simultaneously. "My feel report there's legislation require delay days" Robert Ortner Commerce undersecretary economic affairs. "But pay attention figure." The 15.1 billion dlr February trade deficit compare revise January deficit 12.3 billion dlrs. The law require 48-hour delay publishing monthly trade figure exclude freight insurance pass 1979. Reportedly feel figure include custom freight insurance allow comparison country report trade balance basis. The figure low deduct freight insurance present deficit favorable Reagan administration. Ortner law change eliminate 48-hour delay reporting figures. "We're consider it" "It's dinosaur law I it's come." The figure low deduct freight insurance present deficit favorable Reagan administration. Ortner law change eliminate 48-hour delay reporting figures. "We're consider it" "It's dinosaur law I come." Reuter 

Industrial Equity (Pacific) Ltd Hong Kong investment firm raise stake CalMat Co 3712860 share 12.2 pct total outstanding common stock 3312460 share 10.9 pct. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Industrial Equity principally own Brierley Investments Ltd publicly held New Zealand company bought 400400 Calmat common share April 9 13 total 10.5 mln dlrs. Reuter 

The Farny R. Wurlitzer Foundation told Securities Exchange Commission cut stake Wurlitzer Co 89000 share 4.98 pct total outstanding common stock 125000 share 7.0 pct. The foundation sell 36000 Wurlitzer common share March 13 30 price range 3.25 2.375 dlrs share. As foundation's stake Wurlitzer below five pct require report far dealing company's common stock. Reuter 

Two affiliate investment firm fund control told Securities Exchange Commission raise Orient Express Hotels Inc stake 1663800 share 17.0 pct total 1560800 15.9 pct. The firm Boston-based FMR Corp Bermuda-based Fidelity International Ltd bought combine 103000 Orient Express common share March 12 April 8 price range 3.05 3.55 dlrs each. Reuter 

Hospital Corp America management believe 47 dlr share acquisition offer receive Charles R. Miller Richard E. Ragsdale Richard L. Scott shareholder plan meet individuals. The company board consider information bid "Given lack demonstrate ability individual consummate acquisition magnitude board decide necessary action proposal time." Hospital Corp "The benefit company's ongoing reposition already realize continue explore appropriate alternative enhance shareholder value." Reuter 

Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's unpopular sale tax plan suffer dent ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) call take deal propose sale tax party official said. The call resolution adopt 150 LDP parliamentarian secretary act behalf parliamentarian meeting LDP headquarters said. The MPs represent Account one-third LDP MPs. The LDP voluntary organisation call Parliamentarians' Research Society Reestablishment Finances claim membership 300 MPs said. Meanwhle Nakasone even hint party ready accept modification five-pct sale tax proposal fiscal 1987 budget plan pass parliament. The LDP suffer setback Sunday's local election controvertial tax plan. The result undermined Nakasone's prestige give rise possibility force office October 30 suppose step down. REUTER 

Kaydon Corp president Richard A. Shantz name chairman succeed Glenn W. Bailey remains board. The company Lawrence J. Cawley president Bearing Division ben name succeed Shantz Kaydon president. Reuter 

Affiliated Bankshares Colorado Inc president chief operating officer Kent O. Olin name add post chief executive succeed Leo Hill plan retire year. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade Todd Shipyards Corp's 110 mln dlrs debt. It cite Tood's report significant unanticipated loss commercial contract continue uncertainty U.S. Navy's DDG-51 Destroyer Moody's term Todd's viability. Moody's ass company's future financing flexibility current negotiation exist credit loan agreements. Todd carry B-2 senior subordinate note due 1996 B-3 3.08 dlr convertible exchangeable prefer stock. Reuter 

Calny Inc M. Hal Taylor name poresident chief operating officer succeed Marvin Hart serve president interim basis remains chairman chief executive. The company Taylor join company January name board. Reuter 

GoodMark Foods Inc president chief executive officer Ron E. Doggett assume add post chairman effective June One H. Hawkins Bradley retires. It Bradley remain board company consultant. Reuter 

El Pollo Asado Inc executive vice president chief operating officer Richard J. Peterson name president succeed Richard B. Lipson remains chairman chief executive. The company chief financial officer Ronald A. Paradis name add post executive vice president director. On board replaces Maria A. Lipson. Reuter 

Citizens Savings Bank FSB chairman chief executive officer Frank L. Hewitt Jr. retire succeed vice chairman Clinton C. Sisson. The company Hewitt remain chairman president First Citizens Corp subsidiary. Reuter 

Qtly div ct v ct prior Pay May 13 Record April 29 Reuter 

Rowan Cos Inc expect incur substantial loss 1987 despite expect improvement drilling level Gulf Mexico North Sea. The offshore onshore drilling company report quarter loss 18.6 mln dlrs 12.2 mln dlr tax credit compare year-earlier loss 5855000 dlrs tax credit 8510000 dlrs. For 1986 Rowan lose 42.1 mln dlrs 47.6 mln dlr tax credit. Reuter 

Shr loss 36 ct v loss 11 ct Net loss 18.6 mln v loss 5855000 Revs 23.9 mln v 53.9 mln NOTE: Net include tax credit 12.2 mln dlrs v 8510000 dlrs. Reuter 

Ford Motor Co award 164.3 mln dlrs bonus 5528 executive base company's record 3.3 billion dlrs 1986 profits. The U.S. automaker chairman Donald Petersen collect 4.3 mln dlrs inlcuing salary 660772 dlrs 1.3 mln dlr bonus nearly 2.4 mln dlrs exercise stock options. Ford five top executive receive bonus swell pay past mln dlr mark. Ford month paid 371 mln dlrs profit-sharing 160000 hourly salaried employee U.S. The company disclose proxy statement mail 262000 shareholder Ford's May 14 annual meeting Detroit director John Connally Carter Burgess retire board Irvine Hockaday Jr president Hallmark Cards Inc Kansas City Mo nominate board seat. Reuter 

Oper shr loss 64 ct v profit 11 ct Oper net loss 7229000 v profit 902000 Revs 67.6 mln v 66.7 mln Avg shrs 11.3 mln v 8507000 Year Oper shr loss 63 ct v profit 43 ct Oper net loss 6177000 v profit 3604000 Revs 264.8 mln v 238.5 mln Avg shrs 9827000 v 8403000 NOTE: 1986 quarter net include 731000 dlr tax credit. 1986 net excludes charge debt restructuring 1976000 dlrs quarter 3800000 dlrs year. Reuter 

NWA Inc Edward A. Neer Jr. name president chief executive officer Mainline Travel Inc subsidiary replace Warren D. Phillips chief executive Robert L. Daniels asd president. Neer western regional sale director NWA's Northwest Airlines unit. It Daniels name president Mainline's retail division. Reuter 

Shr 56 ct v 46 ct Qtly div 29 ct v 27 ct prior Net 9089000 v 7585000 Sales 86.8 mln v 83.0 mln NOTE: Pay May 15 record May One. Reuter 

Damon Corp's Damon Clinical Laboratories expect report "significantly better" profit 20 pct gain sale due increase test AIDS virus Damon president Joe Isola said. Last unit earn 8.6 mln dlrs sale 97.3 mln fiscal end August 31 1986. Overall Damon Corp report loss 2.5 mln dlrs sale 148 mln. Isola attribute loss company's biotechnology subsidiary. Damon Labs currently test 8000 sample AIDS virus Irving Texas facility. That's increase 100 percent 18 month ago U.S. Army chose company test Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome recruits. Now addition recruit company process regular Army soldier undergo annual physicals Army Reserves National Guard Coast Guard Naval Reserves. Despite have capacity processing 10000 sample Damon Labs recently decide move Irving facility large close April 25 able process 16000 day. He AIDS test expect contribute 18 mln dlrs sale add 80 pct AIDS test military-related. Despite enormous test process mistake. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 3.7 billion dlrs debt Security Pacific Corp lead bank Security Pacific National Bank units. Moody's concerned outlook improvement lead bank's earnings asset quality burden level nonperforming asset charge-offs. Cut parent's senior guaranteed debt Aa-3 Aa-2 subordinate debt A-1 Aa-3 lead bank's senior debt long-term deposit Aa-2 Aaa. Reuter 

The Federal Home Loan Bank Board insured saving loan association (thrifts) profit fourth quarter 1986 report moderate increase net earnings. It 74 pct thrift reporting profit net after-tax income 2.3 billion dlrs 2.0 billion dlrs earn 77 pct profitable industry third quarter. For 1986 profitable firm net income 9.2 billion dlrs 7.3 billion dlrs 1985. It 26 pct industry profit fourth quarter loss 3.2 billion dlrs. The figure unprofitable firm 2.1 billion dlrs third quarter 1986 said. Over firm total loss 8.3 billion dlrs 3.6 billion dlrs 1985. Reuter 

Niagara Mohawk Power Corp owner Nine Mile Point Two nuclear unit file suit seek 500 mln dlrs damage company involve design fabrication ball valve plant. The company suit file New York State Supreme Court name Gulf Western Industries Inc GW> Wickes Cos Inc WIX>'s Wickes Manufacturing Co Inc subsidiary Gearhart Industries Inc's GOI> Crosby Valve Gage Co affiliate. Gulf Western sell Fluid Systems Division Gulf Western Manufacturing unit make valve Crosby Valve 1983 remainder Gulf Western Manufacturing Wickes 1985. The company suit alleges breach contract warranty negligence engineering seek damage cost delay plant's commercial operation allege cause failure valve meet contract specification licensing requirements. The ball-type main steam isolation valve remove Nine Mile Two March follow test company valve fail meet specification agree defendants. The replace Y-pattern globe valve system. It 500 mln dlr figure preliminary estimate. Niagara Mohawk own 41 pct Nine Mile Two 1080 megatt boil reactor near Oswego N.Y. Long Island Lighting Co LIL> own 18 pct Rochester Gas Electric Corp RGS> 14 pct Central Hudson Gas Electric Corp CNH> nine pct. Reuter 

The White House announce 100 pct tariff 300 mln dlrs worth Japanese electronic good effective Friday. The tariff impose allege Japanese failure honor agreement stop below cost dump computer microchip market domestic market American goods. "I regret action necessary" President Reagan statement. Reagan tariff eliminate "as soon firm continue evidence dump third country market stop access Japanese market improved." He encourage recent action Tokyo improve compliance U.S.-Japanese semiconductor agreement look forward work effectively should. REUTER 

Soviet industrial output quarter grow 2.5 pct compare month 1986 Tass news agency reported. A regular meeting Politburo heard March industry achieve average daily rate need fulfil annual targets. Quarterly plan exceed fuel sector agriculture output grow 8.7 pct compare period said. Plans fulfil engineering building ministry chemical timber sector rail transport industry added. Reuter 

General Motors Corp's executive salary bonus plan effective 1918 date world's large automaker's change corporate strategy executive vice president Robert Stempel said. "The bonus plan plan really sync manufacturing organization sell builds" Stempel told reporter New York Auto Show's press opening. Commenting GM's previously announce move replace executive bonus-system stock option plan Stempel fit company's strategy term capital investment. "We sure pay line with...the term enhance value stock do us" GM's Stempel response reporter's question. Stempel voiced confidence GM shareholder approve plan outline shareholder proxy statement issue Thursday. Stempel General Motors reduce 10 pct component 1990 saving 500 mln dlrs. GM plan "eliminate unit clearly define non-competitive component business" said. Reuter 

British Automobile Manufacturers Association expect export United States double 1987 56595 unit 26200 1986 association president G.W. Whitehead told reporter New York Auto Show. "We feel appropriate occasion announce return British car force U.S. import car market" Whitehead president Jaguar Plc's U.S. unit. Whitehead increase sale result intensified North American marketing British automakers. Reuter 

Moody's Investors Service Inc downgrade 1.7 billion dlrs debt Bankers Trust New York Corp lead bank Bankers Trust Co subsidiaries. It slate key competitor Bankers Trust's principal market shift bank reposition global institutional markets. Moody's substantial capital commit market size direct competitor increase uncertainty future performance. Cut parent's senior guaranteed debt Aa-3 Aa-2 subordinate debt A-1 Aa-3 lead bank's long-term debt deposit Aa-1 Aaa. Reuter 

The Argentine government ask congress declare siege follow rebellion army officer object human right trial official source said. Earlier Army Chief Staff Hector Rios Erenu mean disposal rebellion. He relieve command colonel airborne infantry regiment Cordoba centre uprising. Argentine Army Chief Staff Hector Rios Erenu begin move troop military operation three-day rebellion. Interior Minister Antonio Troccoli government seek parliamentary approval siege "unless unexpected justifies urgent treatment." Reuter 

Prime Minister Robert Mugabe Zimbabwe suspend key talk unite ruling ZANU-PF party opposition PF-ZAPU party. "I be sorry deadlocked question unity central committee party recently decide talk discontinue serve purpose" nationwide radio-and-television address. The collapse unity talk widely expect herald creation socialist one-party major setback government diplomat said. Reuter 

The White House distance remark administration's budget chief Federal Reserve's current course monetary policy appropriate. "The administration feel current course monetary policy appropriate" White House spokesman Marlin Fitwater said. Fitzwater administration endorse remark White House budget chief James Miller concerned Federal Reserve overreact decline value U.S. dollar raise rates. More 

Senior U.S. banker seek calm furore Philippines cause term Argentina's financing package source New York close Manila government finance minister Jaime Ongpin mood compromise. Ongpin angry bank grant Argentina rate spread 13/16 pct Mexico won week tell Philippines accept 7/8 pct Mexican margin repeated. Bankers acknowledge political sensitivity spread urge Ongpin examine Argentine package entirety. Argentina instance offering bank 3/8 pct participation fee sign deal 30 day (declining 1/8 pct bank commit 60 days) boost all-in rate pay package. "You deal 13/16 pct" banker said. Another refer Philippine debt negotiator "The reason they'd New York political economic." Ongpin estimate extra 1/16 percentage cost 5.1 mln dlrs year. But source close Philippines Ongpin's anger go beyond dollars. He minister feel personally betrayed banker insist Mexico's 13/16 pct rock-bottom spread duplicated. Top U.S. Treasury Federal Reserve official same. The source Ongpin unlikely U.S. press expect Philippines' bank advisory committee head Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co negotiate spread reduction telex. Ongpin Philippines unilaterally start pay low rate clear committee telex prepared pay Mexico Argentina source said. "The Philippines really mean this. I don't there's compromise" said. Manufacturers Hanover decline comment issue. The Philippines month won agreement reschedule 10.3 billion dlrs debt 17 rate 7/8 pct whereas 30 billion dlrs Argentine debt stretch 19 spread 13/16 pct. Bankers force break word political circumstance change past weeks. In particular clear Argentina serious threat suspend payment unless deal. Fearing Argentine moratorium stiffen resolve neighbour Brazil already suspend payment bank urge Reagan Administration bow Argentina's demands. Some U.S. banker argue regardless politics rich menu option Argentine package make attractive justify 13/16 pct reschedule rate. "When (the Philippines) package realize Mexican deal" banker Argentine agreement. The Argentine pact contains feature Mexican accord "exit bonds" option provide money via bearer bond trade facility onlending provision debt-equity conversion scheme. Moreover Argentina request 1.95 billion dlrs loan compare Mexico's 7.7 billion pay 7/8 pct money instead 13/16 pct charge Mexico. This line argument cut ice Filipinos note drily money all. "The bank react level politics Argentina try justify term economics they're problem Philippines Venezuela" source close Manila government. Because Easter holiday banker yet official reaction Venezuela pay 7/8 pct 20.2 billion dlr rescheduling. But acknowledge Caracas told Mexico spread inviolate quite likely demand low spread. Bankers sanguine Chile. Because fire human-rights record government General Augusto Pinochet unlikely attract attention seek renegotiate recent debt package carry pct banker said. They hope temper cool Philippines accept reopen agreement 4-1/2 tough month negotiate trouble worth. Reuter 

Gulf Western Inc GW> believe liability earlier report lawsuit seek 500 mln dlrs damage companies. The suit file Niagara Mohawk Power Corp owner Nine Mile Point Two nuclear plant concern design fabrication ball valve facility. "Niagara Mohawk appear try shift responsibility connection construction Nine Mile Point Two plant others" Gulf Western said. Gulf Western yet see lawsuit. The company subsidiary longer own sell valve question 1977. Since valve subject substantial modification said. Reuter 

The former chief executive officer Baldwin-United Corp know PHLCorp PHX> agree settle charge stem mislead financial statement company accuse make collapse 1983. Under settlement Securities Exchange Commission former Baldwin-United President Morley Thompson agree issue U.S. District Court Cincinnati Ohio bar commit far security law violations. Thompson admit deny charges. Although Thompson defendant settle charge brought SEC September 26 1985 connection Baldwin-United agency continue investigate matter related company bring charge people. Baldwin-United Cincinnati-based diversified financial service hold company bankrupt September 1983. It change name November PHLCorp. The SEC Thompson violate reporting anti-fraud provision federal security law late 1982 issue mislead press releases. Baldwin-United already settle SEC charge brought "false statement concern financing corporate acquisitions" SEC said. The statement indicate company available cash takeover actually face "serious cash flow crisis" said. The company accuse filing false mislead financial statement SEC. Reuter 

The White House issue list Japanese export cover 100 pct tariff impose President Reagan. - Automatic data processing machine (1986 import worth 180 mln dlrs) include desk lap model microprocessor-based calculate mechanism capable handle word 16-bits microprocessor; - Complete color television set 18 19 20 inch screen (1986 import 90 mln dlrs); - Power tool include drill percussion hammer sander polisher grinders. Reuter 

Business loan book major U.S. bank exclude acceptance fell 1.08 billion dlrs 276.37 billion dlrs week end April 8 Federal Reserve Board said. The Fed loan include acceptance fell 1.1 billion dlrs 278.67 billion dlrs. Reuter 

shr 46 ct v 76 ct div 30 ct v 30 ct prior net 8.5 mln v 14.0 mln NOTE: 1987 qtr net 5.5 mln dlr reserve potential refund result Federal Communications Commission's continue rate investigation. company believe refund materially affect financial position. Reuter 

shr 21 ct v 18 ct net 1068000 v 902000 rev 38.1 mln v 29.7 mln avg shrs 5177000 v 5120000 NOTE: shr reflect 2-for-1 stock split June 9 1986 Reuter 

shr loss 17 ct v loss 14 ct net loss 467000 v loss 400000 rev 3856000 v 3423000 avg shrs 2821000 v 2797000 Reuter 

shr loss 38 ct v profit ct net loss 2254533 v profit 106621 rev 3430970 v 4104506 Reuter 

shr 73 ct v 1.03 dlrs net 10245000 v 12364000 avg shrs 13981024 v 11968524 asset 6.07 billion v 5.22 billion loan 2.92 billion v 2.45 billion deposit 4.78 billion v 4.14 billion NOTE: gain sale security 4.6 mln v 12.8 mln. loan loss provision 100000 dlrs v 7.7 mln Reuter 

The Republic Finland file Securities Exchange Commission shelf offering 550 mln dlrs debt security include note bond and/or warrant buy debt security term determine sale. The offering addition 50 mln dlrs debt security already register SEC unsold. Proceeds sale finance capital investment promotion productive investment export design strengthen country's balance payment government said. No underwriter named. Reuter 

Grumman Aerospace Corp award 77 mln dlr increment Navy contract related fiscal 1988 A-6F aircraft production Defense Department said. It contract expect complete October 1990. Reuter 

shr 1.35 dlrs v 1.27 dlrs div 39 ct v 39 ct prior net 14291000 v 13211000 rev 52.6 mln v 51.1 mln avg shrs 10234000 v 9936000 Reuter 

Kentucky Central Life Insurance Co Bluegrass Broadcasting Co Inc subsidiary agree sell Orlando Fla. radio station TK Communications Inc 13.5 mln dlrs subject FCC approval. Reuter 

shr loss 57 ct v loss 2.88 dlrs net loss 3442000 v loss 13750000 Reuter 

The follow propose security offering file recently Securities Exchange Commission: General Instrument Corp GRL> - Offering 150 mln dlrs convertible subordinate debenture due 2012 underwriting lead Lazard Freres Co Dillard Department Stores Inc DDSA> - Shelf offering 100 mln dlrs debt security include debenture note shelf offering 100 mln dlrs debt security Dillard Investment Co Inc subsidiary Goldman Sachs Co. Sara Lee Corp SLE> - Shelf offering 1.0 mln share common stock Morgan Stanley Co Inc Goldman Sachs Co. Reuter 

Tracor Applied Sciences division Tracor Inc award 60.1 mln dlr contract design development Radio Communication Suites Aegis CG-60 CG-70 ship Defense Department said. It contract expect complete 1992. Reuter 

shr 47 ct v 46 ct net 3470859 v 3454577 Reuter 

First Bank System agreeed sell First Bank Lewiston subsidiary Lewiston Mont. local banker undisclosed terms. First Bank Lewiston asset 101.4 mln dlrs quarter. Reuter 

ICN Pharmaceuticals Inc told Securities Exchange Commission acquire 556500 share Syncor International Corp 5.0 pct total outstanding common stock. ICN bought stake 3.9 mln dlrs investment plan seek control company participate management it. Reuter 

The Japanese Embassy statement "deeply disappointed" tariff announce President Reagan retaliation Japan's honor semiconductor agreement United States. It Japan fully implement pact dump semiconductor market market U.S. good result start show. The embassy Japan complain General Agreement Tariffs Trade seek talk Washington resolve issue soon possible. Reuter 

Dixons Group Plc DXNS.L> British concern recently acquire operational control Cyclops Corp explore possibility sell Cyclops subsidiary Busy Beaver Building Centers Inc. In filing Securities Exchange Commission Dixons determine explore possibility sale follow preliminary review activity Cyclops. Busy Beaver Building Centers Pittsburgh Pa. lumber building material company. Dixons won control Cyclops 95 dlr share tender offer. Reuter 

The tough trade sanction President Reagan impose Japanese export shot across Japan's bow sign Reagan attack unfair trade practice worldwide U.S. official said. But Robert Crandall trade specialist Brookings Institution tank "a shot across bow result shot stern." He left United States retaliation. The U.S. official 100 pct tariff Reagan order 300 mln dlrs worth Japanese good show Congress tough pro-trade stand take exist law protectionist legislation needed. In past tough trade action take European Community corn sorghum Taiwan beer wine South Korea counterfeit copyright patent trademarkets Japan tobacco. White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater told reporter tariff - five pct - see "serious signal" nation fair trade practices. Reagan impose sanction computer television set tool Japan honor agreement dump semiconductor market cost market U.S. products. The tariff place item available source little effect American consumer Fitzwater said. Reagan heavy pressure tougher action - especially Japan - global unfair trade practice reverse grow U.S. trade deficit. The alternative Congress would. The U.S. trade gap record 169.8 billion dlrs continue rise Japan accounting one-third America's overall deficit. But two-way deficit - Canada West Germany Taiwan South Korea - Reagan official president ready fight all. Reagan announce sanction "I regret action necessary" health vitality U.S. semiconductor industry essential American competitiveness markets. "We cannot allow jeopardized unfair trading practices" Reagan add statement California vacation Santa Barbara. He tariff remain force Japan abide agreement. U.S. official action show Congress - write trade bill - already tool need fight unfair trade. The White House aide tariff action "it wasn't appease Congress unfair trade practice." The aide add "on plane example administration us trade law fight unfair practice necessary major overall trade laws." But analyst Crandall tariff action interest United States negotiation pursue resolve issue. "It's dangerous retaliatory route" "because lead retaliation restriction trade." Crandall "the administration do political impact across country therefore impact Congress." He "I don't make lot sense." But analyst little difference whether tariff aim U.S. trading partner Congress main trading partner notice retaliation weapon Reagan ready use. Spokesman Fitzwater "we don't trade war" imposition sanction show United States act evidence trade pact violated. Crandall "the administration do political impact across country therefore impact Congress." He "I don't make lot sense." But analyst little difference whether tariff aim U.S. trading partner Congress main trading partner notice retaliation weapon Reagan ready use. Spokesman Fitzwater "we don't trade war" imposition sanction show United States act evidence trade pact violated. Reuter 

Diamond Shamrock Corp redeem May 29 entire outstanding amount separate sinking fund debenture issues. The company buy outstanding 79.7 mln dlrs 7.70 pct debenture 2001 103.20 pct par value plus accrue 59.9 mln dlrs nine pct debenture due 1999 103.15 pct principal amount plus accrue 50 mln dlrs 9-1/8 pct debenture 2000 103.625 pct par value plus accrue interest. Reuter 

Rebellious troop central city Cordoba call uprise President Raul Alfonsin's government army command said. Congressional leader probably necessary therefore declare siege. Military officer earlier army unit Buenos Aires Misiones province support Cordoba regiment focal uprising. The troop object human right trials. Reuter 

U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter sure Japan retaliate tariff President Reagan slap 300 mln dlrs Japanese electronic good today. "I'd it's 99 plus pct sure (the tariffs) provoke retaliation American products" Yeutter told Cable News Network. "Japan stake relationship (with United States) seriously entertain thought retaliation" Yeutter said. Earlier Reagan impose 100 pct tariff range Japanese good retaliation Japan's allege violation bilateral pact govern semiconductor trade. Yeutter U.S. farm product target Tokyo decide hit back. "If (Japan) retaliate probably American agricultural products" said. "But I really chance happen slim none" added. Reuter 

Shooting erupt Philippine army headquarters morning independent Manila radio station said. Radio DZRH check unconfirmed report 120 mutineer surround office building inside Fort Bonifacio. An officer told Reuters alert sound camp. A Reuter reporter camp gate seal guard prevent anyone inside. REUTER 

A truckload heavily-armed rebel soldier force Philippine army headquarters freed held prisoner camp January revolt military source said. The source told Reuters estimate 100 rebel occupy headquarters building Fort Bonifacio force loyal President Aquino surround building urge surrender. An independent radio station report gunfire camp. REUTER 

Japan plan immediate retaliatory action implementation U.S. Tariffs Japanese electronic good minister international trade industry Hajime Tamura statement. Japan request bilateral consultation accordance Article 23-1 General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) Washington yesterday. Tamura deep regret U.S. Measures impose 100 pct tariff 300 mln dlrs worth Japanese import computer colour television set tools. REUTER 

The central bank issue 5.3 billion Taiwan dlrs certificate deposit (CDs) boost CD issue 140.42 billion compare 16 billion issue 1986 period. The CDs maturity six month carry rate range 4.07 5.12 pct bank spokesman told Reuters. The issue aim help curb growth M-1b money supply result foreign exchange reserve 53 billion U.S. Dlrs. REUTER 

Foreign investment Malaysia 1986 rise 524.5 mln ringgit high 1971 324.9 mln 1985 Malaysian Industrial Development Authority MIDA said. MIDA director-general N. Sadasivan increase due investment Netherlands 180.3 mln ringgit petrochemical project Bintulu news agency Bernama reported. REUTER 

U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige praise South Korea's surplus-cutting trade policy warn protectionist retaliation Seoul's market liberalisation effort falter fail. In press conference talk South Korean leader Baldrige call government's announce intention regulate export boost import "a step direction Korean government take." The government adopt policy week hope head trade U.S. Baldrige policy "showed understand country cannot indefinitely grow export alone." "There change domestic growth begin load" said. South Korea 7.2 billion dlr trade surplus Washington 1986 thanks largely boom sale car consumer electronic goods. It rack 1.4 billion dlrs surplus quarter year. Baldrige Seoul's package measure "broad comprehensive ... Actions take liberalise import (and) increase domestic economy government willing follow through." "We watch implementation policy direction closely" said. "Because protectionism grow U.S. We real Korea keep path ... Of steadily increase liberalisation.... If falter fail turn backward I'm sure I'm stand we'd protectionist movement U.S." Baldrige South Korean Trade Minister Rha Woong-bae spent discuss trade problem specific product categories. These include service industry close sector South Korea computer cars. Baldrige urge speedy action remove tariff tax import U.S. Cars sell time American prices. "We stop that. With sort there's trouble somewhere road" said. "We point out." Asked Seoul's measure succeed revaluation won Washington urge month Baldrige decline comment. "We don't target particular currency feel currency successful economy reflect fundamental various economy involved" said. Baldrige agree Rha's proposal cooperation form U.S.-South Korean joint venture third countries. The American government pleased encourage U.S. Firms involve added. Commenting President Reagan's decision increase tariff Japanese import U.S. Baldrige Washington's trade problem Japan comparable difficulty South Korea. "I attitude Korea reasonable fair" said. "It's firm attitude. We don't anything ask it. "But negotiation friendly reasonable usually happen country live to." REUTER 

Rice Export Corp Pakistan Ltd invite tender May 7 export 15000 tonne rice 1985-86 (November/March) crop. REUTER 

The Asian Development Bank (ADB) change decision admit China member despite protest founder member Taiwan bank president Masao Fujioka said. China's admission March 1986 decision bank change Taiwan's name 'Taipei China' cause Taiwanese boycott ADB's annual meeting Manila. Fujioka told Reuters interview Taiwan invite bank's 20th annual meeting start April 27 Osaka "but situation remains same." "The bank's board agree change Taiwan's name 'Taipei China'" Fujioka said. "We try maintain channel communication Taiwanese director negotiate view change agreement China" said. ADB figure show China large shareholding bank's develop 7.2 pct equity. Fujioka stalemate continued Vietnam complain year's meeting ADB unilaterally stop advance loans. An ADB spokesman loan 40.67 mln dlrs Republic Vietnam (South Vietnam) 1974. Vietnam 23 mln dlrs loan disbursed. The bank's 1986 annual report 11 loan approve Vietnam eight close suspend administration 1986. Cumulative disbursement Vietnam 1986 total 25.3 mln dlrs 99.5 pct total amount effective loan report said. "The situation (in Vietnam) conducive bank operations" Fujioka said. "Vietnam continue member. We loan seem difficult." "It's question political instability environment banking operations." He loan India 1986 lending operation China schedule start ADB acquire "truly Asian" character. Although China's finance ministry gain five experience borrowing World Bank ADB loan rout country's central bank Fujioka said. "It's slow start" Fujioka said. "We identify project (in China). One disappear left." He ADB lend China 200 300 mln dlrs 1987 investment bank energy project. He foresee expansion lending India. The ADB 1986 approve loan India total 250 mln dlrs. "There sort agreement loan India modest World Bank major lender" Fujioka said. He details. Fujioka ADB lending private sector serve catalyst. The bank's private sector division 1986 approve loan total 11.46 mln dlrs government guarantees. In addition ADB approve equity investment project total 8.15 mln dlrs. This raise 15.18 mln cumulative approval equity financing commenced 1983. But Fujioka ADB compete private banks. "We narrow path walk" said. He happy decision bank's donor country increase ADB's fund soft loans. The fourth replenishment soft-loan window Asian Development Fund  brought 3.6 billion dlrs 3.2 billion Fujioka said. In particular United States maintain 16 pct share" ADB chief. He disagreement U.S. Which hold 14.9 pct bank's equity lending policies. The U.S. Complained 1986 ADB grant bad loan impatience hit lending targets. "I suspect arm-twisting" said. "I developed country interested procurement instead development side." Fujioka foresaw increase sectoral lending gradual dilution ADB's project-tied lending. Fujioka project lending expect drop 63 pct total loan 1987 66.5 pct 1986 77.5 pct 1985. He sectoral lending project rise 20 pct 1987 12.8 pct 1986 7.5 pct 1985. He bank try reduce liquid asset repay borrowing carry rates. "On maintain presence major financial markets" said. "Why advantage historically low rates?" REUTER 

Australian coal industry source Japanese electricity utility demand price cut annual coal contract negotiation underway Tokyo. But source unable substantiate report large steam coal customer Chugoku Electric Power Co Inc> threaten stop take delivery price set. Coal exporter maintain year's 32 U.S. Dlrs tonne price expire Japan's fiscal March 31 Japanese pay 27-28 U.S. Dlrs secure China South Africa. Ross McKinnon manager Thiess Dampier Mitsui Coal Pty Ltd> annually export mln tonne steam coal Japan mainly Chugoku told Reuters inform refusal shipments. McKinnon recall Japanese contract settle previous expire "controlled leaks" commonplace talks. But Australian foreign currency market report seriously dealer add nervousness trading local dollar settle 0.7080 U.S. Cents midsession 0.7120 opening. Coal Australia's large single export fiscal end June 30 1986 shipment reach 90.49 mln tonne worth 5.21 billion dlrs 15.9 pct total exports. Japan large customer crucial steam coal sector 14.97 mln tonne total export 43.3 mln tonne calendar 1986. Sydney resource analyst Ian Story appreciation Australian dollar U.S. Currency meant steam coal exporter receive 44.72 dlrs tonne 52.42 dlrs year's contract negotiated. REUTER 

Asian country offering oil exploration concession avert damage shortfall due year's oil price slump United Nations said. The Bangkok-based U.N. Economic Social Commission Asia Pacific annual report price fall substantially cut exploration foreign oil firm found unprofitable maintain investment region. Oil production investment Indonesia fell 2.8 billion dlrs 1985 3.2 billion 1983 estimate decline six pct year. There 11 well drill Thailand 1986 64 1985. The report Thai Shell Exploration Production Co Ltd> unit Royal Dutch/Shell Group> announce 30 pct cut exploration production spending year. To counter decline output India Malaysia reduce petroleum share demand Indonesia cut taxes. Nepal offer guaranteed income share 87.5 pct cover exploration cost Thailand decrease 12.5 pct royalty payments. The loser major regional exporter Indonesia Brunei China Malaysia Iran. Their aggregate oil income fell estimate 20 billion dlrs 1986 40 billion previous year. Indonesia's export earnings fell nearly half 1986 11.6 billion dlrs 1985 U.N. Report said. Iran lose six billion dlrs Brunei 3.8 billion China billion Malaysia 0.8 billion. However Asian importer save eight nine billion dlrs 1985 1986 considerably ease balance payments. South Korea Philippines India Thailand Pakistan major beneficiary Thailand Pakistan respectively save 875 mln 435 mln dlrs year. REUTER 

Swiss wholesale price rise 0.1 pct March 0.3 pct fall February 0.8 pct drop March 1986 Federal Statistics Office said. Prices fell 3.4 pct March 4.3 pct decline February 3.5 pct fall end March 1986. The March index base 1963 168.8 compare 168.5 February 174.7 March 1986. The Statistics Office slight increase March due high price energy consumer goods. REUTER 

Northern Foods Plc NFDS.L> Northserv Inc> unit agree sell Flagship Cleaning Services Inc> Best Co Inc> Nevada 24.6 mln dlrs cash. Completion due April 30. Flagship base Philadelphia hold Sears Roebuck Co S> franchise domestic carpet upholstery cleaning throughout U.S. In March 1986 Flagship - know KeyServ - report pre-tax profit 2.0 mln dlrs end-year asset 8.4 mln give book profit disposal 16.2 mln. Northern Foods share unchanged 297p. REUTER 

The Bundesbank tender 28-day security repurchase agreement offering bank liquidity aid fix bid rate 3.80 pct central bank spokesman said. Banks bid 1400 GMT tomorrow fund allocate credit account tomorrow April 22. Banks repurchase security pledge May 20. REUTER 

Japan's policy self-sufficiency rice example extreme protectionism visit U.S. Agriculture secretary Richard Lyng told press conference. He told National Press Club Japan Japan export balance U.S. But country inconsistent 100 pct self-sufficient product. Speaking farm trade talk Japan agriculture minister Mutsuki Kato Lyng U.S. Had total liberalisation rice market Japan. Lyng urge Japan allow import rice. "We access rice market" said. He trade representative Clayton Yeutter disappointed outcome talk Japan. He told reporter Japan reject U.S. Proposal negotiation rice round trade talk General Agreement Tariffs Trade. Lyng suggest instead bilateral talk Japan rice. Kato Japan cannot negotiate policy rice self-sufficiency. Asked U.S. Step rice issue Lyng Yeutter U.S. Rice industry do. Yeutter promise consider July August complaint Japan's rice import ban U.S. Rice Millers Association breakthrough meantime. U.S. Rice industry official indicate consider filing complaint Japan rice import ban. REUTER 

Alcoa Australia Ltd AA.S> own 51 pct Aluminum Co America AA> net profit rise 20.2 mln dlrs quarter 1987 0.8 mln 1986 period. Sales revenue climbed 300.9 mln 233.0 mln. The company paid 36.5 mln income tax compare 4.8 mln. Capital expenditure 24.0 mln 33.4 mln. Alcoa spent 15.7 mln Portland aluminium smelter compare 25.8 mln before. Over 65 pct smelter's potline stream quarter produce full annual rate 150000 tonne year. REUTER 

Pakistan retender 6000 12000 tonne refine bleach deodorise palm oil half May shipment trader said. REUTER 

South Korea cut loan export company reduce grow trade surplus United States European Community finance ministry official said. They billion dlrs worth foreign currency loan available firm willing import industrial facility 500 mln dlrs import raw intermediary material parts. Exporters previously receive 645 won (0.769 dlrs) dollar's worth overseas order 575 won (0.686 dlrs) said. The official government stop bank loan aid installation export-oriented facility nation's 30 large groups. A finance ministry official told Reuters measure South Korean government's package curb increase nation's trade surplus major trading partners. South Korea trade surplus 7.2 billion dlrs United States 1986 4.1 billion 1985. It surplus 1.09 billion dlrs EC 188.8 mln dlrs 1985. REUTER 

U.S. Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng Japanese government official seem understand protectionist sentiment U.S. Could lead explosive situation protectionist legislation. Speaking National Press Club Japan Lyng protectionist sentiment U.S. Has increase alarmingly six months. "It radically change situation explosive. We verge harsh mandatory retaliatory law serious consequence country especially Japan" Lyng told reporters. Lyng's comment protectionist trade legislation appear reference so-called Gephardt provision require retaliation country trade surplus U.S. Trade analyst said. U.S. House majority leader Thomas Foley Washington Democrat yesterday predict visit Gephardt provision approve House trade legislation take month. Senior Japanese official seem perceive volatility situation U.S. Where Congress increasingly unpredictable said. "The purpose trip emphasise patience begin frayed Washington. I cannot emphasise enough" Lyng said. In talk Japanese Agriculture Minister Mutsuki Kato yesterday Lyng Trade representative Clayton Yeutter Japan begin negotiation rice policy import quota beef citrus. Lyng disappointed Kato reject U.S. Request hop lead protectionist response Congress legislation rice retaliation introduce House Senate. Lyng U.S. Is dependent Japan market export Japan large buyer U.S. Farm product 1964 especially grains. He U.S. Understands Japan limited land concerned maintain level self-sufficiency food security reasons. But argue free farm product import necessarily weaken Japanese agriculture. Lyng pledge U.S. Will embargo shipment farm product 1973. REUTER 

The World Bank suggest India move economy gradually remove government control industry adopt liberal external trade policy reduce level protection. A confidential "executive summary" draft Bank report Indian economy available Reuters. It suggests liberalisation package reform boost export Indian good make competitive. The summary "These reform result (domestic) price line price true great degree import competition export rivalry nation seen." The summary foreign trade play key role India's transition towards dynamic economy. Liberal import capital good modernise economy expose Indian producer foreign competition. Larger export provide foreign exchange imports. "The main guideline unambiguously abandon principle unlimited protection indigenously available product recognise role actual potential competition import source discipline price cost private sector domestic manufacturers" summary said. An Indian official told Reuters government discuss report Bank. A final report change likely ready May decline far details. The Bank industrialise nation discus Bank's final report meeting Paris June 22 23 discus aid India 1987/88 start June. The summary India's gross domestic product (gdp) grow average five pct Indian fiscal 1985/86 1986/87 end March. It investment sustain nearly 25 pct gdp. Almost 94 pct investment finance saving mainly private sector. India's trade deficit officially narrow 5.6 billion dlrs 1986/87 end March record 6.96 billion dlrs 1985/86. The current account deficit fell 2.4 billion dlrs 1986/87 2.88 billion 1985/86. But summary improvement largely due low price crude oil petroleum product fertiliser bulk India's import bill. India able save 2.6 billion dlrs foreign exchange 1986/87 due low price product summary said. The Bank's summary little complacency balance payment position. It despite low trade deficit 1986/87 Indian foreign exchange reserve fell 240 mln dlrs. Real export growth average 6.1 pct value term come maintain viable balance payment summary said. It explicitly suggest rupee devalued. India "might reaffirm commitment export undertaking dramatic change incentive involve political costs" said. "An example policy adoption exchange rate regime maintain exporters' profitability" summary said. It approach successful country South Korea Colombia Turkey. It maintain competitiveness Indian export simultaneously reduce import pressures. Earlier Indian government deny World Bank devalue Indian rupee boost exports. REUTER 

International Finance Corporation (IFC) World Bank's investment arm raise investment Malaysia maximum 200 mln dlrs current 21.2 mln IFC chief executive William Ryrie said. He told reporter two-day meeting government private sector representative IFC active risk capital equity finance. The IFC interested 500 mln ringgit Sabah government pulp paper project talk investment hold company Permodalan Nasional Bhd joint venture transfer profitable firm Malays. Ryrie add IFC involve underwriting 60 mln dlr Malaysian Fund launch New York Stock Exchange month. IFC's investment Malaysia involves textile manufacturing development finance cement iron steel sawmill operation money capital markets. REUTER 

Spain's consumer price index rise 0.6 pct March 0.4 pct increase February 0.3 pct March National Statistics Institute said. The March rise brought rate 6.3 pct. The government five pct target 1987 consumer price inflation 8.3 pct increase year. REUTER 

The Belgian National Bank cut month treasury certificate rate effective immediately. It telex message key month rate reduce 0.05 point 7.25 pct month rate 0.10 point 7.20 pct month rate 0.15 point 7.15 pct. The Bank adjust short-term treasury certificate rate April 3 rate cut 0.10 points. It regular reduction rate hoist month rate 0.50 point 7.90 pct rate eight pct January 6 ahead realignment European Monetary System. The National Bank bought 7.91 billion franc foreign currency week end April 13 National Bank spokesman week. Foreign exchange analyst note reflect current strength Belgian franc. REUTER 

Taiwan's industrial production index base 1981 rise 14.21 pct 162.19 March revise 142.01 February 7.19 pct March 1986 Economic Ministry said. The February figure revise preliminary 140.06. A ministry official March index stood high level 169.94 December 1986. He attribute increase rise production textile wooden bamboo product plastic machinery electronics transportation equipment mining construction. REUTER 

Bowater Industries Plc BWTR.L> agree buy Southampton-based builders' merchant Hooper Ashby Ltd> 718545 Bowater share float rate unsecured loan stock cash. It give far financial detail besides say final payment cash loan stock audit account available. Hooper family-owned turnover 25 mln stg 1986 net asset nine mln stg. Bowater share unchanged 495p Thursday. REUTER 

The Bank Japan intervene market try accelerate dollar's rise heavy dollar buying institutional investor dealer said. The central bank bought moderate amount dollar 142.10 yen said. REUTER 

The Bank Japan carefully watch recent rapid rise Tokyo stock yen bond market impact inflation governor Satoshi Sumita said. In statement bank's regional branch manager Sumita central bank particularly monitoring market recent rapid growth money supply. He carefully watch real estate prices. Sumita expect money supply growth remain April June. In March money supply measure M-2 plus certificate deposit rise year-on-year rate nine pct. REUTER 

Pakistan bought 6000 tonne rbd palm oil import tender half May shipment trader said. The price believe region 345.50 dlrs tonne cost freight confirmation await said. Pakistan sought buy 12000 tonne half May likely tender balance. REUTER 

U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige praise South Korea's surplus-cutting trade policy warn protectionist retaliation Seoul's market liberalisation effort falter fail. In press conference talk South Korean leader Baldrige call government's announce intention regulate export boost import "a step direction Korean government take." The government adopt policy week hope head trade U.S. Baldrige policy "showed understand country cannot indefinitely grow export alone." "There change domestic growth begin load" said. South Korea 7.2 billion dlr trade surplus Washington 1986 thanks largely boom sale car consumer electronic goods. It rack 1.4 billion dlrs surplus quarter year. Baldrige Seoul's package measure "broad comprehensive ... Actions take liberalise import (and) increase domestic economy government willing follow through." "We watch implementation policy direction closely" said. "Because protectionism grow U.S. We real Korea keep path ... Of steadily increase liberalisation.... If falter fail turn backward I'm sure I'm stand we'd protectionist movement U.S." Baldrige South Korean Trade Minister Rha Woong-bae spent discuss trade problem specific product categories. These include service industry close sector South Korea computer cars. Baldrige urge speedy action remove tariff tax import U.S. Cars sell time American prices. "We stop that. With sort there's trouble somewhere road" said. "We point out." Asked Seoul's measure succeed revaluation won Washington urge month Baldrige decline comment. "We don't target particular currency feel currency successful economy reflect fundamental various economy involved" said. Baldrige agree Rha's proposal cooperation form U.S.-South Korean joint venture third countries. The American government pleased encourage U.S. Firms involve added. Commenting President Reagan's decision increase tariff Japanese import U.S. Baldrige Washington's trade problem Japan comparable difficulty South Korea. "I attitude Korea reasonable fair" said. "It's firm attitude. We don't anything ask it. "But negotiation friendly reasonable usually happen country live to." REUTER 

A black policeman kill 70 injured bomb lobbed onto parade ground South Africa's big black township Soweto morning government said. The device thrown passing vehicle trainee township policeman South Africa parade Tladi police training centre government's Bureau Information said. Ten officer seriously wound 60 suffer slight injury said. A bureau spokesman type explosive device know arrest made. The government blame spate limpet mine blast South African city recent month outlaw African National Congress (ANC) fight low-level guerrilla domination South Africa. The municipal police perform security duty black township main target black militant past political unrest claimed 2400 lives. Many black policeman force live compound outskirt township home attacked. Today's attack dare emergency declare June police troop deployed railway station stop attack train link bitter strike black transport workers. Foreign Minister Pik Botha allege ANC planning campaign violence run-up whites-only election month. Security major election issue extreme right-winger accuse government soft "revolutionary onslaught." Botha warn neighbour black-ruled allow guerrilla infiltrate South Africa territory. He South Africa hesitate action thwart allege offensive. Zambia Mozambique Botswana Zimbabwe deny Botha's charge pretext South African attack them. Pretoria raid allege ANC base so-called Frontline past. Reuter 

North Korea unveiled plan boost industrial agricultural production sharply seven greatly expand foreign trade. Prime Minister Li Gun-mo told eighth Supreme People's Assembly Pyongyang North Korea intend increase international trade 220 pct period 1987/93 gross industrial output 90 pct agricultural production 40 pct accord North Korean Central News Agency monitor here. REUTER 

North Korea unveiled plan boost industrial agricultural production seven greatly expand trade nation official North Korean Central News Agency monitor Tokyo reported. Prime Minister Li Gun-mo told eighth Supreme People's Assembly Pyongyang agricultural production rise 1.4 time period seven-year plan agency said. "For satisfactory solution food clothing housing 15 mln tonne target grain hit...And 1.5 billion metre textile produce annually" said. Annual output non-ferrous metal lift 1.7 mln tonne seven plan agency quote Li saying. During previous seven-year plan North Korea achieve annual output 10 mln tonne grain. Chemical fertilizer production hit annual target five mln tonnes. He provide figures. REUTER 

Esso U.K. Plc>'s 1987 exploration scheme involves activity company spokeswoman. She confirm Esso UK member Exxon Corp XON> likely participate 15 20 well 25 well year. Total capital expenditure budget similar year's budget 450 mln stg said. She add exploration production expenditure 370 mln stg Esso UK 1.2 billion stg forward capital commitment. The spokeswoman 30 40 pct cost saving development plan Kittiwake - field Shell-Esso Gannet North Sea oil gas cluster consider development years. Esso UK Shell U.K. Exploration Production> Shell Transport Trading SC.L> spent 300 350 mln stg Kittiwake recoverable reserve 70 mln barrels. Cost saving 40 45 mln barrel Osprey field expect cost 150 mln stg develop. Development field expect ahead said. REUTER 

Striking docker brought Canary Island port Las Palmas halt call stoppage Spain's main port Barcelona win reinstatement sack worker port official said. They 15 freighter affected Las Palmas talk dockers' demand reinstate five worker on. A stoppage call Santa Cruz Tenerife. Union source strike continue Las Palmas tomorrow spread unless demand met strike threaten port hour Thursday Friday six Saturday hour May 4-11. REUTER 

British Foreign Secretary Sir Geoffrey Howe call industrial develop country combat trade protectionism remove barrier impede free trading agricultural products. Howe address annual meeting U.N. Economic Social Commission Asia Pacific (ESCAP) success fight protectionism hinge current Uruguay Round General Agreement Tariffs Trade. He Britain commit resist combat protectionism free trade vital Britain 30 pct gnp come trade good services. Howe urge develop country market remove measure distort free trade service provide protection intellectual property rights. He industrial nation adopt macro-economic policy reduce trade imbalance promote stable currency relationships. Howe agricultural industry plague surplus fall commodity price recent subsidise protected. But farm surplus tackle despite politically difficult government reverse trend grow farm subsidies. "This over-subsidisation over-protection agriculture dog ahead sustain application energy imagination solutions" Howe said. REUTER 

Taiwan's Economic Ministry approve ambitious proposal call billion U.S. Dollar investment private company United States five ministry official said. John Ni director Ministry's Industrial Development Investment Centre (IDIC) IDIC proposal Taiwanese firm encourage factory invest property security market U.S.. Taiwan's 1986 investment U.S. Totalled 46 mln U.S. Dlrs official statistic show. The investment mainly electronics food service trading sectors. The proposal approve Economic Minister Lee Ta-hai yesterday call investment 80 mln U.S. Dlrs 1987 120 mln 1988 160 mln 1989 240 mln 1990 400 mln 1991 told Reuters. It discuss soon official Finance Ministry Central Bank Council Economic Planning Development submit cabinet final approval said. "This ambitious proposal government initiative encourage businessmen invest America" Lee said. He government incentive prospective Taiwanese investor include bank loan five-year income tax holiday. Applications invest U.S. Would simplified. A ministry spokesman told reporter propose investment helpful create job opportunity Americans avoid U.S. Import quota restriction Taiwanese products. The plan reduce Taiwan's trade surplus U.S. Which rise record 13.6 billion U.S. Dlrs 1986 10.2 billion 1985 spokesman said. The rise surplus enable Taiwan accumulate 54 billion U.S. Dlrs foreign exchange reserves. Economists described proposal significant step government U.S. Protectionism. "Time run us. Taiwan lag behind Japan South Korea encourage businessmen invest abroad" Hou Chia-chi economics professor Soochow University. REUTER 

The Asian Development Bank (ADB) change decision admit China member despite protest founder member Taiwan bank president Masao Fujioka said. China's admission March 1986 decision bank change Taiwan's name 'Taipei China' cause Taiwanese boycott ADB's annual meeting Manila. Fujioka told Reuters interview Taiwan invite bank's 20th annual meeting start April 27 Osaka "but situation remains same." "The bank's board agree change Taiwan's name 'Taipei China'" Fujioka said. "We try maintain channel communication Taiwanese director negotiate view change agreement China" said. ADB figure show China large shareholding bank's develop 7.2 pct equity. Fujioka stalemate continued Vietnam complain year's meeting ADB unilaterally stop advance loans. An ADB spokesman loan 40.67 mln dlrs Republic Vietnam (South Vietnam) 1974. Vietnam 23 mln dlrs loan disbursed. The bank's 1986 annual report 11 loan approve Vietnam eight close suspend administration 1986. Cumulative disbursement Vietnam 1986 total 25.3 mln dlrs 99.5 pct total amount effective loan report said. "The situation (in Vietnam) conducive bank operations" Fujioka said. "Vietnam continue member. We loan seem difficult." "It's question political instability environment banking operations." He loan India 1986 lending operation China schedule start ADB acquire "truly Asian" character. Although China's finance ministry gain five experience borrowing World Bank ADB loan rout country's central bank Fujioka said. "It's slow start" Fujioka said. "We identify project (in China). One disappear left." He ADB lend China 200 300 mln dlrs 1987 investment bank energy project. He foresee expansion lending India. The ADB 1986 approve loan India total 250 mln dlrs. "There sort agreement loan India modest World Bank major lender" Fujioka said. He details. Reuter 

CSR Ltd CSRA.S> partner significant natural gas discovery Roma region central western Queensland CSR statement. The Wingnut Number One exploration flow 6.5 mln cubic foot zone drill stem test interval 1180-1207 meter 1112-1159. CSR 400 meter exist gas gathering Roma petroleum lease fund Barcoo Petroleum NL>. Interest holder completion CSR 42.58 pct Barcoo 49.9 IOL Petroleum Ltd> 7.51. REUTER 

Taiwan's industrial production index base 1981 rise 14.21 pct 162.19 March revise 142.01 February 7.19 pct March 1986 Economic Ministry said. The February figure revise preliminary 140.06. A ministry official March index stood high level 169.94 December 1986. He attribute increase rise production textile wooden bamboo product plastic machinery electronics transportation equipment mining construction. REUTER 

U.S. Interior Secretary Donald Hodel five chance drilling Alaska oil. "But it's there's chance giant field" Hodel ABC's "Good Morning America." "So geological prospect (geologists) talk I've involve process" said. Hodel announce yesterday urge Congress 1.5 mln acre Arctic National Wildlife Refuge Alaska oil exploration despite fear environmental damage threaten Caribou herd region. He exploration need effort prevent future U.S. oil shortage oil drilling Prudhoe Bay field Alaska prove oil drill severely damage environment. He Caribou herd Prudhoe Bay triple contrary concern drilling operation endanger herd. Reuter 

Sight deposit commercial bank Swiss National Bank fell 416.9 mln Swiss franc 7.46 billion six day end April 16 National Bank said. Sight deposit measure money market liquidity Switzerland. Foreign exchange reserve fell 627.4 mln franc 32.50 billion francs. The National Bank attribute fall dismantle outstanding swap arrangements. Bank note circulation fell 116.9 mln franc 24.36 billion deposit call National Bank mainly government fund fell 116.0 mln franc 825.5 mln. REUTER 

U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige U.S. Sales technology China rise despite Peking's complaint restricted. He told reporter airport arrive talk technology transfer China increase continue so. The official Peking Review yesterday accuse United States delay approval high-technology sale China. Last Washington approve 60 pct export China apply magazine said. "The COCOM-listed export control fraction technology U.S. Is transfer (to China) mean joint ventures" Baldrige said. COCOM Western coordinate committee form World War Two limit export advanced technology Communist nations. Baldrige sure U.S. Firms compete firm country technology sales. He add protectionism hurt economy trading nation Reagan Administration fight protectionist legislation U.S. Congress. Baldrige China's Foreign Trade Minister Zheng Tuobin act chairman fifth session commission commerce trade review bilateral trade relations. A U.S. Official issue raise Baldrige's talk trade deficit country say problem face U.S. Companies invest China. Reuter 

City Resources (Asia) Ltd> locally list unit Australian base City Resources Ltd> acquire 80-day option buy exploration development operating right mining property island Luzon Philippines. It statement average assay result random sample Brescia ore bearing body 459-hectare site show 2.4 gramme gold 64 gramme silver 1.9 gramme copper tonne. It exercise option test confirm site's potential. Further detail available. REUTER 

The General Agreement Tariffs Trade (GATT) begin probe May 7-8 legality Japanese import restriction 12 farm product Agriculture Ministry official said. The investigation Geneva follow U.S. Complaint restriction violate GATT rule prohibit import quotas. The product involve include fruit juice peanut tomato juice. Reuter 

The Japanese government consider buying U.S.-made supercomputer defuse mount trade friction country Trade Minister Hajime Tamura quote saying. Japanese official Tamura told visit U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter government aside money purchase supercomputer supplementary budget drawn year. But emphasise matter study firm decision made. Tamura urge Yeutter lift trade sanction impose Japan argue yen's rapid rise already work correct country's trade imbalance. But accord Japanese official Yeutter held little hope American trade sanction lift soon United States need action Japan boost domestic demand import words. In lift tariff impose 300 mln dlrs worth Japanese export Friday U.S. Needs proof joint computer chip pact Japan working. And Yeutter quote tell Tamura. REUTER 

A total 2769 tonne British intervention feed wheat available 57300 tonne sell today's tender market Home Grown Cereals Authority HGCA said. Price detail reported. Reuter 

Dry warm weather Western Europe sugar beet area week allow plant progress rapidly private forecaster Accu-Weather Inc said. Sugar beet area Britain dry warm Thursday Friday beet area France West Germany dry seasonable weather become warmer. But damp chilly weather delay plant Soviet beet area said. Eastern Soviet sugar beet area windy yesterday rain snow showers. Water equivalent amount 0.10 inch. Showers snow flurry linger 0.30 inch rain likely tomorrow. Reuter 

The Swiss National Bank sell yen dollar join concert intervention central bank spokesman National Bank said. He decline central bank active market earlier Tokyo dealer Bank Japan intervene 142.10 yen dollar market source believe Bundesbank market well. The National Bank spokesman decline specify volume dollar purchase rate paid. REUTER 

The Bundesbank intervene market buy dollar yen dealer said. They respond enquiry immediately news Swiss National Bank join concert intervention sell yen dollars. The Bundesbank immediate comment reports. But dealer German central bank market 1300 GMT dollar trading 141.90 yen buy amount U.S. Currency. Dollar trading quiet European session. REUTER 

The Bank England money market far 183 mln stg assistance afternoon session. This take Bank's total 561 mln stg compare estimate shortage 550 mln stg earlier revise 400 mln. The central bank purchase bank bill outright comprise 80 mln stg band 9-7/8 pct eight mln stg band 9-13/16 pct 95 mln stg band 9-3/4 pct. REUTER 

TransCanada PipeLines Ltd raise takeover offer Dome Petroleum Ltd 5.5 billion Canadian dlrs 4.3 billion accord report Canadian Broadcasting Corp (CBC). However spokesman Dome company interested already agree acquire Amoco Corp AN> 5.1 billion dlrs CBC said. Spokesmen Dome TransCanada immediately reach comment. Although Dome interested Amoco offer spokesman TransCanada quote say ultimate decision rest Dome shareholders. "I don't (Dome chairman J. Howard Madconald) letter land desk he's offer equal shareholder desk time" TransCanada chief financial officer Neil Nichols quote saying. Reuter 

Chicago Mercantile Exchange floor trader commission representative guesstimate today's hog slaughter 275000 293000 versus 284000 week ago 320000 ago. Cattle slaughter guesstimate 122000 128000 versus 128000 week ago 138000 ago. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve Board oppose pending legislation establish ceiling charge credit card companies. "The Board believe appropriate impose federal ceiling credit card rates" Fed governor Martha Seger told Senate Banking Subcommittee. "Among Federal ceiling undesirable effect form reduce credit availability lead change non-rate credit card terms" testified. Reuter 

Federal Reserve Board Governor Wayne Angell Reagan appoint majority board odds Chairman Paul Volcker whether rate rise support dollar. "I anticipate little difference chairman's position price-level stability - view dollar foreign exchange market - own" Angell interview New York Times. "And I little difference (Governor) Manley Johnson's position own" added. The newspaper Angell speak response inquiry concern report syndicate columnist Rowland Evans Robert Novak Volcker ready raise rate defend dollar thwart Reagan appoint board. Angell told newspaper evidence disagreement board "anyone suggest" "might reach pretty far." Reuter 

Bally Manufacturing Corp sign definitive agreement sell stock Six Flags theme park subsidiary affiliate Wesray Capital Corp. Ccompletion propose transaction expect May said. Bally receive gross proceeds 350 mln dlrs Six Flags subsidiary. Bally transaction restructuring result tax profit 100 mln dlrs. Proceeds sale Six Flags corporate purpose reduce debt said. The sale theme park remove Bally's balance sheet additional 250 mln dlrs Six Flags debt carry Bally balance sheet said. Kidder Peabody provide bridge financing Wesray complete propose transaction Bally said. Six Flags operates seven major theme amusement park park orient entertainment facilities. Wesray Capital private investment firm base Morristown New Jersey. Reuter 

A bomb rock Johannesburg report injured. Police explosive device place car Mayfair district. Reuter 

Japan face mount crisis huge trade surplus recognizes act quickly refocus export driven economy senior Foreign Ministry official said. "The crisis Japanese government increasing" Deputy Director General Hiroshi Hirabayashi told reporters. "The accelerate effort (to restructure economy) recognized." Hirabayashi gradual progress refocus Japanese economy admit seem spectacular foreign observers. Difficulties encounter implement so-called Maekawa report unveiled ago said. But add foreign government appreciate effort made. The report name principal author former Bank Japan governor Haruo Maekawa call shift Japan's economy dependence export growth. The Japanese cabinet review progress release. According Hirabayashi Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone told fellow minister Japan follow direction Maekawa urge effort achieve it. Foreign Minister Tadashi Kuranari add publicize action Japan take refocus economy. Listing action Hirabayashi import manufacture good increase rate fall coal steel non-ferrous metal output reduced. He express hope Japan act quickly future implement report scoffed suggestion ten Maekawa's goal met. "It fulfill (goals) Maekawa report" said. REUTER 

Great Western Financial Corp experience anouther outstanding 1987 base performance months. Reporting record earnings tenth consecutive quarter company profit rise 81.2 mln dlrs 1.66 dlrs share 79.8 mln dlrs 1.50 dlrs earlier. The company growth "which include 19.7 pct increase net income encourages believe 1987 strong earnings growth." Great Western real estate loan origination total 1.7 billion dlrs late quarter 1.5 billion dlrs earlier. Total lending 2.2 billion dlrs v 1.9 billion dlrs. About 95 pct quarter loan volume adjustable rate mortgage short term loan said. The company loan sale 755 mln dlrs late quarter compare 1.5 billion dlrs earlier. Reuter 

The Thai Cabinet approve seven pct increase budget fiscal 1987/88 start October compare 6.2 pct increase current end September government spokesman said. He told reporter budget present Parliament late month June call spending 243.5 billion baht 227.5 billion year. The budget intend Thailand's Gross Domestic Product grow five pct compromise conservative fiscal monetary policy spokesman said. "The budget line policy stimulate economy achieve stable growth continue maintain current cautious fiscal policy" said. The spokesman budget provide 9.6 pct increase fresh government investment expenditure 39.8 billion baht 36.3 billion year. Government revenue project grow 7.5 pct 199.5 billion baht 185.5 billion targetted 1986/87. He budget contains 44 billion baht deficit 3.4 pct GDP compare 42 billion 3.5 pct plan year. The deficit require Thai law finance domestic borrowings. The finalise budget bill earmark 59.8 billion baht 24.6 pct total expenditure service government's domestic foreign debt 56 billion similar 24.6 pct year. REUTER 

The London Metal Exchange (LME) apply form hold company uncertainty relate lawsuit file 1985 tin crisis. The company call The London Metal Exchange Ltd replace two-tiered committee board structure single manage board July. The exchange step Securities Investments Board unresolved legal tussle result tin crisis October 1985 prevent acceptance LME's application Recognized Investment Exchange. The exchange currently run The Metal Market Exchange Company Ltd face law suit link tin. The asset need run exchange transfer company fair market value added. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve Board oppose pending legislation establish ceiling charge credit card companies. "The Board believe appropriate impose federal ceiling credit card rates" Fed governor Martha Seger told Senate Banking Subcommittee. "Among Federal ceiling undesirable effect form reduce credit availability lead change non-rate credit card terms" testified. Reuter 

Canada's retail sale seasonally adjust rise 1.9 pct February downward revise 0.3 pct decline January Statistics Canada said. Retail sale rise 12.19 billion dlrs February significant increase 11.97 billion dlrs record January federal agency said. Unadjusted sale 7.8 pct high February 1986. In February automobile sale rise 3.4 pct department store sale rise 3.2 pct service station 1.9 pct. The increase slightly offset 2.0 pct decline grocery confectionery sundries store sales. Reuter 

Oil trader New York Exxon Corp's Exxon U.S.A. subsidiary increase price charge contract barge customer heating oil New York harbor 0.25 ct gallon effective today. The 0.25 cent price hike brings Exxon's contract barge price 48.75 ct gallon trader said. Reuter 

Admar Group Inc agree principle acquire SelectCare Management Co Inc combination cash stock total 3.6 mln dlrs. SelectCare base Torrance Calif. manages alternative health care delivery system Admar said. It company annual revenue 1.5 mln dlrs. Reuter 

The Federal Reserve expect enter U.S. government security market add temporary reserve economist said. They likely supply reserve indirectly arrange 2.5 billion dlrs customer repurchase agreements. There chance direct reserve add instead via System repurchase agreements. Federal fund average 6.21 pct yesterday open 6-3/8 pct trade 6-7/16 pct. Reuter 

Alfin Inc AFN> receive regulatory letter Office Compliance U.S. Food Drug Administration assert label advertising claim Glycel product "new drugs" meaning Federal Food Drug Cosmetic Act approval obtain "misbranded" labelling. The company understands action industry-wide investigation. The company add review matter counsel intend respond corrective action necessary. Reuter 

The Supreme Court 6-3 decision rule Indiana law aim protect company hostile takeover out-of-state business constitutional. The court justice reverse ruling U.S. Court Appeals Chicago struck 1986 control-share acquisition law. The involve hostile takeover bid Dynamics Corp America CTS Corp base Elkhart Ind. Dynamics tender offer 1985 million share bring holding CTS stock 27.5 pct company's total. After CTS invoked law Dynamics file lawsuit challenge constitutionality measure. One effect law impose 50-day delay tender offer option target company. It require acquisition control share Indiana corporation include voting right unless majority pre-existing shareholder agree regularly schedule meeting. Justice Lewis Powell write court majority held law pre-empted federal security law. "The Indiana Act protects independent shareholder coercive aspect tender offer allow vote group" said. He acknowledge law delay tender offer decrease successful tender offer Indiana corporations. But law discriminate interstate commerce justified state's interest protect shareholders. Reuter 

The State New Jersey sell 23 stock trade worth 43 mln dlrs morning. Roland Machold director Division Investment New Jersey "the sale ongoing divestment program." Under N.J. law enact August 1985 divest security stock bond company South Africa August 1988 Machold said. He "in fully divest August 1988 probably sell average week 50 mln 75 mln dlrs stock." The stock sell today's sale include Abbott Laboratories ABT> Allied Signal Inc ALD> CitiCorp CCI> Ford Motor Co F> General Motors GM> Gillette Co GS> H.J. Heinz HNZ> IBM IBM> Minnesota Mining Manufacturing MMM> Mobil MOB> Monsanto Co MTC> NCR Corp NCR> Pepsico Inc PEP> Pfeizer PFE> Union Camp UCC> USX X> Westinghouse Electric WX> Weyerhaeuser Co WY> American International Group AIG> CBS CBS> Coca-Cola KO> Merck MRK> Upjohn UPJ>. Machold brokerage handle today's sale seven house bid deal. He disclose brokerage handle sale. "The total value sale date" Machold "are billion dlrs book value billion dlrs market value." He difficulty define company South Africa difficult determine exactly future sale worth. Machold estimate book value future sale August 1988 range 1.2 billion dlrs 5.2 billion dlrs. Reuter 

Du Pont Co's Conoco Inc Viodo Marine Number exploratory offshore People's Republic Congo produce 1135 barrel 26.55 degree gravity oil daily test 3/4 inch choke. The company 202 foot 10 mile west Pointe-Noire Congo drill depth 11527 foot test 7204 foot 11300 feet. The locate Marine II block 260000 acre offshore permit acquire May 1985 Conoco operator 42.5 pct interest. Orange-Nassau Marine C.V.> own 7.5 pct Hydro Congo oil company 50 pct. Reuter 

Falconbridge Ltd expect result rest 1987 improve earlier report quarter operating loss 15.4 mln dlrs. Chief executive William James told reporter annual meeting "I hope loss certainly wouldn't loss quarter. In word money in." Falconbridge quarter operating loss 17.1 mln dlrs full-year operating loss 15.5 mln dlrs. James currency loss tie strong Canadian dollar result eight mln dlrs quarter operating loss. Falconbridge record cash account receivable U.S. dollar Canadian dollar equivalent decrease U.S. dollar falls. He quarter loss stem weaker nickel ferronickel price low production company's Sudbury Ontario nickel operation Kidd Creek operations. Falconbridge anticipates high production rest high average price precious metal James add elaborating. Falconbridge immediate plan far divestments James reply reporters' inquiries. The company sell mining subsidiary pay debt January 1986 acquisition Kidd Creek Mines Ltd Canada Development Corp CDC.TO>. He Falconbridge's debt total billion dlrs 1.37 billion dlrs Kidd Creek buy. James ass impact Amoco Corp AN>'s propose acquisition Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP>. Dome's 23 pct-owned Dome Mines Ltd DM> own 21 pct Falconbridge. Asked reporter Falconbridge prefer compete Dome bidder Calgary Alberta-based TransCanada PipeLines Ltd Chicago-based Amoco James reply "It make difference me...whoever take fine us." He told shareholder Falconbridges' plan capital expenditure decline 134 mln dlrs 160 mln dlrs year. Reuter 

Symbol Technologies Inc file Securities Exchange Commission offer mln share common stock Shearson Lehman Brothers Inc L.F. Rothschild Unterberg Towbin Inc. The share offer include share issuable over-allotment 48075 share sell sell shareholder maker bar-code reading equipment said. Reuter 

TransCanada PipeLines Ltd deny report raise offer Dome Petroleum Ltd DMP> 5.5 billion Canadian dlrs 4.3 billion. A report Canadian Broadcasting Corp (CBC) late TransCanada's bid reject Dome accepted 5.1 billion dlr bid Amoco Corp AN>. "We acquire Dome's asset prepared negotiate. However present proposal company April 16 Dome refuse negotiate TransCanada date" TransCanada president Gerald Maier. TransCanada proposal consists part -- 4.5 billion dlrs cash security billion dlrs payment creditor base future profits. Last week TransCanada value offer 4.3 billion dlrs spokesman company increase estimate value 4.5 billion dlrs recent gain Dome's stock. Dome halt Toronto Stock Exchange pending clarification TransCanada's offer. It trade 1.70 dlrs share. Two week ago TransCanada's offer Dome trade 1.10 dlrs share. Reuter 